<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR88914-0009 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.9-14-88.f2.A1008</DOCID><TEXT><ITAG tagnum="69"><ITAG tagnum="52">26 CFR Parts 1, 501, 504, 505, 506, 507 511, 512, 518, 519, and 602</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[T.D. 8228] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Allocation and Apportionment of Interest Expense and Certain OtherExpenses </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Internal Revenue Service, Treasury.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Temporary regulations. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>This document provides temporary Income Tax Regulationsrelating to the allocation and apportionment of interest expense and certainother expenses for purposes of the foreign tax credit rules and certainother international tax provisions. These regulations provide the publicwith guidance necessary to comply with the Tax Reform Act of 1986. In addition,regulations under tax conventions with Australia, Belgium, Netherlands,Japan, United Kingdom, Finland, Italy, New Zealand, and Canada have beenremoved as obsolete.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>EFFECTIVE DATE: </T2>These regulations are effective for taxable yearsbeginning after December 31, 1986. In general, these temporary regulationsapply to the allocation and apportionment of interest expense and certainother expenses for taxable years beginning after December 31, 1986.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT: </T2>Regarding the allocation andapportionment of interest expense, David Merrick, and regarding the allocationand apportionment of other expenses, Carl Cooper, both of the Office ofAssociate Chief Counsel (International), within the Office of Chief Counsel,Internal Revenue Service, 1111 Constitution Avenue, NW., Washington, DC20224 (Attention: CC:LR:T) (David Merrick, 202-566-6276; Carl Cooper, 202-634-5406,not a toll-free call).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: </T2><ITAG tagnum="84">Paperwork Reduction Act </ITAG>These regulations are being issued without prior notice and public procedurepursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act (5 U.S.C. 553). For this reason,the affirmative elections contained in these regulations have been reviewedand, pending receipt and evaluation of public comments, approved by theOffice of Management and Budget (OMB) under control number 1545-1072. Theestimated annual buden per respondent is 10 minutes. This estimate is an approximation of the average time expected to be necessaryto make the affirmative elections. It is based on such information as isavailable to the Internal Revenue Service. Individual respondents may requiregreater or less time, depending on their particular circumstances. For further information concerning these affirmative elections, and whereto submit comments on these elections and the accuracy of the estimatedburden, and suggestions for reducing this burden, please refer to the preambleto the cross-reference notice of proposed rulemaking published in the ProposedRules section of this issue of the <T4>Federal Register</T4>. <ITAG tagnum="84">Background </ITAG>This document contains temporary Income Tax Regulations (26 CFR Part 1)under sections 861(b), 863(a), 863(b), and 864(e) of the Internal RevenueCode of 1986. The temporary regulations are issued under the authoritycontained in sections 861(b) (26 U.S.C. 861(b)), 863(a) (26 U.S.C. 863(a)),863(b) (26 U.S.C. 863(b)), 864(e) (26 U.S.C. 864(e)), 865(i) (26 U.S.C.865(i)), 7701(f) (26 U.S.C. 7701(f)), and 7805 (26 U.S.C. 7805) of theInternal Revenue Code of 1986. Proposed regulations that would implementsection 864(e) were published in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>at 52 FR 34580 on September 11, 1987. <ITAG tagnum="84">Need for Temporary Regulations </ITAG>The proper application of section 864(e) depends upon the Internal RevenueService's detailed specifications of the manner in which the requirementsof the statute will be administered. These regulations are necessary toprovide taxpayers with immediate guidance in the application of section864(e). Accordingly, good cause is found to dispense with notice and publicprocedure pursuant to 5 U.S.C. 553(b) and the delayed effective date requirementof 5 U.S.C. 553(d). <ITAG tagnum="84">Explanation of Provisions </ITAG>Statutory Provisions The Tax Reform Act of 1986 revised the rules for the allocation and apportionmentof interest and other expenses for purposes of the international tax provisions.Section 864(e)(2) generally requires taxpayers to allocate and apportioninterest expense on the basis of assets. Furthermore, section 864(e)(4)requires an adjustment for earnings and profits to the tax book value ofthe stock of certain corporations owned by the taxpayer for purposes ofapportioning expenses, including interest, on the basis of assets. Section 864(e) (1) and (5) provides special rules that apply in allocatingand apportioning interest expense in the case of an affiliated group ofcorporations, as defined in the regulations. Interest expense of each memberis allocated and apportioned on the basis of apportionment fractions thatare computed as if all members of the group were a single corporation.The section 1504 definition of an affiliated group is modified for purposesof section 864(e) to include within the affiliated group section 936 corporations.Section 864(e)(3) provides rules for the treatment of tax exempt incomeand assets in allocating and apportioning expenses generally. Section 1215(c) of the Tax Reform Act of 1986 provides transition rulesin allocating and apportioning interest expense on the debt outstandingon November 16, 1985. Section 864(e)(6) provides in general that expenses other than interestwhich are not directly allocable and apportionable to any specific incomeproducing activity or property shall be allocated and apportioned as ifall members of the affiliated group were a single corporation. Affiliated Group Apportionment Generally Section 1.861-8(a)(2) provided that, if an affiliated group of corporationsjoins in filing a consolidated return under section 1501, the provisionsof andSection; 1.861-8 are to be applied separately to each member in thataffiliated group for purposes of determining such member's taxable income.This provision is revised in andSection; 1.861-8T(a)(2) to reflect the existenceof new section 864(e). Section 1.861-8(b)(3) provided that expenses which are related to supportivefunctions (such as overhead, general and administrative, and supervisoryexpenses) may, in some cases, be allocated and apportioned along with otherexpenses to which they relate and which are more directly attributableto specific income producing activities or property. This provision isamended in andSection; 1.861-8T(b)(3) to state that such expenses, if theyare allocable and apportionable under section 864(e)(6), may not be allocatedand apportioned by reference only to classes of gross income and expensesof the member of the affiliated group that incurred the expense. Asset Method Apportionment Generally Section 1.861-8T(c)(2) indicates that, although apportionment on the basisof assets is mandatory in connection with interest expenses, it may alsobe used in connection with the apportionment of other expenses. Taxpayersapportioning expenses on the basis of assets may do so either on the basisof the fair market value or the tax book value of those assets. However,once a taxpayer apportions expenses on the basis of the fair market valueof assets, it may not change back to the tax book value method withoutsecuring the Commissioner's approval. For taxpayers who apportion expenseson the basis of the tax book value of assets, the basis in assets consistingof stock in designated subsidiary corporations must be adjusted to reflectretained earnings and profits, as provided in andSection; 1.861-12T(c) ofthe regulations described below. Tax Exempt Income and Assets Section 1.861-8T(d)(2) provides that, in allocating deductions that aredefinitely related to separate classes of gross income, exempt income shallbe taken into account. In apportioning deductions for expenses that aredefinitely related and allocable to a class of gross income consistingof multiple groupings of income (whether statutory or residual) or to allgross income, however, exempt income and exempt assets shall not be takeninto account. For this purpose, tax exempt income and assets do not includeincome of a foreign person that is not effectively connected with the conductof a trade or business in the United States and related assets, or incomeof a possessions corporation for which a credit is allowed under section936 and related assets. Effective Dates Section 1.861-8T(h) provides the effective dates for the rules of andSection;andSection;1.861-8T through 1.861-14T. General Rules Regarding the Allocation of Interest Expense Section 861-9T(a) provides that any expense that is deductible under section163 (including original issue discount) constitutes interest expense forpurposes of that section, as well as for purposes of andSection;andSection;1.861-10T, 1.861-11T, 1.861-12T, and 1.861-13T. Because money is consideredto be fungible, interest expense is attributable to all activities andproperty regardless of any specific purpose for incurring an obligationon which interest is paid. Exceptions to the fungibility rule are set forthin andSection; 1.861-10T. Thus, interest expense is considered related toall income producing activities and assets of the taxpayer and, thus, allocableto all the gross income which the assets of the taxpayer generate, havegenerated, or could reasonably be expected to generate. Section 1.861-9T(b) describes the treatment of certain expenses and lossesthat are considered to be the equivalent of interest, even though theyare not designated as such. These include any transaction in which theamount of loss or expense is substantially incurred in consideration ofthe time value of money, expenses or losses incurred in certain hedgedforeign currency borrowings, and loss incurred in the sale of certain tradereceivables. The rule concerning the treatment of losses incurred in thesale of certain trade receivables is issued under authority granted bysection 865(i). The section also describes the treatment of bond premium.The Service is considering the adoption of a rule under section 863(a)that would require the apportionment of a lessee's rent expense in thesame manner as interest expense in the case of certain transactions thatqualify as leases for tax purposes but are similar in certain respectsto financing transactions. The Service contemplates that such a rule wouldapply prospectively from the date of its promulgation. Taxpayers are invitedto comment on the extent to which rental expense should be treated in thesame manner as interest expense. Section 1.861-9T(c) indicates that, prior to allocation and apportionmentof interest expense, it must first be determined that the interest expenseis currently deductible. A number of provisions in the Code disallow, capitalize,or suspend deductions of interest expense. Section 1.861-9T(d) provides that individuals generally shall apportioninterest expense under different rules according to the type of interestexpense incurred, as determined under section 163(h). Section 1.861-9T(d)also provides rules for determining what portion of the interest expenseof nonresident aliens is connected with effectively connected income, whichsupplement andSection; 1.873-1 of the regulations. In addition, it providesrules for trusts and estates. In connection with inbound investment of nonresident aliens, the Serviceis considering the adoption of a source rule that would provide that anyinterest expense that is considered to be connected with effectively connectedincome shall constitute United States source income in the hands of therecipient of such interest. Taxpayers are invited to comment on this proposal.Section 1.861-9T(e) provides apportionment rules for partnerships. Interestexpense of a partnership that is directly allocable to specific propertyunder section 1.861-10T retains its character as directly allocable interestexpense in the hands of the partner. In the case of interest expense thatis not directly allocable to identified property and is subject to apportionment,different apportionment rules may apply depending upon whether the partneris an individual or a corporation. In general, the partner's distributiveshare of interest expense that is not directly allocable to identifiedproperty is subject to apportionment at the level of the partner, takinginto account generally the partner's allocable share of partnership assets.In addition, a special rule requires the direct allocation of a partner'sdistributive share of partnership interest expense to that partner's distributiveshare of partnership income in the case of certain partners owning a lessthan 10 percent partnership interest. The section also provides rules fordetermining what portion of the interest expense of foreign partners isconsidered to be connected with effectively connected income.Section 1.861-9T(f) provides apportionment rules for corporations. Domesticcorporations shall apportion interest expense using the asset method describedin paragraph (g) of this section and the applicable rules of andSection;andSection;1.861-10T through 1.861-13T. The section also provides rules concerningthe treatment of foreign branches of domestic corporations. The sectionfurther indicates that, subject to consistency rules, the interest expenseof a controlled foreign corporation may be apportioned either using theasset method described in paragraph (g) of this section or using the modifiedgross income method described in paragraph (j) of this section, for purposesof computing subpart F income and computing earnings and profits for allother federal tax purposes. For purposes of characterizing the stock ofa controlled foreign corporation, a conforming method must be employed.See andSection; 1.861-11T(c)(2). Section 1.861-9T(g) describes the asset method. There are two methods ofapportionment based on assets: Tax book value and fair market value. Ataxpayer electing to apportion its interest expense on the basis of thefair market value of its assets must establish the fair market value tothe satisfaction of the Commissioner. The section also outlines the potentialconsequences of a taxpayer's failure to establish the fair market valueof its assets. Special rules concerning the application of the fair marketvalue method are set forth in andSection; 1.861-9T(h). Although andSection;1.861-8T(c)(2) indicates that the use of the fair market value method constitutesa binding election thereof, andSection; 1.861-9T(g) permits a taxpayer thatused the fair market value method for a substantial portion of its consolidatedgroup prior to 1987, in effect, to defer the binding election of the continueduse of the fair market value method until the first tax year starting after1987. Section 1.861-9T(g) also provides rules concerning the annual averagingof asset values and rules concerning the characterization of assets. Ingeneral, the annual average of asset values within each statutory groupingand the residual grouping is computed for the year on the basis of thetotal value of assets in such categories at the beginning and end of theyear. A different averaging method must be employed if the general ruleresults in the distortion of asset values. Currency translation rules areprovided for certain qualified business units of domestic corporations.Assets generally are characterized according to the source and type ofincome that they generate, have generated, or may reasonably be expectedto generate. Special rules relating to asset characterization are set forthin andSection; 1.861-12T. Section 1.861-9T(h) describes the mechanics of the fair market value methodin the case of an affiliated group electing its use. Generally, the groupmust determine the value of the stock of its ultimate parent, add to thisamount the annual weighted average amount of liabilities of all relatedpersons, and determine the value of the tangible assets of all relatedpersons. The excess of parent stock value and liabilities over tangibleasset values yields the value of all intangible assets of the group andof related persons. This intangible asset is characterized by referenceto the source of pre-tax net income (exclusive of passive income) beforeinterest expense of all related persons. The value of stock in a relatedperson is computed by adding to the value of its tangible assets its relativeshare of the intangible asset value (which is based on its relative shareof all net income (exclusive of passive income) before interest expenseof the group and of all related persons). The Service is considering the adoption of a rule that would permit taxpayersto value their tangible assets in nonaffiliated entities by reference totheir tax book value and to characterize their intangible asset value onthe basis of pre-tax net income (exclusive of passive income) before interestexpense of all related persons. Taxpayers are invited to comment on thisproposal. Section 1.861-9T(j) sets forth a modified gross income method for the allocationand apportionment of the interest expense of controlled foreign corporations.Generally, gross income of any higher-tier controlled foreign corporationshall include the gross income net of interest expense of any lower-tiercontrolled foreign corporation, subject to certain adjustments and consistencyrules. This modification to a gross income method is made to conform tothe section 864(e) prohibition of a gross income method for interest expense.It is designed to approximate the results of applying an asset method,which would take into account stockholdings without regard to the paymentof dividends. This method avoids the administrative difficulty of applyingthe asset method to the assets of foreign subsidiaries. Direct Allocation of Interest Expense Section 1.861-10T(b) permits the direct allocation of interest expenseto income generated by specific property in the case of qualified nonrecourseindebtedness. In general, qualified nonrecourse indebtedness refers topurchase money financing of certain assets that can reasonably be expectedto self-finance. In order for a loan to qualify, the creditor's rightsmust extend only to the asset purchased, and the property may not involvesignificant activity on the part of the owner in order to generate income.The regulations exclude from the definition of qualified nonrecourse indebtednesstransactions that lack economic significance, transactions that involvecross collateralization, transactions involving the purchase of any financialasset, and transactions that involve interest expense constituting qualifiedresidence interest. Section 1.861-10T(b) also prohibits credit enhancement, except with respectto indebtedness incurred by a lessor in a leveraged lease. In addition,the regulations impose a prospective requirement that loan documents prohibitthe acquisition by the holder of bond insurance or similar forms of creditenhancement in the case of all indebtedness other than the indebtednessof a lessor in a leveraged lease. The regulations identify certain commontrade practices that do not constitute cross collaterization or creditenhancement. As noted above, the Service is studying the treatment of leasing transactionsin general. Although the regulations currently permit credit enhancementof the indebtedness of a lessor in a leveraged lease, it is possible thatsubsequent regulations might extend the prohibition on credit enhancmentto include such lessor indebtedness. In that event, the prohibition wouldonly apply on a prospective basis. Section 1.861-10T(b) permits certain refinancings of qualified nonrecourseindebtedness as well as the refinancing of certain construction periodfinancing. Certain assumptions of pre-existing qualified nonrecourse indebtednessare also permitted.Section 1.861-10T(c) provides rules concerning the direct allocation ofinterest expense in the case of certain integrated financial transactions.In general, an integrated financial transaction is an identified borrowingused to fund a term investment in certain financial assets that may reasonablybe expected to self-amortize. The borrowing and the term investment musthave nearly matching dates of maturity. The term investment must not relatein any way to the taxpayer's trade or business. Financial services entitiesare excluded from the rule. The section also provides rules concerningthe treatment of interest expense after the liquidation of the term investment.Section 1.861-10T(d) provides special rules concerning the applicationof paragraphs (b) and (c) of this section. None of the rules of andSection;1.861-10T apply to any transaction that involves either indebtedness betweenrelated persons or indebtedness incurred from unrelated persons for thepurpose of purchasing property from a related person. Likewise, the rulesof andSection; 1.861-10T do not apply to any transaction to the extent thatsuch transaction involves the purchase of property that is leased to relatedpersons. In apportioning interest expense under andSection; 1.861-9T, thevalue of any asset to which interest expense is directly allocated underthis section shall be reduced (but not below zero) by the principal amountof the indebtedness the interest on which is so allocated.Numerous comments were received questioning the rule of andSection; 1.861-10T(c)(4)of the proposed regulations requiring the allocation of third party interestexpense of a United States shareholder to the interest income receivedfrom related controlled foreign corporations. That rule was fashioned toaddress the use of loans of borrowed funds to foreign subsidiaries to achievea substantially more favorable allocation and apportionment of interestexpense than would have resulted in the case of direct borrowings by foreignsubsidiaries. This more favorable treatment would encourage the use ofsuch loans, even though other considerations, such as minimizing foreignwithholding taxes and favorable local interest rates, might have dictatedthat the borrowing occur at the foreign subsidiary. Upon reconsideration,it has been determined that the objectives of this rule may be achievedmore narrowly by eliminating any tax benefits resulting from the substantiallydisproportionate concentration of third party indebtedness in the UnitedStates group and that the adoption of a rule intended to prevent such concentrationof third party indebtedness in the United States group is appropriate.Accordingly, andSection; 1.861-10T(c)(4) of the proposed regulations hasbeen modified as follows in new rules contained in andSection; 1.861-10T(e).Section 1.861-10T(e) provides that, if related controlled foreign corporationshave excess related person indebtedness in taxable years beginning on orafter January 1, 1988, an amount of interest on the third party indebtednessof the related United States shareholder in an amount equal to the interestincome received on the excess related person indebtedness shall be allocatedto the various separate limitation categories in proportion to the amountof related controlled foreign corporation obligations held by the relatedUnited States shareholder that is attributable to such categories. Forthis purpose, the obligations of related controlled foreign corporationsshall be characterized in the same manner as the stock of such corporations.This specific allocation will only occur in circumstances in which theaggregate debt-to-asset ratio of all related controlled foreign corporationsis less than 80 percent of the debt-to-asset ratio of the related UnitedStates shareholder. The value of the related United States shareholder'stotal assets within each separate limitation category shall then be reducedby the principal amount of such shareholder's third party indebtednessthe interest on which is directly allocated to such limitation category.If there is insufficient related person indebtedness to attain the requireddebt-to-asset ratio, certain stock in controlled foreign corporations willbe treated as indebtedness for purposes of this section. Moreover, in certaincases involving disproportionate concentrations of passive assets in relatedcontrolled foreign corporations, the Commissioner may choose not to applythe rules of andSection; 1.861-10(e) to a taxpayer.Affiliated Group Apportionment of Interest ExpenseSection 1.861-11T describes the operation of section 864(e)(1) and (5),which requires the affiliated group apportionment of interest expense.Section 1.861-11T(b) indicates that section 864(e)(1) and (5) applies tothe computation of foreign source taxable income for purposes of section904 (relating to various limitations on the foreign tax credit), the computationof the combined taxable income of the related supplier and a foreign salescorporation (FSC) (under sections 921 through 927) or a domestic internationalsales corporation (DISC) (under sections 991 through 997), and in the applicationof section 907 for purposes of determining reductions in the amount allowedas a foreign tax credit under section 901. Section 864(e)(1) and (5) doesnot apply to the computation of subpart F income of controlled foreigncorporations (under sections 951 through 964), the computation of combinedtaxable income of a possessions corporation and its affiliates (under section963), or the computation of effectively connected taxable income of foreigncorporations. With regard to section 936 corporations, the apportionmentof the affiliated group's interest expense for purposes of determiningthe amount of allowable credit under section 936 is governed by section936. Any rules that are adopted under section 936(h) could result in adjustmentsto the allocation and apportionment of interest expense pursuant to theserules.Section 1.861-11T(c) indicates that, except as otherwise provided, thetaxable income of each member of an affiliated group from sources outsidethe United States shall be determined by allocating and apportioning theinterest expense of each member according to apportionment fractions whichare computed as if all members of such group were a single corporation.Stock in affiliated corporations is not taken into account in determiningapportionment fractions under the asset method described in andSection; 1.861-9T(g).In the case of an affiliated group that files a consolidated return, consolidatedforeign tax credit limitations are computed for the group in accordancewith the rules of andSection; 1.1502-4.Section 1.861-11T(d) defines the term ``affiliated group'' to have thesame meaning as is given that term by section 1504, except that section1504(b)(4) is inapplicable. Because section 1504(b)(4) is inapplicable,section 936 corporations are included within the affiliated group for purposesof computing the apportionment fractions applicable to interest expenseof other members of the group. The regulations indicate that insurancecompanies subject to taxation under section 801 shall only be consideredto be members of the affiliated group if the parent so elects under section1504(c)(2)(A) of the Code. Any members of an affiliated group that constitutefinancial corporations (as defined in the regulations) shall be treatedas a separate affiliated group. In addition, a bank holding company thatis regulated under the Bank Holding Company Act of 1956 is subject to specialrules for purposes of segregating and apportioning its interest expenseand certain of its assets between the financial and nonfinancial groups.Under authority granted by section 7701(f), andSection; 1.861-11T(d) furtherprovides that certain unaffiliated corporations will be considered to constituteaffiliated corporations. These corporations include any includible corporationand certain foreign corporations with effectively connected income if 80percent of either the vote or value of all outstanding shares of such corporationsare owned directly or indirectly by members of the same affiliated group.Section 1.861-11T(e) indicates that, in the case of loans between membersof an affiliated group, the indebtedness of the member borrower is notconsidered as an asset of the member lender. In general, a member lendershall include related person interest income in the same class of grossincome as the class of gross income from which the member borrower deductsthe related person interest payment. Special rules apply in the case ofloans between affiliated corporations that are financial and nonfinancialcorporations (as determined under andSection; 1.861-11T(d)), loans betweenaffiliated corporations that generate high withholding tax interest, andcertain back-to-back loans. Section 1.861-11T(f) provides that, in the computation of the combinedtaxable income of any FSC or DISC and its related supplier which is a memberof an affiliated group under the pricing rules of section 925 or 994, thecombined taxable income of such FSC or DISC and its related supplier shallbe reduced by the portion of the total interest expense of the affiliatedgroup that is apportioned under the asset method to combined gross incomefrom export sales involving that FSC or DISC.Section 1.861-11T(g) addresses the problem of losses created through affiliatedgroup apportionment in the case of an affiliated group that could, butdoes not, file a consolidated return or in cases where certain unaffiliatedcorporations are treated as members of the affiliated group under the rulesof andSection; 1.861-11T(d). Generally, section 1.1502-4 of the regulationsprovides for consolidated determinations of foreign tax credit limitationsin the case of an affiliated group filing a consolidated return. In thecase of an affiliated group that does not file a consolidated return ora group that includes an unaffiliated corporation treated as affiliatedunder andSection; 1.861-11T(d), the amount of foreign tax credits allowedin any separate limitation category cannot exceed the credits computedunder paragraph (g). The adjustments that may be required under paragraph(g) eliminate losses in a limitation category created within a given groupmember through the apportionment of interest expense and reduce incomeof other group members that have income in the same limitation category.Characterization Rules and Adjustments for Certain AssetsSection 1.861-12T provides rules that apply in apportioning expenses underan asset apportionment method, including interest expenses that is requiredby section 864(e)(2) to be apportioned under an asset method.Section 1.861-12T(b) provides that inventory must be characterized by referenceto the source of sales income from the inventory for the year. Section 1.861-12T(c) concerns the treatment of stock. In general, taxpayersusing the tax book value must adjust the adjusted basis of stock in a 10percent owned corporation by the amount of certain earnings and profitsor any deficit therein. This adjustment is to be made annually and is noncumulative.Subject to consistency rules, foreign corporations are permitted to usefinancial earnings in lieu of earnings and profits for certain pre-effectivedate years. Section 1.861-12T(c) also provides rules for characterizing stock of controlledforeign corporations. Stock in a controlled foreign corporation is characterizedin the hands of the United States shareholder either by reference to theassets or gross income of the controlled foreign corporation, dependingon which method such corporation uses in the allocation and apportionmentof its own expenses.Section 1.861-12T(c) also provides rules concerning the treatment of stockin a noncontrolled section 902 corporation. Although the dividends fromeach such corporation constitute a separate limitation category, the regulationsprovide a special rule permitting the reallocation of interest expensethat gives rise to a separate limitation loss in a noncontrolled section902 corporation limitation category to any separate limitation categorythat is in excess credit, provided that such reallocation does not causea loss in such other category. This reallocation is irrevocable and cannotbe revoked by an amended return.   Section 1.861-12T(d) concerns the treatment of notes and other receivables.Notes and other receivables of affiliated corporations are not taken intoaccount, as provided in andSection;1.861-9T(g). Notes of any person otherthan a related controlled foreign corporation are characterized by referenceto the source of the interest income received. Notes of a related controlledforeign corporation are characterized according to the treatment of theinterest income received, as determined under the look-through rules ofsection 904(d)(3)(C).   Section 1.861-12T(e) indicates that certain holders of portfolio securitiesthat generate foreign source dividends or interest may take into accountthe source of gain on the disposition of such securities. These holdersinclude holders in whose hands the securities constitute inventory andholders 80 percent of whose gross income from such securities consistsof gains.   Section 1.861-12T(f) provides that, in the case of any asset in connectionwith which interest expense is capitalized, deferred, or disallowed underany provision, the adjusted basis or fair market value (depending on thetaxpayer's choice of apportionment methods) of such an asset shall be reduced.  Section 1.861-12T(g) provides rules concerning the treatment of stock ina foreign sales corporation and the characterization assets that generateforeign trade income. Stock of a foreign sales corporation (``FSC'') isgenerally not taken into account in apportionment of interest for foreigntax credit purposes. Because the assets of a FSC are taken into accountfully in apportioning for purposes of computing FSC benefits, the Servicebelieves there should be no secondary apportionment to FSC stock for foreigntax credit purposes.   Section 1.861-12T(j) provides rules concerning the treatment of stock ina domestic international sales corporation and the characterization ofassets that generate qualified export receipts.   Section 1.861-13T (relating to transition rules) has been reserved dueto the fact the transition rules for interest allocation contained in thetechnical corrections bill (H.R. 4333) has not yet been enacted. The Serviceanticipates that upon enactment of these transition rules, andSection;1.861-13Twill be issued in a form that is substantially similar to Prop. Reg. andSection;1.861-11(52 FR 34600). The primary anticipated changes in those regulations concern:  (1) The addition of a rule to clarify that, in computing the various transitionamounts under Prop. Reg. andSection;andSection;1.861-11(b) and (c), any indebtednessthe interest on which is directly allocated to identified property underandSection;1.861-8(e)(2)(iv) shall not be taken into account,   (2) The incorporation of a rule regarding the averaging of end-of-monthdebt levels in Prop. Reg. andSection;1.861-11(c)(7) for the purpose of computingthe amount of a paydown,   (3) The modification of the rule of Prop. Reg. andSection;1.861-11(g) toprovide for the proration of transition attributes between a transferorand a transferee in the year of transfer, and   (4) The revision of Prop. Reg. andSection;1.861-11(g)(3) to provide that,when a transferee acquires stock of a corporation and the transferee orany member of its affiliated group assumes the transition qualified indebtednessof an acquired corporation, such indebtedness will continue to be transitionqualified until such time as the transferee disposes of the acquired corporation,but shall thereafter cease to be transition qualified.   The regulations also amend andSection;1.863-3(b), <T3>Example </T3>2. That example formerly provided that, in cases in whicha taxpayer appropriately uses it for the computation of income from certainsales of personal property derived partly from within and partly from withoutthe United States, taxable income shall first be computed by deductingfrom the gross income derived from the sale of personal property the expenses,losses, or other deductions properly allocated and apportioned theretoin accordance with the rules set forth in andSection;1.861-8. The amountof taxable income is then split between domestic and foreign sources basedon fractions described in paragraph (ii) of that example. Changes to thissection indicate that, while the fractions are unchanged, the income derivedfrom such sales and assets generating such income are to be split priorto the allocation and apportionment of expenses to gross income in orderto avoid complication in the apportionment of interest and other expensesdefinitely related to all income. No other change to the provisions ofthis example is intended. Thus, for purposes of <T3>Example </T3>2, expenses that are allocable to the generation of section863(b) income cannot be directly allocated to either the foreign or domesticportion thereof but remain equally allocable to both.   <T3>Affiliated Group Allocation and Apportionment of Expenses Other ThanInterest     </T3>Section 1.861-14T describes the operation of section 864(e)(6), which requiresthe affiliated group allocation and apportionment of expenses, other thaninterest, which are not directly allocable and apportionable to any specificincome producing activity or property. Section 1.861-14T(a) outlines thecontents of andSection;1.861-14T and provides that andSection;1.861-14T appliesin general to taxable years beginning after December 31, 1986. Section1.864-14T(b) describes the operative sections to which section 864(e)(6)applies. These are the computation of foreign source taxable income forpurposes of section 904 (relating to various limitations on the foreigntax credit), the computation of the combined taxable income of the relatedsupplier and a foreign sales corporation (FSC) (under sections 921 through927) or a domestic international sales corporation (DISC) (under sections991 through 997), and the application of section 907 for purposes of determiningreductions in the amount allowed as a foreign tax credit under section901. Section 864(e)(6) does not apply to the computation of subpart F incomeof controlled foreign corporations (under sections 951 through 964) orthe computation of effectively connected taxable income of foreign corporations.The application of section 864(e)(6) in connection with section 936 corporationsis reserved.Section 1.861-14T(c) states that the taxable income of each member of anaffiliated group shall be determined by allocating and apportioning theexpenses described in andSection; 1.861-14T(e) of each member according toapportionment fractions which are computed as if all members of such groupwere a single corporation. For this purpose, interaffiliate transactionsare eliminated. In cases in which an asset method of apportionment is used,stock in affiliated corporations is not taken into account and loans betweenmembers of the affiliated group are treated in accordance with andSection;1.861-11T(e). In the case of an affiliated group that files a consolidatedreturn, consolidated foreign tax credit limitations are computed for thegroup in accordance with the rules of andSection; 1.1502-4. A special ruleis provided in the case of expenses incurred by one member of an affiliatedgroup that relate to the gross income of some, but not all, other membersof the affiliated group. Such expenses are to be apportioned only on thebasis of apportionment factors derived from the member incurring such expensesand from those other members to which the expense relates. In other words,only such members (and not all members) are treated as a single taxpayerfor purposes of apportionment of such expense. In addition, paragraph (c)makes clear that, if section 482 is applied, adjustment of income and expenseamong members of the group pursuant to section 482 is to be made priorto the allocation and apportionment of expenses under the rule of paragraph(c). Section 1.861-14T(d) defines the term ``affiliated group'' to have thesame meaning as is given that term by section 1504, except that section1504(b)(4) is inapplicable. Because section 1504(b)(4) is inapplicable,section 936 corporations are included within the affiliated group for purposesof computing the apportionment fractions applicable to expenses of othermembers of the group. In addition, financial corporations, which are treatedas a separate affiliated group for purposes of the allocation and apportionmentof interest expense under section 864(e)(5) and andSection; 1.861-11T(d),are included within the affiliated group for purposes of the allocationand apportionment of expenses other than interest. Life insurance companiestaxable under section 801 are included in an affiliated group consistingin part of other companies only if an election is made under section 1504(c)(2)(A).Section 1.861-14T(e) describes the expenses that are subject to allocationand apportionment under the rules of paragraph (c). In general, the expensesto which paragraph (c) relates do not include interest expense or any otherexpense which is directly allocable to specific income producing activitiesor property of the member of the affiliated group that incurred the expense.An expense is considered to be directly allocable to specific income producingactivities or property of the member incurring the expense if, taking intoaccount the income of all members of the affiliated group, the expenseis considered definitely related within the meaning of andSection; 1.861-8(b)(2)solely to gross income derived by the member incurring the expense. Thus,the rules of paragraph (c) apply to the expenses of supportive functions,such as general and administrative expenses, to certain research and experimentalexpenses (not subject to allocation to U.S. sources under the statutorymoratorium), to certain stewardship expenses, and to certain generalizedlegal and accounting expenses. Proposed legislation currently under considerationby Congress may affect the treatment of research and experimental expensesunder this proposed regulation. This proposed regulation will be changed,if necessary, to conform to that legislation upon its enactment. Section 1.861-14T(f) provides that the combined taxable income of a FSCor DISC and its related supplier shall be reduced by the portion of theexpenses of the affiliated group described in paragraph (e) that is incurredin connection with export sales involving that FSC or DISC. Under thisrule, expenses of other group members may be attributed to the combinedtaxable income of a FSC or DISC and its related supplier without affectingthe amount of expenses otherwise deductible (other than any commissionpayable by the related supplier to the FSC or DISC) by the FSC, DISC, relatedsupplier, and other members of the affiliated group. The FSC or DISC isentitled to its statutory portion of the combined taxable income, afterreduction by any apportioned group expense, for purposes of determiningthe transfer price of export property sold by the related supplier to abuy-sell FSC or DISC or the commission paid by the related supplier toa commission FSC or DISC. Section 1.861-14T(g), by incorporating by cross-reference the rules ofproposed andSection; 1.861-11T(g), addresses the problem of losses createdthrough affiliated group apportionment in the case of an affiliated groupthat could, but does not, file a consolidated return. Generally, andSection;1.1502-4 of the regulations provides for consolidated determinations offoreign tax credit limitations in the case of an affiliated group filinga consolidated return. In the case of an affiliated group that does notfile a consolidated return, the amount of foreign tax credits allowed inany separate limitation category cannot exceed the credits computed asrequired by paragraph (g). In general, paragraph (g) requires adjustmentsto eliminate losses in a limitation category created through the apportionmentof expense and correspondingly reduces income of other group members thathave income in the same limitation category. Section 1.861-14T(h) provides special rules concerning the allocation ofreserve expenses of a life insurance company. Section 1.861-14T(j) provides examples illustrating the application ofthe rules of this section. <ITAG tagnum="84">Special Analyses </ITAG>It has been determined that these rules are not major rules as definedin Executive Order 12291. Therefore, a Regulatory Impact Analysis is notrequired. A general notice of proposed rulemaking is not required by 5U.S.C. andSection; 553 for temporary regulations. Therefore, these rulesdo not constitute regulations subject to the Regulatory Flexibility Act(5 U.S.C. Chapter 6) and a Regulatory Flexibility Analysis is not required.<ITAG tagnum="84">Drafting Information </ITAG>The principal author of the regulations relating to the allocation andapportionment of interest expense is David Merrick, and the principal authorof the regulations relating to the allocation and apportionment of certainexpenses other than interest is Carl Cooper, both of the Office of theAssociate Chief Counsel (International), within the Office of Chief Counsel,Internal Revenue Service. However, other personnel from offices of theInternal Revenue Service and the Treasury Department participated in developingthe regulations. <ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects </ITAG>26 CFR 1.861-1 to 1.997-1 Income taxes, Aliens, Exports, DISC, Foreign investment in U.S., Foreigntax credit, FSC, Source of income, United States investments abroad. 26 CFR Part 602 Reporting and recordkeeping requirements. Adoption of Amendments to the Regulations Accordingly, 26 CFR Parts 1, 602, and Subchapter G is amended as follows:<ITAG tagnum="84">Income Tax Regulations </ITAG><T4>Paragraph 1.</T4> The authority for Part 1 is amended by adding thefollowing citations:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> 26 U.S.C. 7805.  * * * Sections 1.861-8T through 1.861-14Talso issued under 26 U.S.C. 863(a), 26 U.S.C. 864(e), 26 U.S.C. 865(i)and 26 U.S.C. 7701(f).</ITAG><T4>Par. 2.</T4> Section 1.861-8 is amended as follows: 1. By removing the last sentence of andSection; 1.861-8(a)(2), 2. By revising paragraph (b)(3), 3. By redesignating existing paragraph (c)(2) as paragraph (c)(3) and addinga new paragraph (c)(2), 4. By revising paragraphs (c)(1), (d)(2), and (f)(1)(iii), 5. By removing <T3>Examples</T3> (1) and (2) of paragraph (g) and reserving those examples,and 6. By revising <T3>Example</T3> (24) of paragraph (g). <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1.861-8 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Computation of taxable income from sources within the United Statesand from other sources and activities. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(b) <T3>Allocation.</T3> <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(3) <T3>Supportive functions.</T3> [Reserved] For guidance, see andSection; 1.861-8T(b)(3).<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(c) <T3>Apportionment of deductions</T3>_(1) <T3>Deductions definitely related to a class of gross income. </T3>[Reserved]For guidance, see andSection; 1.861-8T(c)(1). (2) <T3>Apportionment based on assets.</T3> [Reserved] For guidance, see andSection;1.861-8T(c)(2). <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(d) <T3>Excess of deductions and excluded and eliminated income.</T3> <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(2) <T3>Allocation and apportionment to exempt, excluded, or eliminated income.</T3>[Reserved] For guidance, see andSection; 1.861-8T(d)(2). (e) <T3>Allocation and apportionment of certain deductions.</T3> <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(2) <T3>Interest.</T3> [Reserved] For guidance, see andSection; 1.861-8T(e)(2).<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(f) <T3>Miscellaneous matters</T3>_(1) <T3>Operative sections.</T3> <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(iii) <T3>DISC taxable income.</T3> [Reserved] For guidance, see andSection; 1.861-8T(f)(1)(iii).<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(g) <T3>General examples.</T3> <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG><T3>Examle (1).</T3> [Reserved] <T3>Examle (2).</T3> [Reserved] <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG><T3>Example (24).</T3> [Reserved] For guidance, see andSection; 1.861-8T(g)<T3>Example</T3> 24. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG><T4>Par. 3. </T4>A new andSection; 1.861-8T is added immediately after andSection;1.861-8 to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1.861-8T</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Computation of taxable income from sources within the United Statesand from other sources and activities. (Temporary).</ITAG>(a) <T3>In general.</T3>(1) [Reserved](2) <T3>Allocation and apportionment of deductions in general</T3>. If an affiliatedgroup of corporations joins in filing a consolidated return under section1501, the provisions of this section are to be applied separately to eachmember in that affiliated group for purposes of determining such member'staxable income, except to the extent that expenses, losses, and other deductionsare allocated and apportioned as if all domestic members of an affiliatedgroup were a single corporation under section 864(e) and the regulationsthereunder. See andSection; 1.861-9T through andSection; 1.861-11T for rulesregarding the affiliated group allocation and apportionment of interestexpense, and andSection; 1.861-14T for rules regarding the affiliated groupallocation and apportionment of expenses other than interest.(3) through (5) [Reserved](b) <T3>Allocation.</T3>(1) and (2) [Reserved](3) <T3>Supportive functions. </T3>Deductions which are supportive in nature(such as overhead, general and administrative, and supervisory expenses)may relate to other deductions which can more readily be allocated to grossincome. In such instance, such supportive deductions may be allocated andapportioned along with the deductions to which they relate. On the otherhand, it would be equally acceptable to attribute supportive deductionson some reasonable basis directly to activities or property which generate,have generated, or could be reasonably expected to generate gross income.This would ordinarily be accomplished by allocating the supportive expensesto all gross income or to another broad class of gross income and apportioningthe expenses in accordance with paragraph (c)(1) of this section. For thispurpose, reasonable departmental overhead rates may be utilized. For examplesof the application of the principles of this paragraph (b)(3) other thanto expenses attributable to stewardship activities, see examples (19) through(21) of paragraph (g) of this section. See paragraph (e)(4) of this sectionfor the allocation and apportionment of deductions attributable to stewardshipactivities. However, supportive deductions that are described in andSection;1.861-14T(e)(3) shall be allocated and apportioned in accordance with therules of andSection; 1.1861-14T and shall not be allocated and apportionedby reference only to the gross income of a single member of an affiliatedgroup of corporations as defined in andSection; 1.861-14T(d).(4) and (5) [Reserved](c) <T3>Apportionment of deductions</T3>_(1) <T3>Deductions definitely related to a class of gross income. </T3>Wherea deduction has been allocated in accordance with paragraph (b) of thissection to a class of gross income which is included in one statutory groupingand the residual grouping, the deduction must be apportioned between thestatutory grouping and the residual grouping. Where a deduction has beenallocated to a class of gross income which is included in more than onestatutory grouping, such deduction must be apportioned among the statutorygroupings and, where necessary, the residual grouping. Thus, in determiningthe separate limitations on the foreign tax credit imposed by section 904(d)(1)or by section 907, the income within a separate limitation category constitutesa statutory grouping of income and all other income not within that separatelimitation category (whether domestic or within a different separate limitationcategory) constitutes the residual grouping. In this regard, the same methodof apportionment must be used in apportioning a deduction to each separatelimitation category. Also, see paragraph (f)(1)(iii) of this section withrespect to the apportionment of deductions among the statutory groupingsdesignated in section 904(d)(1). If the class of gross income to whicha deduction has been allocated consists entirely of a single statutorygrouping or the residual grouping, there is no need to apportion that deduction.If a deduction is not definitely related to any gross income, it must beapportioned ratably as provided in paragraph (c)(3) of this section. Adeduction is apportioned by attributing the deduction to gross income (withinthe class to which the deduction has been allocated) which is in one ormore statutory groupings and to gross income (within the class) which isin the residual grouping. Such attribution must be accomplished in a mannerwhich reflects to a reasonably close extent the factual relationship betweenthe deduction and the grouping of gross income. In apportioning deductions,it may be that for the taxable year there is no gross income in the statutorygrouping or that deductions will exceed the amount of gross income in thestatutory grouping. See paragraph (d)(1) of this section with respect tocases in which deductions exceed gross income. In determining the methodof apportionment for a specific deduction, examples of bases and factorswhich should be considered include, but are not limited to_(i) Comparison of units sold,(ii) Comparison of the amount of gross sales or receipts,(iii) Comparison of costs of goods sold,(iv) Comparison of profit contribution,(v) Comparison of expenses incurred, assets used, salaries paid, spaceutilized, and time spent which are attributable to the activities or propertiesgiving rise to the class of gross income, and(iv) Comparison of the amount of gross income.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">Paragraph (e) (2) through (8) of this section provides the applicablerules for allocation and apportionment of deductions for interest, researchand development expenses, and certain other deductions. The effects ontax liability of the apportionment of deductions and the burden of maintainingrecords not otherwise maintained and making computations not otherwisemade shall be taken into consideration in determining whether a methodof apportionment and its application are sufficiently precise. A methodof apportionment described in this paragraph (c)(1) may not be used whenit does not reflect, to a reasonably close extent, the factual relationshipbetween the deduction and the groupings of income. Furthermore, certainmethods of apportionment described in this paragraph (c)(1) may not beused in connection with any deduction for which another method is prescribed.The principles set forth above are applicable in apportioning both deductionsdefinitely related to a class which constitutes less than all of the taxpayer'sgross income and to deductions related to all of the taxpayer's gross income.If a deduction is not related to any class of gross income, it must beapportioned ratably as provided in paragraph (c)(3) of this section.(2) <T3>Apportionment based on assets. </T3>Certain taxpayers are requiredby paragraph (e)(2) of this section and andSection; 1.861-9T to apportioninterest expense on the basis of assets. A taxpayer may apportion otherdeductions based on the comparative value of assets that generate incomewithin each grouping, provided that such method reflects the factual relationshipbetween the deduction and the groupings of income and is applied in accordancewith the rules of andSection; 1.861-9T(g). In general, such apportionmentsmust be made either on the basis of the tax book value of those assetsor on their fair market value. However, once the taxpayer uses fair marketvalue, the taxpayer and all related persons must continue to use such methodunless expressly authorized by the Commissioner to change methods. Forpurposes of this paragraph (c)(2) the term ``related persons'' means twoor more persons in a relationship described in section 267(b). In determiningwhether two or more corporations are members of same controlled group undersection 267(b)(3), a person is considered to own stock owned directly bysuch person, stock owned with the application of section 1563(e)(1), andstock owned by the application of section 267(c). In determining whethera corporation is related to a partnership under section 267(b)(10), a personis considered to own the partnership interest owned directly by such personand the partnership interest owned with the application of section 267(e)(3).In the case of any corporate taxpayer that_(i) Uses tax book value, and(ii) Owns directly or indirectly (within the meaning of andSection; 1.861-11T(b)(2)(ii))10 percent or more of the total combined voting power of all classes ofstock entitled to vote in any other corporation (domestic or foreign) thatis not a member of the affiliated group (as defined in section 864(e)(5)),such taxpayer shall adjust its basis in that stock in the manner describedin andSection; 1.861-11T(b).(3) [Reserved](d) <T3>Excess of deductions and excluded and eliminated items of income.</T3>(1) [Reserved](2) <T3>Allocation and apportionment to exempt, excluded or eliminated income</T3>_(i)<T3>In general. </T3>In the case of taxable years beginning after December31, 1986, except to the extent otherwise permitted by andSection; 1.861-13T,the following rules shall apply to take account of income that is exemptof excluded, or assets generating such income, with respect to allocationand apportionment of deductions.(A) <T3>Allocation of deductions. </T3>In allocating deductions that are definitelyrelated to one or more classes of gross income, exempt income (as definedin paragraph (d)(2)(ii) of this section) shall be taken into account.(B) <T3>Apportionment of deductions. </T3>In apportioning deductions that aredefinitely related either to a class of gross income consisting of multiplegroupings of income (whether statutory or residual) or to all gross income,exempt income and exempt assets (as defined in paragraph (d)(2)(ii) ofthis section) shall not be taken into account.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">For purposes of apportioning deductions which are not taken into accountunder andSection; 1.1502-13(c)(2) in determining gain or loss from deferredintercompany transactions, as defined in andSection; 1.1502-13(a)(2), incomefrom such transactions shall be taken into account in the year such incomeis ultimately included in gross income.(ii) <T3>Exempt income and exempt assest defined</T3>_(A) <T3>In general. </T3>For purposes of this section, the term ``exempt income''means any income that is, in whole or in part, exempt, excluded, or eliminatedfor federal income tax purposes. The term ``exempt asset'' means any assetthe income from which is, in whole or in part, exempt, excluded, or eliminatedfor federal tax purposes.(B) <T3>Certain stock and dividends. </T3>The term ``exempt income'' includesthe portion of the dividends that are deductible under_(<T3>1</T3>) Section 243(a) (1) or (2) (relating to the dividends receiveddeduction), (<T3>2</T3>) Section 245(a) (relating to the dividends received deductionfor dividends from certain foreign corporations).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">Thus, for purposes of apportioning deductions using a gross incomemethod, gross income would not include a dividend to the extent that itgives rise to a dividend received deduction under either section 243(a)(1),section 243(a)(2), or section 245(a). In the case of a life insurance companytaxable under section 801, the amount of such stock that is treated astax exempt shall not be reduced because a portion of the dividends receiveddeduction is disallowed as attributable to the policyholder's share ofsuch dividends. See andSection; 1.861-14T(h) for a special rule concerningthe allocation of reserve expenses of a life insurance company. In addition,for purposes of apportioning deductions using an asset method, assets wouldnot include that portion of stock equal to the portion of dividends paidthereon that would be deductible under either section 243(a)(1), section243(a)(2), or section 245(a). In the case of stock which generates, hasgenerated, or can reasonably be expected to generate qualifying dividendsdeductible under section 243(a)(3), such stock shall not constitute a taxexempt asset. Such stock and the dividends thereon will, however, be eliminatedfrom consideration in the apportionment of interest expense under the consolidationrule set forth in andSection; 1.861-10T(c), and in the apportionment of otherexpenses under the consolidation rules set forth in andSection; 1.861-14T.(iii) <T3>Income that is not considered tax exempt. </T3>The following itemsare not considered to be exempt, eliminated, or excluded income and, thus,may have expenses, losses, or other deductions allocated and apportionedto them: (A) In the case of a foreign taxpayer (including a foreign sales corporation(FSC)) computing its effectively connected income, gross income (whetherdomestic or foreign source) which is not effectively connected to the conductof a United States trade or business; (B) In computing the combined taxable income of a DISC or FSC and its relatedsupplier, the gross income of a DICS or a FSC; (C) For all purposes under subchapter N of the Code, Including the computationof combined taxable income of a possessions corporation and its affiliatesunder section 936(h), the gross income of a possessions corporation forwhich a credit is allowed under section 936(a); and(D) Foreign earned income as defined in section 911 and the regulationsthereunder (however, the rules of andSection; 1.911-6 do not require theallocation and apportionment of certain deductions, including home mortgageinterest, to foreign earned income for purposes of determining the deductionsdisallowed under section 911(d)(6)). (iv) <T3>Prior years. </T3>For expense allocation and apportionment rules applicableto taxable years beginning before January 1, 1987, and for later yearsto the extent permitted by andSection; 1.861-13T, see andSection; 1.861-8(d)(2)(Revised as of April 1, 1986). (e) <T3>Allocation and apportionment of certain deductions. </T3>(1) [Reserved](2) <T3>Interest. </T3>The rules concerning the allocation and apportionmentof interest expense and certain interest equivalents are set forth in andSection;andSection;1.861-9Tthrough 1.861-13T.(3) through (11) [Reserved](f) <T3>Miscellaneous matters</T3>_(1) <T3>Operative sections.</T3>(1) through (1)(ii) [Reserved](iii) <T3>Separate limitations to the foreign tax credit. </T3>Section 904(d)(1)requires that the foreign tax credit limitation be determined separatelyin the case of the types of income specified therein. Accordingly, theincome within each separate limitation category constitutes a statutorygrouping of income and all other income not within that separate limitationcategory (whether domestic or within a different separate limitation category)constitutes the residual groups.(f) (1)(iv) through (5) [Reserved](g) <T3>General examples.</T3><ITAG tagnum="21">Examples <T3>(1) through (23). </T3>[Reserved]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (24)</T3>_<T3>Exempt, excluded, or eliminated income</T3>_(i) <T3>Income method</T3>_(A) <T3>Facts. </T3>X, a domestic corporation organized on January 1, 1987,is engaged in a number of businesses worldwide. X owns a 25-percent votinginterest in each of five corporations engaged in the business A, two ofwhich are domestic and three of which are foreign. X incurs stewardshipexpenses in connection with these five stock investments in the amountof $100. X apportions its stewardship expenses using a gross income method.Each of the five companies pays a dividend in the amount of $100. X isentitled to claim the 80-percent dividends received deduction on dividendspaid by the two domestic companies. Because tax exempt income is consideredin the allocation of deductions, X's $100 stewardship expense is allocatedto the class of income consisting of dividends from business A companies.However, because tax exempt income is not considered in the apportionmentof deductions within a class of gross income, the gross income of the twodomestic companies must be reduced to reflect the availability of the dividendsreceived deduction. Thus, for purposes of apportionment, the gross incomepaid by the three foreign companies is considered to be $100 each, whilethe gross income paid by the domestic companies is considered to be $20each. Accordingly, X has total gross income from business A companies,for purposes of apportionment, of $340. As a result, $29.41 of X's stewardshipexpense is apportioned to each of the foreign companies and $5.88 of X'sstewardship expense is apportioned to each of the domestic companies.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) <T3>Asset method</T3>_(A) <T3>Facts. </T3>X, a domestic corporation organized on January 1, 1987,carries on a trade or business in the United States. X has deductible interestexpense incurred in 1987 of $60,000. X owns all the stock of Y, a foreigncorporation. X also owns 49 percent of the voting stock of Z, a domesticcorporation. Neither Y nor Z has retained earnings and profits at the endof 1987. X apportions its interest expense on the basis of the fair marketvalue of its assets. X has assets worth $1,500,000 that generate domesticsource income, among which are tax exempt municipal bonds worth $100,000,and the stock of Z, which has a value of $500,000. The Y stock owned byX has a fair market value of $2,000,000 and generates solely foreign sourcegeneral limitation income.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(B) <T3>Allocation. </T3>No portion of X's interest expense is directly allocablesolely to identified property within the meaning of andSection; 1.861-1OT.Thus, X's deduction for interest is definitely related to all its grossincome as a class.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(C) <T3>Apportionment. </T3>For purposes of apportioning expenses, assets thatgenerate exempt, eliminated, or excluded income are not taken into account.Because X's municipal bonds are tax exempt, they are not taken into accountin apportioning interest expense. Since X is entitled to claim under section243 to 80-percent dividends received deduction with respect to the dividendit received from Z, 80 percent of the value of that stock is not takeninto account as an asset for purposes of apportionment under the assetmethod. X apportions its interest deduction between the statutory groupingof foreign source general limitation income and the residual grouping ofdomestic source income as follows:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">To foreign source general limitation income:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>3,L1(0,0,0),b1,tp0,p8,8/1,g1,t1,i1,xs36,2,r20</C> <H1>Interest expense</H1><H1>andmultiply;</H1><H1>General limitation assets that are not tax exempt</H1><H2>Worldwide assets that are not tax exempt</H2><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>7,L1(0,0,0),b1,tp0,p8,8/1,g1,t1,i1,s100,7,2,32,2,7,r100</C> <H1> </H1><H1>$60,000</H1><H1>andmultiply;</H1><H1>$2,000,000</H1><H2>($100,000+$900,000+$2,000,000)</H2><H1>=</H1><H1>$40,000</H1><H1> </H1><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>5,L1(0,0,0),b1,tp0,p8,8/1,g1,t1,i1,s10,2,r10,2,r10</C> <H1>Nonexempt foreign assets</H1><H2>20 percent of Z stock value</H2><H2>+</H2><H2>Nonexempt domestic assets</H2><H2>+</H2><H2>Nonexempt foreign assets</H2><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">To domestic source income:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>3,L1(0,0,0),b1,tp0,p8,8/1,g1,t1,i1,xs36,2,r20</C> <H1>Interest expense</H1><H1>andmultiply;</H1><H1>Domestic assets that are not tax exempt</H1><H2>Worldwide assets that are not tax exempt</H2><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG></ITAG> <ITAG tagnum="110"><C>7,L1(0,0,0),b1,tp0,p8,8/1,g1,t1,i1,s100,7,2,32,2,7,r100</C> <H1> </H1><H1>$60,000</H1><H1>andmultiply;</H1><H1>$100,000+$900,000</H1><H2>($100,000+$900,000+$2,000,000)</H2><H1>=</H1><H1>$20,000</H1><H1> </H1><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>5,L1(0,0,0),b1,tp0,p8,8/1,g1,t1,i1,s10,2,r10,2,r10</C> <H1>20 percent of Z stock value+nonexempt domestic assets</H1><H2>20 percent of Z stock value</H2><H2>+</H2><H2>Nonexempt domestic assets</H2><H2>+</H2><H2>Nonexempt foreign assets</H2><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26"><T3>Example (25) and (26). </T3>[Reserved]</ITAG>(h) <T3>Effective dates. </T3>In general, the rules of this section, as wellas the rules of andSection;andSection; 1.861-9T, 1.861-10T, 1.861-11T, 1.861-12T,and 1.861-14T shall apply for taxable years beginning after December 31,1986. In the case of corporate taxpayers, transition rules set forth inandSection; 1.861-13T provide for the gradual phase-in of certain the provisionsof this and the foregoing sections. However, the following rules are effectivefor taxable years commencing after December 31, 1988:(1) Section 1.861-9T(b)(2) (concerning the treatment of certain foreigncurrency borrowings),(2) Section 1.861-9T(d)(2) (concerning the treatment of interest incurredby nonresident aliens),(3) Section 1.861-10T(b)(3)(ii) (providing an operating costs test forpurposes of the nonrecourse indebtedness exception), and(4) Section 1.861-10T(b)(6) (concerning excess collaterilization of nonrecourseborrowings).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">In addition, andSection; 1.861-10T(e) (concerning the treatment of relatedcontrolled foreign corporation indebtedness) is effective for taxable yearscommencing after December 31, 1987. For rules for taxable years beginningbefore January 1, 1987, and for later years to the extent permitted byandSection; 1.861-13T, see andSection; 1.861-8 (Revised as of April 1, 1986).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;andSection; 1.861-9 and 1.861-9A [Redesignated as andSection;andSection;1.861-15 and 1.861-16 respectively]</ITAG><T4>Par. 4. </T4>Sections 1.861-9 and 1.861-9A are redesignated as andSection;andSection;1.861-15 and 1.861-16, respectively.<T4>Par. 5. </T4>The following new andSection;andSection; 1.861-9T, 1.861-10T,1.861-11T, 1.861-12T and 1.861-14T are added immediately after andSection;1.861-8T and andSection; 1.861-13T is added and reserved to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1.861-9T</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Allocation and apportionment of interest expense (Temporary regulations).</ITAG>(a) <T3>In general. </T3>Any expense that is deductible under section 163 (includingoriginal issue discount) constitutes interest expense for purposes of thissection, as well as for purposes of andSection;andSection; 1.861-10T, 1.861-11T,1.861-12T, and 1.861-13T. The term interest refers to the gross amountof interest expense incurred by a taxpayer in a given tax year. The methodof allocation and apportionment for interest set forth in this sectionis based on the approach that, in general, money is fungible and that interestexpense is attributable to all activities and property regardless of anyspecific purpose for incurring an obligation on which interest is paid.Exceptions to the fungibility rule are set forth in andSection; 1.861-10T.The fungibility approach recognizes that all activities and property requirefunds and that management has a great deal of flexibility as to the sourceand use of funds. When borrowing will generally free other funds for otherpurposes, and it is reasonable under this approach to attribute part ofthe cost of borrowing to such other purposes. Consistent with the principlesof fungibility, except as otherwise provided, the aggregate of deductionsfor interest in all cases shall be considered related to all income producingactivities and assets of the taxpayer and, thus, allocable to all the grossincome which the assets of the taxpayer generate, have generated, or couldreasonably have been expected to generate. In the case of the interestexpense of members of an affiliated group, interest expense shall be consideredto be allocable to all gross income of the members of the group under andSection;1.861-11T. That section requires the members of an affiliated group toallocate and apportion the interest expense of each member of the groupas if all members of such group were a single corporation. For the methodof determining the interest deduction allowed to foreign corporations undersection 882(c), see andSection; 1.882-5.(b) <T3>Interest equivalents</T3>_(1) <T3>Certain expenses and losses. </T3>Any expense or loss (to the extentdeductible) incurred in a transaction or series of integrated or relatedtransactions in which the taxpayer secures the use of funds for a periodshall be subject to allocation and apportionment under the rules of thissection if such expense or loss is substantially incurred in considerationof the time value of money. However, the allocation and apportionment ofa loss under this paragraph (b) shall not affect the characterization ofsuch loss as capital or ordinary for other purposes of the Code and theregulations therunder. The rule of this paragraph (b)(1) may be illustratedby the following example.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example. </T3>W, a domestic corporation, borrows from X two ouncesof gold at a time when the spot price for gold is $500 per ounce. W agreesto return the two ounces of gold in six months. W sells the two ouncesof gold to Y for $1000. W then enters into a contract with Z to purchasetwo ounces of gold six months in the future for $1,050. In exchange forthe use of $1,000 in cash, W has sustained a loss of $50 on related transactions.This loss is subject to allocation and apportionment under the rules ofthis section in the same manner as interest expense.</ITAG>(2) <T3>Certain foreign currency borrowings</T3>_(i) <T3>Rule. </T3>If a taxpayer borrows in a nonfunctional currency at a rateof interest that is less than the applicable federal rate (or its equivalentin functional currency if the functional currency is not the dollar), anyswap, forward, future, option, or similar financial arrangement (or anycombination thereof) entered into by the taxpayer or by a related person(as defined in andSection; 1.861-8T(c)(2)) that exists during the term ofthe borrowing and that substantially diminishes currency risk with respectto the borrowing or interest expense thereon will be presumed to constitutea hedge of such borrowing, unless the taxpayer can demonstrate on the basisof facts and circumstances that the two transactions are in fact unrelated.Under this presumption, the currency loss incurred on the borrowing duringtaxable years beginning after December 31, 1988, in connection with hedgednonfunctional currency borrowings, reduced or increased by the gain orloss on the hedge, will be apportioned in the same manner as interest expense.This presumption can be rebutted by a showing that the financial arrangementwas entered into in connection with hedging currency exposure arising inthe ordinary course of a trade or business (other than with respect tothe borrowing).(ii) <T3>Examples. </T3>The principles of this paragraph (b)(2) may be illustratedby the following examples.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (1). </T3>Taxpayer has a dollar functional currency and doesnot have any qualified business units with a functional currency otherthan the dollar. On January 1, 1989, when the unit of foreign currencyis worth $1, taxpayer borrows 100 units of foreign currency for a three-yearperiod bearing interest at the annual rate of 3 percent and immediatelyconverts the proceeds of the borrowing into dollars for use in its business.In the ordinary course of its business, taxpayer has no foreign currencyexposure in this currency. In March 1989, taxpayer enters into a three-yearswap agreement that covers most, but not all, of the payment of interestand principal. Because the swap substantially diminishes currency riskwith respect to the borrowing, it is presumed to hedge the loan. Sincetaxpayer cannot demonstrate that it was hedging currency exposure arisingin the ordinary course of its business (other than currency exposure withrespect to the borrowing), the net currency loss on the borrowing adjustedfor any gain or loss on the swap must be apportioned in the same manneras interest expense.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (2). </T3>Assume the same facts as in Example 1, except thatthe taxpayer borrows in two separate foreign currencies on terms describedin Example 1 and enters into a swap agreement in a single currency thatsubstantially diminishes the taxpayer's aggregate foreign currency risk.The net currency loss on the borrowings adjusted for any gain or loss onthe swap must be apportioned in the same manner as interest expense.</ITAG>(3) <T3>Losses on sale of certain receivables</T3>_(1) <T3>General rule.</T3> Any loss on the sale of a trade receivable (as definedin andSection; 1.954-2(h)) shall be allocated and apportioned, solely forpurposes of this section and andSection;andSection; 1.861-10T, 1.861-11T, 1.861-12T,and 1.861-13T, in the same manner as interest expense, unless at the timeof sale of the receivable, it bears interest at a rate which is at least120 percent of the short term applicable federal rate (as determined undersection 1274(d) of the Code), or its equivalent in foreign currency inthe case of receivables denominated in foreign currency, determined atthe time the receivable arises. This treatment shall not affect the characterizationof such expense as interest for other purposes of the Internal RevenueCode.(ii) <T3>Exceptions. </T3>To the extent that a loss on the sale of a trade receivableexceeds the discount on the receivable that would be computed applyingto the amount received on the sale of the receivable 120 percent of theapplicable federal rate (or its equivalent in foreign currency in the caseof receivables denominated in foreign currency) for the period commencingwith the date on which the receivable is sold and ending with the earlierof the date on which the receivable begins to bear interest at such rateor the anticipated payment date of the receivable, such excess shall notbe allocated and apportioned in the same manner as interest expense butrather shall be allocated and apportioned to the gross income generatedby the receivable. In cases of transfers of receivables to a domestic internationalsales corporation described andSection; 1.994-1(c)(6)(v), the rule of thisparagraph (b)(3) shall not apply for purposes of computing combined taxableincome. In computing the combined taxable income of a foreign sales corporationand its related supplier, loss on the sale of receivables to a third partyincurred either by the foreign sales corporation or its related suppliershall offset combined taxable income, notwithstanding the provisions ofthis paragraph (b)(3). See andSection; 1.924(a)-1T(g)(7).<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example. </T3>On October 1, X sells a widget to Y for $100 payablein 30 days, after which the receivable will bear stated interest at 13percent. On October 4, X sells Y's obligation to Z for $98. Assume thatthe applicable federal rate for the month of October is 10 percent. Applying120 percent of the applicable federal rate to the $98 received on the saleof the receivable, the obligation is discounted at a 12 percent rate fora period of 27 days. At this discount rate, the obligation would have soldfor $99.22. Thus, 88 cents of the $2 loss on the sale is apportioned inthe same manner as interest expense, and $1.22 of the $2 loss on the saleis directly allocated to the income generated on the widget sale.</ITAG>(4) <T3>Rent in certain leasing transactions. </T3>[Reserved.](5) <T3>Treatment of bond premium_</T3>(i) <T3>Treatment by the issuer. </T3>If a bond or other debt obligation isissued at a premium, an amount of interest expense incurred by the issueron that bond or other debt obligation equal to the amortized portion ofthat premium that is included in gross income for the year shall be allocatedand apportioned solely to the amortized portion of premium derived by theissuer for the year.(ii) <T3>Treatment by the holder. </T3>If a bond or debt obligation is purchasedat a premium, the portion of that premium amortized during the year bythe holder under section 171 and the regulations thereunder shall be allocatedand apportioned solely to interest income derived from the bond by theholder for the year. (c) <T3>Allowable deductions. </T3>In order for an interest expense to be allocatedand apportioned, it must first be determined that the interest expenseis currently deductible. A number of provisions in the Code disallow orsuspend deductions of interest expense or require the capitalization thereof.(1) <T3>Disallowed deductions. </T3>A taxpayer does not allocate and apportioninterest expense under this section that is permanently disallowed as adeduction by operation of section 163(h), section 265, or any other provisionor rule that permanently disallows the deduction of interest expense.(2) <T3>Section 263A. </T3>Section 263A requires the capitalization of interestexpense that is allocable to designated types of property. Any interestexpense that is capitalized under section 263A does not constitute deductibleinterest expense for purposes of this section. Furthermore, interest expensecapitalized in inventory or depreciable property is not separately allocatedand apportioned when the inventory is sold or depreciation is allowed.Capitalized interest expense is effectively allocated and apportioned aspart of, and in the same manner as, the cost of goods sold, amortization,or depreciation deduction.(3) <T3>Section 163(d). </T3>Section 163(d) suspends the deduction for interestexpense to the extent that it exceeds net investment income. In the yearthat suspended investment interest expense becomes allowable under therules of section 163(d), that interest expense is apportioned under rulesset forth in paragraph (d)(1) of this section as though it were incurredin the taxable year in which the expense is deducted.(4) <T3>Section 469_</T3>(i) <T3>General rule. </T3>Section 469 suspends the deduction of passive activitylosses to the extent that they exceed passive activity income for the year.Passive activity losses may consist in part of interest expense properlyallocable to passive activity. In the year that suspended interest expensebecomes allowable as a deduction under the rules of section 469, that interestexpense is apportioned under rules set forth in paragraph (d)(1) of thissection as though it were incurred in the taxable year in which the expenseis deducted.(ii) <T3>Identification of the interest component of a suspended passive loss.</T3>A suspended passive loss may consist of a variety of items of expenseother than interest expense. Suspended interest expense for any taxableyear is computed by multiplying the total suspended passive loss for theyear by a fraction, the numerator of which is passive interest expensefor the year (determined under regulations issued under section 163) andthe denominator of which is total passive expenses for the year. The amountof the suspended interest expense that is considered to be deductible ina subsequent taxable year is computed by multiplying the amount of anycumulative suspended interest expense (reduced by suspended interest expenseallowed as a deduction in prior taxable years) times a fraction, the numeratorof which is the portion of cumulative suspended passive losses that becomedeductible in the taxable year and the denominator of which is the cumulativesuspended passive losses for prior taxable years (reduced by suspendedpassive losses allowed as deductions in prior taxable years).(iii) <T3>Example. </T3>The rules of this paragraph (c)(4) may be illustratedby the following example.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example. </T3>On January 1, 1987, A, a United States citizen, investedin a passive activity. In 1987, the passive activity generated no passiveincome and $100 in passive losses, all of which were suspended by operationof section 469. The suspended loss included $10 of suspended interest expense.In 1988, the passive activity generated $50 in passive income and $150in passive expenses which included $30 of interest expense. The entire$100 passive loss was suspended in 1988 and included $20 of interest expense($100 suspended passive loss andmultiply; $30 passive interest expense/$150total passive expenses). Thus, at the end of 1988, A had total suspendedpassive losses of $200, including $30 of suspended interest expense. In1989, the passive activity generated $100 in passive income and no passiveexpenses. Thus, $100 of A's cumulative suspended passive loss was thereforeallowed in 1989. The $100 of deductible passive loss includes $15 of suspendedinterest expense ($30 cumulative suspended interest expense andmultiply;$100 of cumulative suspended passive losses allowable in 1989/$200 of totalcumulative suspended passive losses). The $15 of interest expense is apportionedunder the rules of paragraph (d) of this section as though it were incurredin 1989.</ITAG>(d) <T3>Apportionment rules for individuals, estates, and certain trusts_</T3>(1)<T3>United States individuals. </T3>In the case of taxable years beginningafter December 31, 1986, individuals generally shall apportion interestexpense under different rules according to the type of interest expenseincurred. The interest expense of individuals shall be characterized underthe regulations issued under section 163. However, in the case of an individualwhose foreign source income (including income that is excluded under section911) does not exceed a gross amount of $5,000, the apportionment of interestexpense under this section is not required. Such an individual's interestexpense may be allocated entirely to domestic source income.(i) <T3>Interest incurred in the conduct of a trade or business. </T3>An individualwho incurs business interest described in section 163(h)(2)(A) shall apportionsuch interest expense using an asset method by reference to the individual'sbusiness assets.(ii) <T3>Investment interest. </T3>An individual who incurs investment interestdescribed in section 163(h)(2)(B) shall apportion that interest expenseon the basis of the individual's investment assets.(iii) <T3>Interest incurred in a passive activity. </T3>An individual who incurspassive activity interest described in section 163(h)(2)(C) shall apportionthat interest expense on the basis of the individual's passive activityassets. Individuals who receive a distributive share of interest expenseincurred in a partnership are subject to special rules set forth in paragraph(e) of this section.(iv) <T3>Qualified residence and deductible personal interest. </T3>Individualswho incur qualified residence interest described in section 163(h)(2)(D)shall apportion that interest expense under a gross income method, takinginto account all income (including business, passive activity, and investmentincome) but excluding income that is exempt under section 911. For purposesof this section, any qualified residence that is rented shall be consideredto be a business asset for the period in which it is rented, with the resultthat the interest on such a residence is not apportioned under this subdivision(iv) but instead under subdivisions (i) or (iii) of this paragraph (d)(1).To the extent that personal interest described in section 163(h)(2) remainsdeductible under transitional rules, individuals shall apportion such interestexpense in the same manner as qualified residence interest.(v) <T3>Example. </T3>The following example illustrates the principles of thissection.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example</T3>_(i) <T3>Facts. </T3>A is a resident individual taxpayer engaged in the activeconduct of a trade or business, which A operates as a sole proprietor.A's business generates only domestic source income. A's investment portfolioconsists of several less than 10 percent stock investments. Certain stocksin which A's adjusted basis is $40,000 generate domestic source incomeand other stocks in which A's adjusted basis is $60,000 generate foreignsource passive income. In addition, A owns his personal residence, whichis subject to a mortgage in the amount of $100,000. All interest expenseincurred with respect to A's mortgage is qualified residence interest forpurposes of section 163(h)(2)(D). A's other indebtedness consists of abank loan in the amount of $40,000. Under the regulations issued undersection 163(h), it is determined that the proceeds of the $40,000 loanwere divided equally between A's business and his investment portfolio.In 1987, the gross income of A's business, before the apportionment ofinterest expense, was $50,000. A's investment portfolio generated $4,000in domestic source income and $6,000 in foreign source passive income.All of A's debt obligations bear interest at the annual rate of 10 percent.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) <T3>Analysis of business interest. </T3>Under section 163(h) of the Code,$2,000 of A's interest expense is attributable to his business. Under therules of paragraph (d)(1)(i), such interest must be apportioned on thebasis of the business assets. Applying the asset method described in paragraph(g) of this section, it is determined that all of A's business assets generatedomestic income and, therefore, constitute domestic assets. Thus, the $2,000in interest expense on the business loan is allocable to domestic sourceincome.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) <T3>Analysis of investment interest. </T3>Under section 163(h) of the Code,$2,000 of A's interest expense is investment interest. Under the rulesof paragraph (d)(1)(ii) of this section, such interest must be apportionedon the basis of investment assets. Applying the asset method, A's investmentassets consist of stock generating domestic source income with an adjustedbasis of $40,000 and stock generating foreign source passive income withan adjusted basis of $60,000. Thus, 40 percent ($800) of A's investmentinterest is apportioned to domestic source income and 60 percent ($1,200)of A's investment interest is apportioned to foreign source passive incomefor purposes of section 904.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iv) <T3>Analysis of qualified residence interest. </T3>The $10,000 of qualifiedresidence interest expense is apportioned under the rules of paragraph(d)(1)(iv) of this section on the basis of all of A's gross income. A'sgross income consists of $60,000, $54,000 of which is domestic source and$6,000 of which is foreign source passive income. Thus, $9,000 of A's qualifiedresidence interest is apportioned to domestic source income and $1,000of A's qualified residence interest is apportioned to foreign source passiveincome.</ITAG>(2) <T3>Nonresident aliens_</T3>(i) <T3>General rule. </T3>For taxable years beginning on or after January1, 1988, interest expense incurred by a nonresident alien shall be consideredto be connected with income effectively connected with a United Statestrade or business only to the extent that interest expense is incurredwith respect to liabilities that_(A) Are entered on the books and records of the United States trade orbusiness when incurred, or (B) Are secured by assets that generate such effectively connected income.(ii) <T3>Limitations</T3>_(A) <T3>Maximum debt capitalization. </T3>Interest expense incurred by a nonresidentalien is not considered to be connected with effectively connected incometo the extent that it is incurred with respect to liabilities that exceed80 percent of the gross assets of the United States trade or business.(B) <T3>Collateralization by other assets. </T3>Interest expense on indebtednessthat is secured by specific assets (not including the general credit ofthe nonresident alien) other than the assets of the United States tradeor business shall not be considered to be connected with effectively connectedincome.(3) <T3>Estates and trusts. </T3>Estates shall be treated in the same manneras individuals. In the case of a trust that is beneficially owned by individualsand is a complex trust, the trust shall be treated in the same manner asindividuals under the rules of paragraph (d) of this section, except thatno de minimis amount shall apply. In the case of a trust that is beneficiallyowned by one or more corporations, the trust shall be treated either asa partnership or as a corporation depending on how the trust is characterizedunder the rules of section 7701 and the regulations thereunder.(e) <T3>Partnerships_</T3>(1) <T3>In general_aggregate rule. </T3>A partner's distributive share of theinterest expense of a partnership that is directly allocable under andSection;1.861-10T to income from specific partnership property shall be treatedas directly allocable to the income generated by such partnership property.Subject to the exceptions set forth in paragraph (e)(4), a partner's distributiveshare of the interest expense of a partnership that is not directly allocableunder andSection; 1.861-10T generally is considered related to all incomeproducing activities and assets of the partner and shall be subject toapportionment under the rules described in this paragraph. For purposesof this section, a partner's percentage interest in a partnership shallbe determined by reference to the partner's interest in partnership incomefor the year. Similarly, a partner's pro rata share of partnership assetsshall be determined by reference to the partner's interest in partnershipincome for the year.(2) <T3>Corporate partners whose interest in the partnership is 10 percentor more. </T3>A corporate partner shall apportion its distributive shareof partnership interest expense by reference to the partner's assets, includingthe partner's pro rata share of partnership assets, under the rules ofparagraph (f) of this section if the corporate partner's direct and indirectinterest in the partnership (as determined under the attribution rulesof section 318) is 10 percent or more. A corporation using the tax bookvalue method of apportionment shall use the partnership's inside basisin its assets, adjusted to the extent required under andSection; 1.861-10T(d)(2).A corporation using the fair market value method of apportionment shalluse the fair market value of the partnership's assets, adjusted to theextent required under andSection; 1.861-10T(d)(2).(3) <T3>Individual partners who are general partners or who are limited partnerswith an interest in the partnership of 10 percent or more. </T3>An individualpartner is subject to the rules of this paragraph (e)(3) if either theindividual is a general partner or the individual's direct and indirectinterest (as determined under the attribution rules of section 318) inthe partnership is 10 percent or more. The individual shall first classifyhis or her distributive share of partnership interest expense as interestincurred in the active conduct of a trade or business, as passive activityinterest, or as investment interest under regulations issued under sections163 and 469. The individual must then apportion his or her interest expense(including the partner's distributive share of partnership interest expense)under the rules of paragraph (d) of this section. Each such individualpartner shall take into account his or her distributive share of partnershipgross income or pro rata share of the partnership assets in applying suchrules. An individual using the tax book value method of apportionment shalluse the partnership's inside basis in its assets, adjusted to the extentrequired under andSection; 1.861-10T(d)(2). An individual using the fairmarket value method of apportionment shall use the fair market value ofthe partnership's assets, adjusted to the extent required under andSection;1.861-10T(d)(2).(4) <T3>Less than 10 percent limited partners and less than 10 percent corporategeneral partners_entity rule_</T3>(i) <T3>Partnership interest expense. </T3>A limited partner (whether individualor corporate) or corporate general partner whose direct and indirect interest(as determined under the attribution rules of section 318) in the partnershipis less than 10 percent shall directly allocate its distributive shareof partnership interest expense to its distributive share of partnershipgross income. Under andSection; 1.904-7(i)(2) of the regulations, such apartner's distributive share of foreign source income of the partnershipis treated as passive income (subject to the high taxed income exceptionof section 904(d)(2)(F)), except in the case of high withholding tax interestor income from a partnership interest held in the ordinary course of thepartner's active trade or business, as defined in andSection; 1.904-7(i)(2).A partner's distributive share of partnership interest expense (other thanpartnership interest expense that is directly allocated to identified propertyunder andSection; 1.861-10T) shall be apportioned in accordance with thepartner's relative distributive share of gross foreign source income ineach limitation category and of domestic source income from the partnership.To the extent that partnership interest expense is directly allocated underandSection; 1.861-10T, a comparable portion of the income to which such interestexpense is allocated shall be disregarded in determining the partner'srelative distributive share of gross foreign source income in each limitationcategory and domestic source income. The partner's distributive share ofthe interest expense of the partnership that is directly allocable underandSection; 1.861-10T shall be allocated according to the treatment, afterapplication of andSection; 1.904-7(i)(2), of the partner's distributive shareof the income to which the expense is allocated.(ii) <T3>Other interest expense of the partner. </T3>For purposes of apportioningother interest expense of the partner on an asset basis, the partner'sinterest in the partnership, and not the partner's pro rata share of partnershipassets, is considered to be the relevant asset. The value of this assetfor apportionment purposes is either the tax book value or fair marketvalue of the partner's partnership interest, depending on the method ofapportionment used by the taxpayer. This amount of a partner's interestin the partnership is allocated among various limitation categories inthe same manner as partnership interest expense (that is not directly allocableunder andSection;1.861-10T) is apportioned in subdivision (i) of this paragraph(e)(4). If the partner uses the tax book value method of apportionment,the partner's interest in the partnership must be reduced, for this purpose,to the extent that the partner's basis consists of liabilities that aretaken into account under section 752. Under either the tax book value orfair market value method of apportionment, for purposes of this sectiononly, the value of the partner's interest in the partnership must be reducedby the principal amount of any indebtedness of the partner the intereston which is directly allocated to its partnership interest under andSection;1.861-10T.(5) <T3>Tiered partnerships. </T3>If a partnership is a partner in anotherpartnership, the distributive share of interest expense of a lower-tierpartnership that is subject to the rules of paragraph (e)(4) shall notbe reapportioned in the hands of any higher-tier partner. However, thedistributive share of interest expense of lower-tier partnership that issubject to the rules of paragraph (e) (2) or (3) shall be apportioned bythe partner of the higher-tier partnership or by any higher-tier partnershipto which the rules of paragraph (e)(4) apply, taking into account the partner'sindirect pro rata share of the lower-tier partnership's income or assets.<ITAG tagnum="21">(6) <T3>Example</T3>_(i) <T3>Facts. </T3>A, B, and C are partners in a limited partnership. A isa corporate general partner, owns a 5 percent interest in the partnership,and has an adjusted basis in its partnership interest, determined withoutregard to section 752 of the Code, of $5. A's investment in the partnershipis not held in the ordinary course of the taxpayer's active trade or business,as defined in andSection;1.904-7(i)(2). B, a corporate limited partner, ownsa 70 percent interest in the partnership, and has an adjusted basis inits partnership interest, determined without regard to section 752 of theCode, of $70. C is an individual limited partner, owns a 25 percent interestin the partnership, and has an adjusted basis in the partnership interest,determined without regard to section 752 of the Code, of $25. The partners'interests in the profits and losses of the partnership conform to theirrespective interests. None of the interest expense incurred directly byany of the partners is directly allocable to their partnership interestunder andSection;1.861-10T. The ABC partnership's sole assets are two apartmentbuildings, one domestic and the other foreign. The domestic building hasan adjusted inside basis of $600 and the foreign building has an adjustedinside basis of $500. Each of the buildings is subject to a nonrecourseliability in the amount of $500. The ABC partnership's total interest expensefor the taxable year is $120, both nonrecourse liabilities bearing interestat the rate of 12 percent. The indebtedness on the domestic building qualifiesfor direct allocation under the rules of andSection;1.861-10T. The indebtednesson the foreign building does not so qualify. The partnership incurred noforeign taxes. The partnership's gross income for the taxable year is $360,consisting of $100 in foreign source income and $260 in domestic sourceincome. Under andSection;1.752-1(e), the nonrecourse liabilities of the partnershipare allocated among the partners according to their share of the partnershipprofits. Accordingly, the adjusted basis of A, B, and C in their respectivepartnership interests (for other than apportionment purposes) is, respectively,$55, $770, and $275. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) <T3>Determination of the amount of partnership interest expense that issubject to allocation and apportionment. </T3>Interest on the nonrecourseloan on the domestic building is, under andSection;1.861-10T, directly allocableto income from that investment. The interest expense is therefore directlyallocable to domestic income. Interest on the nonrecourse loan on the foreignbuilding is not directly allocable. The interest expense is therefore subjectto allocation and apportionment. Thus, $60 of interest expense is directlyallocable to domestic income and $60 of interest expense is subject toallocation and apportionment. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) <T3>Analysis for Partner A. </T3>A's distributive share of the partnership'sgross income is $18, which consists of $5 in foreign source income and$13 in domestic source income. A's distributive share of the ABC interestexpense is $6, $3 of which is directly allocable to domestic income and$3 of which is subject to apportionment. After direct allocation of qualifyinginterest expense, A's distributive share of the partnership's gross incomeconsists of $5 in foreign source income and $10 in domestic source income.Because A is a less than 10 percent corporate partner, A's distributiveshare of any foreign source partnership income is considered to be passiveincome. Accordingly, in apportioning the $3 of partnership interest expensethat is subject to apportionment on a gross income method, one-third ($1)is apportioned to foreign source passive income and two-thirds ($2) isapportioned to domestic source income. In apportioning its other interestexpense, A uses the tax book value method. A's adjusted basis in A's partnershipinterest ($55) includes A's share of the partnership's liabilities ($50),which are included in basis under section 752. For purposes of apportioningother interest expense, A's adjusted basis in the partnership must be reducedto the extent of such liabilities. Thus, A's adjusted basis in the partnership,for purposes of apportionment, is $5. For the purpose of apportioning A'sother interest expense, this $5 in basis is characterized one-third asa foreign passive asset and two-thirds as a domestic asset, which is theratio determined in paragraph (e)(4)(i). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iv) <T3>Analysis for Partner B. </T3>B's distributive share of the ABC interestexpense is $84, $42 of which is directly allocable to domestic income and$42 of which is subject to apportionment. As a corporate limited partnerwhose interest in the partnership is 10 percent or more, B is subject tothe rules of paragraph (e)(2) and paragraph (f) of this section. Theserules require that a corporate partner apportion its distributive shareof partnership interest expense at the partner level on the asset methoddescribed in paragraph (g) of this section by reference to its corporateassets, which include, for this purpose, 70 percent of the partnership'sassets, adjusted in the manner described in andSection;1.861-10T(e) to reflectdirectly allocable interest expense. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(v) <T3>Analysis for Partner C. </T3>C's distributive share of the ABC interestexpense is $30, $15 of which is directly allocable to domestic income and$15 of which is subject to apportionment. As an individual limited partnerwhose interest in the partnership is 10 percent or more, C is subject tothe rules of paragraph (e)(3) of this section. These rules require thatan individual's share of partnership interest expense be classified underregulations issued under section 163(h) and then apportioned under therules applicable to individuals, which are set forth in paragraph (d) ofthis section. </ITAG>(7) <T3>Foreign partners</T3>_(i) <T3>Foreign corporations. </T3>The rules of this paragraph (e) shall applyto foreign corporations that are partners in partnerships. Any partnershipinterest expense that is deemed to be incurred directly by such a partner,any partnership liabilities that are deemed to be incurred directly bysuch a partner, and any partnership assets that are deemed to be held directlyby such a partner under the rules of paragraph (e) (1) and (2) of thissection (the aggregate approach) or after the application of paragraph(e)(5) shall be taken into account by such partner in the application ofthe rules of andSection;1.882-5, and the value of the partnership interestitself shall be disregarded. Any other partnership interest expense describedin paragraph (e)(4) (entity rule) shall be apportioned between effectivelyconnected income and noneffectively connected income of the partnershipby applying the rules of andSection;1.882-5 as if the partnership were aforeign corporation. In apportioning under andSection;1.882-5 interest expensethat is deemed incurred directly by the partner under paragraph (e) (1)and (2) of this section, any partnership interest described in paragraph(e)(4) shall not be considered to be an asset that generates income effectivelyconnected with a United States trade or business. <ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example. </T3>A is a foreign corporation that is a 50 percent partnerin a partnership the only asset of which is an office building in the UnitedStates. The partnership's basis in the building is $1,000, half of whichis deemed to be held directly by A under paragraph (e) (1) and (2) of thissection. A's distributive share of interest expense of $100 is deemed tobe incurred directly by A under the rules of this paragraph. In applyingthe rules of andSection;1.882-5, A shall take account of its share of thepartnership liability and shall take account of its share of the partnership'sasset. </ITAG>(ii) <T3>Nonresident aliens. </T3>The distributive share of partnership interestexpense of a nonresident alien who is a partner in a partnership shallbe considered to be connected with effectively connected income based onthe percentage of the assets of the partnership that generate effectivelyconnected income. No interest expense directly incurred by the partnermay be allocated and apportioned to effectively connected income derivedby the partnership. (f) <T3>Corporations</T3>_(1) <T3>Domestic corporations. </T3>Domestic corporations shall apportion interestexpense using the asset method described in paragraph (g) of this sectionand the applicable rules of andSection;andSection;1.861-10T through 1.861-13T.(2) <T3>Foreign branches of domestic corporations. </T3>In the applicationof the asset method described in paragraph (g) of this section, a domesticcorporation shall_ (i) Take into account the assets of any foreign branch, translated accordingto the rules set forth in paragraph (g) of this section, and (ii) Combine with its own interest expense any deductible interest expenseincurred by a branch, translated according to the rules of section 987and the regulations thereunder. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">For purposes of computing currency gain or loss on any remittancefrom a branch or other qualified business unit (as defined in andSection;1.989(a)-1T)under section 987, the rules of this paragraph (f) shall not apply. Thebranch shall compute its currency gain or loss on remittances by takinginto account only its separate expenses and its separate income. <ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example</T3>_(i) <T3>Facts. </T3>X is a domestic corporation which operates B, a branchdoing business in a foreign country. In 1988, without regard to branchB, X has gross domestic source income of $1,000 and gross foreign sourcegeneral limitation income of $500 and incurs $200 of interest expense.Using the tax book value method of apportionment, X, without regard tobranch B, determines the value of its assets that generate domestic sourceincome to be $6,000 and the value of its assets that generate foreign sourcegeneral limitation income to be $1,000. B constitutes a qualified businessunit within the meaning of section 989 with a functional currency otherthan the U.S. dollar and uses the profit and loss method prescribed bysection 987. Applying the translation rules of section 987, B earned $500of gross foreign general limitation income and incurred $100 of interestexpense. B incurred no other expenses. For 1988, the average functionalcurrency book value of B's assets that generate foreign general limitationincome translated at the year-end rate for 1988 is $3,000. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) <T3>Computation of net income. </T3>The combined assets of X and B for1988 (averaged under the rules of andSection;1.861-9T(g)(3)) consist 60 percentof assets generating domestic source income and 40 percent of assets generatingforeign source general limitation income. The combined interest expenseof both X and B is $300. Thus, $180 of the combined interest expense isapportioned to domestic source income and $120 is apportioned to the foreignsource income, yielding net domestic source income of $820 and net foreignsource general limitation income of $880. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) <T3>Computation of currency gain or loss. </T3>For purposes of computingcurrency gain or loss on branch remittances, B takes into account onlyits gross income and its separate expenses. In 1988, B therefore has anet amount of income in foreign currency units equal in value to $400.Gain or loss on remittances shall be computed by reference to this amount.</ITAG>(3) <T3>Controlled foreign corporations</T3>_(i) <T3>In general. </T3>For purposes of computing subpart F income and computingearnings and profits for all other federal tax purposes, the interest expenseof a controlled foreign corporation may be apportioned either using theasset method described in paragraph (g) of this section or using the modifiedgross income method described in paragraph (j) of this section, subjectto the rules of subdivisions (ii) and (iii) of this paragraph (f)(2). However,the gross income method described in paragraph (j) of this section is notavailable to any controlled foreign corporation if a United States shareholderand the members of its affiliated group (as defined in andSection;1.861-11T(d))constitute controlling shareholders of such controlled foreign corporationand such affiliated group elects the fair market value method of approtionmentunder paragraph (g) of this section. (ii) <T3>Manner of election. </T3>The election to use the asset method describedin paragraph (g) of this section or the modified gross income method describedin paragraph (j) of this section may be made either by the controlled foreigncorporation or by the controlling United States shareholders on behalfof the controlled foreign corporation. The term ``controlling United Statesshareholders'' means those United States shareholders (as defined in section951(b)) who, in aggregate, own (within the meaning of section 958(a)) greaterthan 50 percent of the total combined voting power of all classes of stockof the foreign corporation entitled to vote. In the case of a controlledforeign corporation in which the United States shareholders own stock representingmore than 50 percent of the value of the stock in such corporation, butless than 50 percent of the combined voting power of all classes of stockin such corporation, the term ``controlling United States shareholders''means all the United States shareholders (as defined in section 951(b))who own (within the meaning of section 958(a)) stock of the controlledforeign corporation. All United States shareholders are bound by the electionof either the controlled foreign corporation or the controlling UnitedStates shareholders. The election shall be made by filing a written statementdescribed in andSection;1.964-1(c)(3)(ii) at the time and in the manner describedtherein and providing a written notice described in andSection;1.964-1(c)(3)(iii),except that no such written statement or notice is required to be filedor sent before March 13, 1989. (iii) <T3>Consistency requirement. </T3>The same method of apportionment mustbe employed by all controlled foreign corporations in which a United Statestaxpayer and the members of its affiliated group (as defined in andSection;1.861-11T(d))constitute controlling United States shareholders. A controlled foreigncorporation that is required by this paragraph (f)(3)(iii) to utilize aparticular method of apportionment must do so with respect to all UnitedStates shareholders. (iv) <T3>Stock characterization. </T3>Pursuant to andSection;1.861-12T(c)(2),the stock of a controlled foreign corporation shall be characterized inthe hands of any United States shareholder using the same method that thecontrolled foreign corporation uses to apportion its interest expense.(4) <T3>Other relevant provisions. </T3>Affiliated groups of corporations aresubject to special rules set forth in andSection;1.861-11T. Section 1.861-12Tsets forth rules relating to basis adjustments for stock in nonaffiliated10 percent owned corporations, special rules relating to the considerationand characterization of certain assets in the apportionment of interestexpense, and to other special rules pertaining to the apportionment ofinterest expense. Section 1.861-13T contains transition rules limitingthe application of the rules of andSection;andSection;1.861-8T through 1.861-12T,which are otherwise applicable to taxable years beginning after 1986. Inthe case of an affiliated group of corporations as defined in andSection;1.861-11T(d),any reference in andSection;andSection;1.861-8T through 1.861-13T to the ``taxpayer''with respect to the allocation and apportionment of interest expense generallydenotes the entire affiliated group of corporations and not the separatemembers thereof, unless the context otherwise requires. (g) <T3>Asset method</T3>_(1) <T3>In general. </T3>(i) Under the asset method, the taxpayer apportionsinterest expense to the various statutory groupings based on the averagetotal value of assets within each such grouping for the taxable year, asdetermined under the asset valuation rules of this paragraph (g)(1) andparagraph (g)(2) of this section and the asset characterization rules ofparagraph (g)(3) of this section and andSection;1.861-12T. Except to theextent otherwise provided (<T3>see, e.g., </T3>paragraph (d)(1)(iv) of this section), taxpayers mustapportion interest expense only on the basis of asset values and may notapportion any interest deduction on the basis of gross income. (ii) A taxpayer may elect to determine the value of its assets on the basisof either the tax book value or the fair market value of its assets. Forrules concerning the application of the fair market value method, see paragraph(h) of this section. In the case of an affiliated group_ (A) The parent of which used the fair market value method prior to 1987,or (B) A substantial portion of which used the fair market value method priorto 1987, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">such a taxpayer may use either the fair market value method or thetax book value method for its tax year commencing in 1987 and may use eithersuch method in its tax year commencing in 1988 without regard to whichmethod was used in its tax year commencing in 1987 and without securingthe Commissioner's consent. The use of the fair market value method in1988, however, shall operate as a binding election as described in andSection;1.861-8T(c)(2).For rules requiring consistency in the use of the tax book value or fairmarket value method, see andSection;1.861-8T(c)(2). (iii) A taxpayer electing to apportion its interest expense on the basisof the fair market value of its assets must establish the fair market valueto the satisfaction of the Commissioner. If a taxpayer fails to establishthe fair market value of an asset to the satisfaction of the Commissioner,the Commissioner may determine the appropriate asset value. If a taxpayerfails to establish the value of a substantial portion of its assets tothe satisfaction of the Commissioner, the Commissioner may require thetaxpayer to use the tax book value method of apportionment. (iv) For rules relating to earnings and profits adjustments by taxpayersusing the tax book value method for the stock in certain nonaffiliated10 percent owned corporations, see andSection;1.861-12T(b). (v) The provisions of this paragraph (g)(1) may be illustrated by the followingexamples. <ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (1)</T3>_(i) <T3>Facts. </T3>X, a domestic corporation organized on January 1, 1987,has deductible interest expense in 1987 in the amount of $150,000. X apportionsits expenses according to the tax book value method. The adjusted basisof X's assets is $3,600,000, $3,000,000 of which generate domestic sourceincome and $600,000 of which generate foreign source general limitationincome. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) <T3>Allocation. </T3>No portion of the $150,000 deduction is directly allocablesolely to identified property within the meaning of andSection;1.861-10T.Thus, X's deduction for interest is related to all its activities and assets.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) <T3>Apportionment. </T3>X apportions its interest expense as follows: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">To foreign source general limitation income: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C/> <H1>$150,000</H1><H1>andmultiply;</H1><H1>$600,000</H1><H2>$3,600,000</H2><H1> . . . . . .</H1><H1>$25,000 </H1><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">To domestic source income: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C/> <H1>$150,000</H1><H1>andmultiply;</H1><H1>$300,000</H1><H2>$3,600,000</H2><H1> . . . . . .</H1><H1>$125,000 </H1><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (2)</T3>_(i) <T3>Facts. </T3>Assume the same facts as in Example (1), except that Xapportions its interest expense on the basis of the fair market value ofits assets. X's total assets have a fair market value of $4,000,000, $3,200,000of which generate domestic source income and $800,000 of which generateforeign source general limitation income. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) <T3>Allocation. </T3>No portion of the $150,000 deduction is directly allocablesolely to identified property within the meaning of andSection;1.861-10T.Thus, X's deduction for interest is related to all its activities and properties.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) <T3>Apportionment. </T3>If it establishes the fair market value of itsassets to the satisfaction of the Commissioner, X may apportion its interestexpense as follows: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">To foreign source general limitation income: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C/> <H1>$150,000</H1><H1>andmultiply;</H1><H1>$800,000</H1><H2>$4,000,000</H2><H1> . . . . . .</H1><H1>$30,000 </H1><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">To domestic source income: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C/> <H1>$150,000</H1><H1>andmultiply;</H1><H1>$3,200,000</H1><H2>$4,000,000</H2><H1> . . . . . .</H1><H1>$120,000 </H1><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG></ITAG>(2) <T3>Asset values</T3>_(i) <T3>General rule. </T3>For purposes of determining the value of assetsunder this section, an average of values (book or market) within each statutorygrouping and the residual grouping shall be computed for the year on thebasis of values of assets at the beginning and end of the year. For thefirst taxable year beginning after 1986, a taxpayer may choose to determineasset values solely by reference to the year-end value of its assets, providedthat all the members of an affiliated group as defined in andSection;1.861-11T(d)make the same choice. Thus, no averaging is required for the first taxableyear beginning after 1986. Where a substantial distortion of asset valueswould result from averaging beginning-of-year and year-end values, as mightbe the case in the event of a major corporate acquisition or disposition,the taxpayer must use a different method of asset valuation that more clearlyreflects the average value of assets weighted to reflect the time suchassets are held by the taxpayer during the taxable year. (ii) <T3>Special rule for qualified business units of domestic corporationswith functional currency other than the U.S. dollar</T3>_(A) <T3>Tax book value method. </T3>In the case of taxpayers using the taxbook value method of apportionment, the following rules shall apply todetermine the value of the assets of a qualified business unit (as definedin section 989(a)) of a domestic corporation with a functional currencyother than the dollar. (<T3>1</T3>) <T3>Profit and loss branch. </T3>In the case of a branch for which an electionis not effective under andSection;1.985-2T to use the dollar approximateseparate transactions method of computing currency gain or loss, the taxbook value shall be determined by applying the rules of paragraph (g)(2)(i)and (3) of this section with respect to beginning-of-year and end-of-yeartax book value in units of functional currency that are translated intodollars at the end-of-year exchange rate between the functional currencyand the U.S. dollar. <ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example. </T3>At the end of 1987, a profit and loss branch has assetsthat generate foreign source general limitation income with a tax bookvalue in units of functional currency of 100. At the end of 1987, the unitis worth $1. At the end of 1988, the branch has assets that generate foreignsource general limitation income with a tax book value in units of functionalcurrency of 80. At the end of 1988, the unit is worth $2. The average valueof foreign source general limitation assets for 1988 is 90 units, whichis worth $180. </ITAG>(<T3>2</T3>) <T3>Approximate separate transactions method. </T3>In the case of a branchfor which an election is effective under andSection;1.985-2T to use the dollarapproximate separate transactions method to compute currency gain or loss,the beginning-of-year dollar amount of the assets shall be determined byreference to the end-of-year balance sheet of the branch for the immediatelypreceding taxable year, adjusted for United States generally accepted accountingprinciples and United States tax accounting principles, and translatedinto U.S. dollars as provided in andSection;1.985-3T. The year-end dollaramount of the assets of the branch shall be determined in the same mannerby reference to the end-of-year balance sheet for the current taxable year.The beginning-of-year and end-of-year dollar tax book value of assets,as so determined, within each grouping must then be averaged as providedin paragraph (g)(2)(i) of this section. (B) <T3>Fair market value method. </T3>In the case of taxpayers using the fairmarket value method of apportionment, the beginning-of-year and end-of-yearfair market values of branch assets within each grouping shall be computedin dollars and averaged as provided in this paragraph (g)(2). (iii) <T3>Adjustment for directly allocated interest. </T3>Prior to averaging,the year-end value of any asset to which interest expense is directly allocatedduring the current taxable year under the rules of andSection;1.861-10T (b)or (c) shall be reduced (but not below zero) by the percentage of the principalamount of indebtedness outstanding at year-end equal to the percentageof all interest on the debt for the taxable year that is directly allocated.(iv) <T3>Assets in deferred intercompany transactions. </T3>In the applicationof the asset method described in this paragraph (g), the tax book valueof assets transferred between affiliated corporations in deferred intercompanytransactions shall be determined without regard to the gain or loss thatis deferred under the regulations issued under section 1502. <ITAG tagnum="21">(v) <T3>Example. </T3>X is a domestic corporation that uses the fair marketvalue method of apportionment. X is a calendar year taxpayer. X owns 25percent of the stock of A, a noncontrolled section 902 corporation. Atthe end of 1987, the fair market value of X's assets by income groupingare as follows: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="38">Domestic </ITAG>.....$1,000,000 <ITAG tagnum="38">Foreign general limitation </ITAG>.....500,000 <ITAG tagnum="38">Foreign passive </ITAG>.....500,000 <ITAG tagnum="38">Noncontrolled section 902 corporation </ITAG>.....50,000 <ITAG tagnum="21">For its 1987 tax year, X apportions its interest expense by referenceto the 1987 year-end values. In July of 1988, X sells a portion of itsinvestment in A and in an asset acquisition purchases a shipping business,the assets of which generate exclusively foreign shipping income. At theend of 1988, the fair market values of X's assets by income grouping areas follows: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="38">Domestic </ITAG>.....$800,000 <ITAG tagnum="38">Foreign general limitation </ITAG>.....900,000 <ITAG tagnum="38">Foreign passive </ITAG>.....300,000 <ITAG tagnum="38">Noncontrolled section 902 corporation </ITAG>.....40,000 <ITAG tagnum="38">Foreign shipping </ITAG>.....100,000 <ITAG tagnum="21">For its 1988 tax year, X shall apportion its interest expense by referenceto the average of the 1988 beginning-of-year values (the 1987 year-endvalues) and the 1988 year-end values, assuming that the averaging of beginning-of-yearand end-of-year values does not cause a substantial distortion of assetvalues. These averages are as follows:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="38">Domestic</ITAG>.....$900,000<ITAG tagnum="38">Foreign general limitation</ITAG>.....700,000<ITAG tagnum="38">Foreign passive</ITAG>.....400,000<ITAG tagnum="38">Foreign shipping</ITAG>.....50,000<ITAG tagnum="38">Noncontrolled section 902 corporation</ITAG>.....45,000(3) <T3>Characterization of assets.</T3> Assets are charactrized for purposesof this section according to the source and type of the income that theygenerate, have generated, or may reasonably be expected to generate. Thephysical location of assets is not relevant to this determination. Subjectto the special rules of paragraph (h) concerning the application of thefair market value method of apportionment, the value of assets within eachstatutory grouping and the residual grouping at the beginning and end ofeach year shall be determined by dividing the taxpayer's assets into threetypes_(i) <T3>Single category assets.</T3> Assets that generate income that is exclusivelywithin a single statutory grouping or the residual grouping;(ii) <T3>Multiple category assets.</T3> Assets that generate income within morethan one grouping of income (statutory or residual); and(iii) <T3>Assets without directly identifiable yield.</T3> Assets that produceno directly identifiable income yield or that contribute equally to thegeneration of all the income of the taxpayer (such as assets used in generaland administrative functions).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">Single category assets are directly attributable to the relevant statutoryor residual grouping of income. In order to attribute multiple categoryassets to the relevant groupings of income, the income yield of each suchasset for the taxable year must be analyzed to determine the proportionof gross income generated by it within each relevant grouping. The valueof each asset is then prorated among the relevant groupings of income accordingto their respective proportions of gross income. The value of each assetwithout directly identifiable income yield must be identified. However,because prorating the value of such assets cannot alter the ratio of assetswithin the various groupings of income (as determined by reference to thesingle and multiple category assets), they are not taken into account indetermining that ratio. Special asset characterization rules that are setforth in andSection; 1.861-12T. An example demonstrating the applicationof the asset method is set forth in andSection; 1.861-12T(d).(h) <T3>The fair market value method.</T3> An affiliated group (as definedin andSection; 1.861-11T(d)) or other taxpayer (the ``taxpayer'') that electsto use the fair market value method of apportionment shall value its assetsaccording to the following methodology.(1) <T3>Determination of values_</T3>(i)<T3> Valuation of group assets.</T3> The taxpayer shall first determinethe aggregate value of the assets of the taxpayer on the last day of itstaxable year without excluding the value of stock in foreign subsidiariesor any other asset. In the case of a publicly traded corporation, thisdetermination shall be equal to the aggregate trading value of the taxpayer'sstock traded on established securities markets at year-end increased bythe taxpayer's year-end liabilities to unrelated persons and its pro ratashare of year-end liabilities of all related persons owed to unrelatedpersons. In determining whether persons are related, andSection; 1.861-8T(c)(2)shall apply. In the case of a corporation that is not publicly traded,this determination shall be made by reference to the capitalization ofcorporate earnings, in accordance with the rules of Rev. Rul. 68-609. Ineither case, control premium shall not be taken into account.(ii) <T3>Valuation of tangible assets.</T3> The taxpayer shall determine thevalue of all assets held by the taxpayer and its pro rata share of assetsheld by other related persons on the last day of its taxable year, excludingstock or indebtedness in such persons, any intangible property as definedin section 936(h)(3)(B), or goodwill or going concern value intangibles.Such valuations shall be made using generally accepted valuation techniques.For this purpose, assets may be combined into reasonable groupings. Statisticalmethods of valuation may only be used in connection with fungible property,such as commodities. The value of stock in any corporation that is nota related person shall be determined under the rules of paragraph (h)(1)(i)of this section, except that no liabilities shall be taken into account.(iii) <T3>Computation of intangible asset value.</T3> The value of the intangibleassets of the taxpayer and of intangible assets of all related personsattributable to the taxpayer's ownership in related persons is equal tothe amount obtained by subtracting the amount determined under paragraph(h)(1)(ii) of this section from the amount determined under paragraph (h)(1)(i)of this section.(2) <T3>Apportionment of intangible asset value. </T3>The value of the intangibleassets determined under paragraph (h)(1)(iii) of this section is apportionedamong the taxpayer and all related persons in proportion to the net incomebefore interest expense of the taxpayer and the taxpayer's pro rata shareof the net income before interest expense of each ralated person held bythe taxpayer, excluding income that is passive under andSection; 1.904-4(b).For this purpose, net income is determined before reduction for incometaxes. Net income of the taxpayer and of related persons shall be computedwithout regard to dividends or interest received from any person that isrelated to the taxpayer.(3)<T3> Characterization of affiliated group's portion of intangible assetvalue.</T3> The protion of the value of intagible assets of the taxpayerand related persons that is apportioned to the taxpayer under paragraph(h)(2) of this section is characterized on the basis of net income beforeinterest expense, as determined under paragraph (h)(2) of this section,of the taxpayer within each statutory or residual grouping of income.(4) <T3>Valuing stock in related persons held by the taxpayer. </T3>The valueof stock in a related person held by the taxpayer equals the sum of thefollowing amounts reduced by the taxpayer's pro rata share of liabilitiesof such related person:   (i) The portion of the value of intangible assets of the taxpayer and relatedpersons that is apportioned to such related person under paragraph (h)(2)of this section;   (ii) The taxpayer's pro rata share of tangible assets held by the relatedperson (as determined under paragraph (h)(1)(ii) of this section); and  (iii) The total value of stock in all related person held by the relatedperson as determined under this paragraph (h)(4).   (5) <T3>Characterizing stock in related persons. </T3>Stock in a related personheld by the taxpayer or by another related person shall be characterizedon the basis of the fair market value of the taxpayer's pro rata shareof assets held by the related person attributed to each statutory groupingand the residual grouping under the stock characterization rules of andSection;1.861-12T(c)(3)(ii),except that the portion of the value of intangible assets of the taxpayerand related persons that is apportioned to the related person under paragraph(h)(2) of this section shall be characterized on the basis of the net incomebefore interest expense of the related person within each statutory groupingor residual grouping (excluding income that is passive under andSection;1.904-4(b)).  (6) <T3>Adjustments for apportioning related person expenses. </T3>For purposesof apportioning expenses of a related person, the value of stock in a secondrelated person as otherwise determined under paragraph (h)(4) of this section(which is determined on the basis of the taxpayer's percentage ownershipinterest in the second related person) shall be increased to reflect thefirst related person's percentage ownership interest in the second relatedperson to the extent it is larger. <ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example. </T3>Assume that a taxpayer owns 80 percent of CFC1, whichowns 100 percent of CFC2. The value of CFC1 is determined generally underparagraph (h)(4) on the basis of the taxpayer's 80 percent indirect interestin CFC2. For purposes of apportioning expenses of CFC1, 100 percent ofthe stock of CFC1 must be taken into account. Therefore, the value of CFC2stock in the hands of CFC1 shall equal the value of CFC2 stock in the handsof CFC1 as determined under paragraph (h)(4) of this section, increasedby 25 percent of such amount to reflect the fact that CFC1 owns 100 percentand not 80 percent of CFC2. </ITAG>(i) [Reserved.]   (j) <T3>Modified gross income method. </T3>Subject to rules set forth in paragraph(f)(3) of this section, the interest expense of a controlled foreign corporationmay be allocated according to the following rules.   (1) <T3>Single-tier controlled foreign corporation. </T3>In the case of a controlledforeign corporation that does not hold stock in any lower-tier controlledforeign corporation, the interest expense of the controlled foreign corporationshall be apportioned based on its gross income.   (2) <T3>Multiple vertically owned controlled foreign corporations. </T3>Inthe case of a controlled foreign corporation that holds stock in any lower-tiercontrolled foreign corporation, the interest expense of that controlledforeign corporation and such upper-tier controlled foreign corporationshall be apportioned based on the following methodology:   (i) <T3>Step 1. </T3>Commencing with the lowest-tier controlled foreign corporationin the chain, allocate and apportion its interest expense based on itsgross income as provided in paragraph (j)(1) of this section, yieldinggross income in each grouping net of interest expense.   (ii) <T3>Step 2. </T3>Moving to the next higher-tier controlled foreign corporation,combine the gross income of such corporation within each grouping withits pro rata share of the gross income net of interest expense of all lower-tiercontrolled foreign corporations held by such higher-tier corporation withinthe same grouping adjusted as follows:   (A) Exclude from the gross income of the upper-tier corporation any dividendsor other payments received from the lower-tier corporation other than interestsubject to look-through under section 904(d)(3); and   (B) Exclude from the gross income net of interest expense of any lower-tiercorporation any subpart F income (net of interest expense apportioned tosuch income). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">Then apportion the interest expense of the higher-tier controlledforeign corporation based on the adjusted combined gross income amounts.Repeat this step 2 for each next higher-tier controlled foreign corporationin the chain. For purposes of this paragraph (j)(2)(ii), pro rata shareshall be determined under principles similar to section 951(a)(2).  <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1.861-10T</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Special allocations of interest expense (Temporary regulations). </ITAG>(a) <T3>In general. </T3>This section applies to all taxpayers and providesthree exceptions to the rules of andSection; 1.861-9T that require the allocationand apportionment of interest expense on the basis of all assets of allmembers of the affiliated group. Paragraph (b) of this section describesthe direct allocation of interest expense to the income generated by certainassets that are subject to qualified nonrecourse indebtedness. Paragraph(c) of this section describes the direct allocation of interest expenseto income generated by certain assets that are acquired in integrated financialtransaction. Paragraph (d) of this section provides special rules thatare applicable to all transactions described in paragraphs (b) and (c)of this section. Paragraph (e) of this section requires the direct allocationof third party interest of an affiliated group to such group's investmentin related controlled foreign corporations in cases involving excess relatedperson indebtedness (as defined therein). See also andSection; 1.861-9T(b)(5),which requires direct allocation of amortizable bond premium. (b) <T3>Qualified nonrecourse indebtedness</T3>_(1) <T3>In general. </T3>In the case of qualified nonrecourse indebtedness(as defined in paragraph (b)(2) of this section), the deduction for interestshall be considered directly allocable solely to the gross income whichthe property acquired, constructed, or improved with the proceeds of theindebtedness generates, has generated, or could reasonably be expectedto generate. (2) <T3>Qualified nonrecourse indebtedness defined. </T3>The term ``qualifiednonrecourse indebtedness'' means any borrowing that is not excluded byparagraph (b)(4) of this section if: (i) The borrowing is specifically incurred for the purpose of purchasing,constructing, or improving identified property that is either depreciabletangible personal property or real property with a useful life of morethan one year or for the purpose of purchasing amortizable intangible personalproperty with a useful life of more than one year; (ii) The proceeds are actually applied to purchase, construct, or improvethe identified property; (iii) Except as provided in paragraph (b)(7)(ii) (relating to certain thirdparty guarantees in leveraged lease transactions), the creditor can lookonly to the identified property (or any lease or other interest therein)as security for payment of the principal and interest on the loan and,thus, cannot look to any other property, the borrower, or any third partywith respect to repayment of principal or interest on the loan; (iv) The cash flow from the property, as defined in paragraph (b)(3) ofthis section, is reasonably expected to be sufficient in the first yearof ownership as well as in each subsequent year of ownership to fulfillthe terms and conditions of the loan agreement with respect to the amountand timing of payments of interest and original issue discount and periodicpayments of principal in each such year; and  (v) There are restrictions in the loan agreement on the disposal or useof the property consistent with the assumptions described in subdivisions(iii) and (iv) of this paragraph (b)(2). (3) <T3>Cash flow defined</T3>_(i) <T3>In general. </T3>The term ``cash flow from the property'' as used inparagraph (b)(2)(iv) of this section means a stream of revenue (as computedunder paragraph (b)(3)(ii) of this section) substantially all of whichderives directly from the property. The phrase ``cash flow from the property''does not include revenue if a significant portion thereof is derived fromactivities such as sales, labor, services, or the use of other property.Thus, revenue derived from the sale or lease of inventory or of similarproperty does not constitute cash flow from the property, including plantor equipment used in the manufacture and sale or lease, or purchase andsale or lease, of such inventory or similar property. In addition, revenuederived in part from the performance of services that are not ancillaryand subsidiary to the use of property does not constitute cash flow fromthe property. (ii) <T3>Self-constructed assets. </T3>The activities associated with self-constructionof assets shall be considered to constitute labor or services for purposesof paragraph (b)(3)(i) only if the self-constructed asset_ (A) Is constructed for the purpose of resale, or  (B) Without regard to purpose, is sold to an unrelated person within oneyear from the date that the property is placed in service for purposesof section 167. (iii) <T3>Computation of cash flow. </T3>Cash flow is computed by subtractingcash disbursements excluding debt service from cash receipts. (iv) <T3>Analysis of operating costs. </T3>[Reserved] (v) <T3>Examples. </T3>The principles of this paragraph may be demonstratedby the following examples.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (1). </T3>In 1987, X borrows $100,000 in order to purchasean apartment building, which X then purchases. The loan is secured onlyby the building and the leases thereon. Annual debt service on the loanis $12,000. Annual gross rents from the building are $20,000. Annual taxeson the building are $2,000. Other expenses deductible under section 162are $2,000. Rents are reasonably expected to remain stable or increasein subsequent years, and taxes and expenses are reasonably expected toremain proportional to gross rents in subsequent years. X provides security,maintenance, and utilities to the tenants of the building. Based on factsand circumstances, it is determined that, although services are providedto tenants, these services are ancillary and subsidiary to the occupancyof the apartments. Accordingly, the case flow of $16,000 is consideredto constitute a return from the property. Furthermore, such cash flow issufficient to fulfill the terms and conditions of the loan agreement asrequired by paragraph (b)(2)(iii). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (2). </T3>In 1987, X borrows funds in order to purchase a hotel,which X then purchases and operates. The loan is secured only by the hotel.Based on facts and circumstances, it is determined that the operation ofthe hotel involves services the value of which is significant in relationto amounts paid to occupy the rooms. Thus, a significant portion of thecash flow is derived from the performance of services incidental to theoccupancy of hotel rooms. Accordingly, the cash flow from the hotel isconsidered not to constitute a return on or from the property. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (3). </T3>In 1987, X borrows funds in order to build a factory,which X then builds and operates. The loan is secured only by the factoryand the equipment therein. Based on the facts and circumstances, it isdetermined that the operation of the factory involves significant expendituresfor labor and raw materials. Thus, a significant portion of the cash flowis derived from labor and the processing of raw materials. Accordingly,the cash flow from the factory is considered not to constitute a returnon or from the property.</ITAG>(4) <T3>Exclusions. </T3>The term ``qualified nonrecourse indebtedness' shallnot include any transaction that_ (i) Lacks economic significance within the meaning of paragraph (b)(5)of this section; (ii) Involves cross collateralization within the meaning of paragraph (b)(6)of this section; (iii) Except in the case of a leveraged lease described in paragraph (b)(7)(ii)of this section, involves credit enhancement within the meaning of paragraph(b)(7) of this section or, with respect to loans made on or after October14, 1988, does not under the terms of the loan documents, prohibit theacquisition by the holder of bond insurance or similar forms of creditenhancement; (iv) Involves the purchase of inventory; (v) Involves the purchase of any financial asset, including stock in acorporation, an interest in a partnership or a trust, or the debt obligationof any obligor (although interest incurred in order to purchase certainfinancial instruments may qualify for direct allocation under paragraph(c) of this section); (vi) Involves interest expense that constitutes qualified residence interestas defined in section 163(h)(3); or (vii) [Reserved]. (5) <T3>Economic significance. </T3>Indebtedness that otherwise qualifies underparagraph (b)(2) shall nonetheless be subject to apportionment under andSection;1.861-9T if, taking into account all the facts and circumstances, the transaction(including the security arrangement) lacks economic significance. (6) <T3>Cross collateralization. </T3>The term ``cross collateralization''refers to the pledge as security for a loan of_ (i) Any asset of the borrower other than the identified property describedin paragraph (b)(2) of this section, or (ii) Any asset belonging to any related person, as defined in andSection;1.861-8T(c)(2). (7) <T3>Credit enhancement</T3>_(i) <T3>In general. </T3>Except as provided in paragraph (b)(7)(ii) of thissection, the term ``credit enhancement'' refers to any device, includinga contract, letter of credit, or guaranty, that expands the creditor'srights, directly or indirectly, beyond the identified property purchased,constructed, or improved with the funds advanced and, thus effectivelyprovides as security for a loan the assets of any person other than theborrower. The acquisition of bond insurance or any other contract of suretyshipby an initial or subsequent holder of an obligation shall constitute creditenhancement. (ii) <T3>Special rule for leveraged leases. </T3>For purposes of this paragraph(b), the term ``credit enhancement'' shall not include any device underwhich any person that is not a related person within the meaning of andSection;1.861-8T(c)(2) agrees to guarantee, without recourse to the lessor or anyperson related to the lessor, a lessor's payment of principal and intereston indebtedness that was incurred in order to purchase or improve an assetthat is depreciable tangible personal property or depreciable tangiblereal property (and the land on which such real property is situated) thatis leased to a lessee that is not a related person in a transaction thatconstitutes a lease for federal income tax purposes. (iii) <T3>Syndication of credit risk and sale of loan participations. </T3>Theterm ``syndication of credit risk'' refers to an arrangement in which oneprimary lender secures the promise of a secondary lender to bear a portionof the primary lender's credit risk on a loan. The term ``sale of loanparticipations'' refers to an arrangement in which one primary lender dividesa loan into several portions, sells and assigns all rights with respectto one or more portions to participating secondary lenders, and does notremain at risk in any manner with respect to the portion assigned. Forpurposes of this paragraph (b), the syndication of credit risk shall constitutecredit enhancement because the primary lender can look to secondary lendersfor payment of the loan, notwithstanding limitations on the amount of thesecondary lender's liability. Conversely, the sale of loan participationsdoes not constitute credit enhancement, because the holder of each portionof the loan can look solely to the asset securing the loan and not to thecredit or other assets of any person. (8) <T3>Other arrangements that do not constitute cross collateralization orcredit enhancement. </T3>For purposes of paragraphs (b) (6) and (7) ofthis section, the following arrangements do not constitute cross collateralizationor credit enhancement: (i) <T3>Integrated projects. </T3>A taxpayer's pledge of multiple assets ofan integrated project, provided that the integrated project. An integratedproject consists of functionally related and geographically contiguousassets that, as to the taxpayer, are used in the same trade or business.(ii) Insurance. A taxpayer's purchase of third-party casualty and liabilityinsurance on the collateral or, by contract, bearing the risk of loss associatedwith destruction of the collateral or with respect to the attachment ofthird party liability claims. (iii) <T3>After-acquired property. </T3>Extension of a creditor's security interestto improvements made to the collateral, provided that the extension doesnot constitute excess collateralization under paragraph (b)(6), determinedby taking into account the value of improvements at the time the improvementsare made and the value of the original property at the time the loan wasmade. (iv) <T3>Warranties of completion and maintenance. </T3>A taxpayer's warrantyto a creditor that it will complete construction or manufacture of thecollateral or that it will maintain the collateral in good condition. (v) <T3>Substitution of collateral. </T3>A taxpayer's right to substitute collateralunder any loan contract. However, after the right is exercised, the loanshall no longer constitute qualified nonrecourse indebtedness. (9) <T3>Refinancings. </T3>If a taxpayer refinances qualified nonrecourse indebtedness(as defined in paragraph (b)(2) of this section) with new indebtedness,such new indebtedness shall continue to qualify only if_ (i) The principal amount of the new indebtedness does not exceed by morethan five percent the remaining principal amount of the original indebtedness,(ii) The term of the new indebtedness does not exceed by more than sixmonths the remaining term of the original indebtedness, and (iii) The requirements of this paragraph (other than those of paragraph(b)(2) (i) and (ii) of this section) are satisfied at the time of the refinancing,and the exclusions contained in this paragraph (b)(4) do not apply. (10) <T3>Post-construction permanent financing. </T3>Financing that is obtainedafter the completion of constructed property will be deemed to satisfythe requirements of paragraph (b)(2) (i) and (ii) of this section if_ (i) The financing is obtained within one year after the constructed propertyor substantially all of a constructed integrated project (as defined inparagraph (b)(9)(i) of this section) is placed in service for purposesof section 167; and (ii) The financing does not exceed the cost of construction (includingconstruction period interest).(11) <T3>Assumptions of pre-existing qualified nonrecourse indebtedness. </T3>Ifa transferee of property that is subject to qualified nonrecourse indebtednessassumes such indebtedness, the indebtedness shall continue to constitutequalified nonrecourse indebtedness, provided that the assumption in noway alters the qualified status of the debt. (12) <T3>Excess collateralization. </T3>[Reserved](c) <T3>Direct allocations in the case of certain integrated financial transactions_</T3>(1)<T3> General rule. </T3>Interest expense incurred on funds borrowed inconnection with an integrated financial transaction (as defined in paragraph(c)(2) of this section) shall be directly allocated to the income generatedby the investment funded with the borrowed amounts. (2) <T3>Definition. </T3>The term ``integrated financial transaction'' refersto any transaction in which_ (i) The taxpayer_(A) Incurs indebtedness for the purpose of making an identified term investment,(B) Identifies the indebtedness as incurred for such purpose at the timethe indebtedness is incurred, and (C) Makes the identified term investment within ten business days afterincurring the indebtedness; (ii) The return on the investment is reasonably expected to be sufficientthroughout the term of the investment to fulfill the terms and conditionsof the loan agreement with respect to the amount and timing of paymentsof principal and interest or original issue discount;(iii) The income constitutes interest or original issue discount or wouldconstitute income equivalent to interest if earned by a controlled foreigncorporation (as described in andSection; 1.954-2T(h));(iv) The debt incurred and the investment mature within ten business daysof each other; (v) The investment does not relate in any way to the operation of, andis not made in the normal course of, the trade or business of the taxpayeror any related person, including the financing of the sale of goods orthe performance of services by the taxpayer or any related person, or thecompensation of the taxpayer's employees (including any contribution orloan to an employee stock ownership plan (as defined in section 4975(e)(7))or other plan that is qualified under section 401(a)); and (vi) The borrower does not constitute a financial services entity (as definedin section 904 and the regulations thereunder).(3) <T3>Rollovers. </T3>In the event that a taxpayer sells of otherwise liquidatesan investment described in paragraph (c)(2) of this section, the interestexpense incurred on the borrowing shall, subsequent to that liquidation,no longer qualify for direct allocation under this paragraph (c).(4) <T3>Examples. </T3>The principles of this paragraph (c) may be demonstratedby the following examples.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (1). </T3>X is a manufacturer and does not constitute a financialservices entity as defined in the regulations under section 904. On January1, 1988, X borrows $100 for 6 months at an annual interest rate of 10 percent.X identifies on its books and records by the close of that day that theindebtedness is being incurred for the purpose of making an investmentthat is intended to qualify as an integrated financial transaction. OnJanuary 5, 1988, X uses the proceeds to purchase a portfolio of stock thatapproximates the composition of the Standard andamp; Poor's 500 Index. Onthat day, X also enters into a forward sale contract that requires X tosell the stock on June 1, 1988 for $110. X identifies on its books andrecords by the close of January 5, 1988, that the portfolio stock purchasesand the forward sale contract constitute part of the integrated financialtransaction with respect to which the identified borrowing was incurred.Under andSection; 1.954-2T(h), the income derived from the transaction wouldconstitute income equivalent to interest. Assuming that the return on theinvestment to be derived on June 1, 1988, will be sufficient to pay theinterest due on June 1, 1988, the interest on the borrowing is directlyallocated to the gain from the investment. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (2). </T3>X does not constitute a financial services entityas defined in the regulations under section 904. X is in the business of,among other things, issuing credit cards to consumers and purchasing frommerchants who accept the X card the receivables of consumers who make purchaseswith the X card. X borrows from Y in order to purchase X credit card receivablesfrom Z, a merchant. Assuming that the Y borrowing satisfies the other requirementsof paragraph (c)(2) of this section, the transaction nonetheless cannotconstitute an integrated financial transaction because the purchase relatesto the operation of X's trade or business. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (3). </T3>Assume the same facts as in Example 2, except thatX borrows in order to purchase the receivables of A, a merchant who doesnot accept the X card and is not otherwise engaged directly or indirectlyin any business transaction with X. Because the borrowing is not relatedto the operation of X's trade or business, the borrowing may qualify asan integrated financial transaction if the other requirements of paragraph(c)(2) of this section are satisfied.</ITAG>(d) <T3>Special rules. </T3>In applying paragraphs (b) and (c) of this section,the following special rules shall apply. (1) <T3>Related person transactions. </T3>The rules of this section shall notapply to the extent that any transaction_ (i) Involves either indebtedness between related persons (as defined insection andSection; 1.861-8T(c)(2)) or indebtedness incurred from unrelatedpersons for the purpose of purchasing property from a related person; or(ii) Involves the purchase of property that is leased to a related person(as defined in andSection; 1.861-8T(c)(2)) in a transaction described inparagraph (b) of this section. If a taxpayer purchases property and leasessuch property in whole or in part to a related person, a portion of theinterest incurred in connection with such an acquisition, based on theratio that the value of the property leased to the related person bearsto the total value of the property, shall not qualify for direct allocationunder this section.(2) <T3>Consideration of assets or income to which interest is directly allocatedin apportioning other interest expense. </T3>In apportioning interest expenseunder andSection; 1.861-9T, the year-end value of any asset to which interestexpense is directly allocated under this section during the current taxableyear shall be reduced to the extent provided in andSection; 1.861-9T(g)(2)(iii)to reflect the portion of the principal amount of the indebtedness outstandingat year-end relating to the interest which is directly allocated. A similaradjustment shall be made to the end-of-year value of assets for the prioryear for purposes of determining the beginning-of-year value of assetsfor the current year. These adjustments shall be made prior to averagingbeginning-of-year and end-of-year values pursuant to andSection; 1.861-9T(g)(2).In apportioning interest expense under the modified gross income method,gross income shall be reduced by the amount of income to which interestexpense is directly allocated under this section. (e) <T3>Treatment of certain related controlled foreign corporation indebtedness</T3>_(1)<T3>In general.</T3> In taxable years beginning after 1987, if a UnitedStates shareholder has incurred substantially disproportionate indebtednessin relation to the indebtedness of its related controlled foreign corporationsso that such corporations have excess related person indebtedness (as determinedunder step 4 in subdivision (iv) of this paragraph (e)(1), the third partyinterest expense of the related United States shareholder (excluding amountsallocated under paragraphs (b) and (c)) in an amount equal to the interestincome received on such excess related person indebtedness shall be allocatedto gross income in the various separate limitation categories describedin section 904(d)(1) in the manner prescribed in step 6 in subdivision(vi) of this paragraph (e)(1). This computation shall be performed as follows.(i) <T3>Step 1: Compute the debt-to-asset ratio of the related United Statesshareholder.</T3> The debt-to-asset ratio of the related United Statesshareholder is the ratio between_ (A) The average month-end debt level of the related United States shareholdertaking into account debt owing to any obligee who is not a related personas defined in section andSection; 1.861-8T(c)(2), and (B) The value of assets (tax book or fair market) of the related UnitedStates shareholder including stockholdings and obligations of related controlledforeign corporations but excluding stockholdings and obligations of membersof the affiliated group (as defined in andSection; 1.861-11T(d)). (ii) <T3>Step 2: Compute aggregate debt-to-asset ratio of all related controlledforeign corporations.</T3> The aggregate debt-to-asset ratio of all relatedcontrolled foreign corporations is the ratio between_ (A) The average aggregate month-end debt level of all related controlledforeign corporations for their taxable years ending during the relatedUnited States shareholder's taxable year taking into account only indebtednessowing to persons other than the related United States shareholder or therelated United States shareholder's other related controlled foreign corporations(``third party indebtedness''), and (B) The aggregate value (tax book or fair market) of the assets of allrelated controlled foreign corporations for their taxable years endingduring the related United States shareholder's taxable year excluding stockholdingsin and obligations of the related United States shareholder or the relatedUnited States shareholder's other related controlled foreign corporations.(iii) <T3>Step 3: Compute aggregate related person debt of all related controlledforeign corporations.</T3> This amount equals the average aggregate month-enddebt level of all related controlled foreign corporations for their taxableyears ending with or within the related United States shareholder's taxableyear, taking into account only debt which is owned to the related UnitedStates shareholder (''related person indebtedness''). (iv) <T3>Step 4: Computation of excess related person indebtedness and computationof the income therefrom</T3>_(A) <T3>General rule.</T3> If the ratio computed under step 2 is less thanapplicable percentage of the ratio computed under step 1, the taxpayershall add to the aggregate third party indebtedness of all related controlledforeign corporations determined under paragraph (e)(1)(ii)(A) of this sectionthat portion of the related person indebtedness computed under step 3 that,when combined with the aggregate third party indebtedness of all controlledforeign corporations, makes the ratio computed under step 2 equal to applicablepercentage of the ratio computed under step 1. The amount of aggregaterelated person debt that is so added to the aggregate third party debtof related controlled foreign corporations is considered to constituteexcess related person indebtedness. For purposes of this paragraph (e)(1)(iv)(A),the term ``applicable percentage'' means the designated percentages fortaxable years beginning during the following calendar years: <ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L2,tp0,i1,s25,7</C>  <H1>Taxable years beginning in</H1><H1>Applicable percentage</H1> <ITAG tagnum="1">1988<D>50</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1989<D>65</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">1990 and thereafter<D>80</D></ITAG></ITAG> (B) <T3>Elective quadratic formula.</T3> In calculating the amount of excessrelated party indebtedness of related controlled foreign corporations,the United States shareholder's debt-to-asset ratio may be adjusted toreflect the amount by which its debt and assets would be reduced had therelated controlled foreign corporations incurred the excess related partyindebtedness directly to third parties. In such case, the ratio computedin Step 1 is adjusted to reflect a reduction of both portions of the ratioby the amount of excess related person indebtedness as computed under thisparagraph (e)(1)(ii)(A). Excess related person indebtedness may be computedunder the following formula, under which excess related person indebtednessequals the smallest positive amount (not exceeding the aggregate amountof related controlled foreign corporation indebtedness) that is a solutionto the following formula (with X equalling the amount of excess relatedperson indebtedness): <ITAG tagnum="110"><C>5,L1(0,0,0),b1,tp0,p8,8/1,g1,t1,aw,25,1,10,1,25</C>  <H1>Aggregate third party debt of related US shareholder  ^X </H1><H2>US shareholder assets  ^X </H2><H1>X</H1><H1>Applicable percentage for year </H1><H1>=</H1><H1>Aggregate third party debt of related CFCs + X </H1><H2>Related CFC assets</H2><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG></ITAG> </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">Guidance concerning the solution of this equation is set forth in<T3>Example</T3> (2) of andSection; 1.861-12(k). (C) <T3>Computation of interest income received on excess related party indebtedness.</T3>The amount of interest income received on excess related person indebtednessequals the total interest income on related person indebtedness derivedby the related United States shareholder during the taxable year multipliedby the ratio of excess related person indebtedness over the aggregate relatedperson indebtedness for the taxable year. (v) <T3>Step 5: Determine the aggregate amount of related controlled foreigncorporation obligations held by the related United States shareholder ineach limitation category.</T3> The aggregate amount of related controlledforeign corporation obligations held by the related United States shareholderin each limitation category equals the sum of the value of all such obligationsin each limitation category. Solely for purposes of this paragraph (e)(1)(v),each debt obligation in a related controlled foreign corporation held bya related United States shareholder shall be attributed to separate limitationcategories in the same manner as the stock of the obligor would be attributedunder the rules of andSection; 1.861-12T(c)(3), whether or nor such stockis held directly by such related United States shareholder. (vi) <T3>6: Direct allocation of United States shareholder third party interestexpense. </T3>Third party interest expense of the related United Statesshareholder equal to the amount of interest income received on excess relatedperson indebtedness as determined in step 4 shall be allocated among thevarious separate limitation categories in proportion to the relative aggregateamount of related controlled foreign corporation obligations held by therelated United States shareholder in each such category, as determinedunder step 5. The remaining portion of third party interest expense willbe apportioned as provided in andSection;andSection; 1.861-8T through 1.861-13T,excluding this paragraph. (2) <T3>Definitions</T3>_(i) <T3>United States shareholder.</T3> For purposes of this paragraph, theterm ``United States shareholder'' has the same meaning as defined by section957, except that, in the case of a United States shareholder that is amember an affiliated group (as defined in andSection; 1.861-11T(d)), theentire affiliated group shall be considered to constitute a single UnitedStates shareholder. The term ``related United States shareholder'' is theUnited States shareholder (as defined in this paragraph (e)(2)(i)) withrespect to which related controlled foreign corporations (as defined inparagraph (e)(2)(ii) of this section) are related within the meaning ofthat paragraph. (ii) <T3>Related controlled foreign corporation.</T3> For purposes of this section,the term ``related controlled foreign corporation'' means any controlledforeign corporation which is a related person (as defined in andSection;1.861-8T(c)(2)) to a United States shareholder (as defined paragraph (e)(2)(i)of this section). (iii) <T3>Value of assets and amount of liabilities.</T3> For purposes of thissection, the value of assets is determined under andSection; 1.861-9T(g).Thus, in the case of assets that are denominated in foreign currency, theaverage of the beginning-of-year and end-of-year values is determined inforeign currency and translated into dollars using exchange rates on thelast day of the related United States shareholder's taxable year. In thecase of liabilities that are denominated in foreign currency, the averagemonth-end debt level of such liabilities is determined in foreign currencyand then translated into dollars using exchange rates on the last day ofthe related United States shareholder's taxable year. (3) <T3>Treatment of certain stock.</T3> To the extent that there is insufficientrelated person indebtedness of all related controlled foreign corporationsunder step 3 in paragraph (e)(1)(iii) of this section to achieve as equalratio in step 4 of paragraph (e)(1)(iv) of this section, certain stockheld by the related United States shareholder will be treated as relatedperson indebtedness. Such stock includes_ (i) Any stock in the related controlled foreign corporation that is treatedin the same manner as debt under the law of any foreign country that grantsa deduction for interest or original issue discount relating to such stock,and (ii) Any stock in a related controlled foreign corporation that has madeloans to, or held stock described in this paragraph (e)(3) in, anotherrelated controlled foreign corporation. However, such stock shall be treatedas related person indebtedness only to the extent of the principal amountof such loans.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">For purposes of computing income from excess related person indebtednessin step 4 of paragraph (e)(1)(iv) of this section, stock that is treatedunder this paragraph as related person indebtedness shall be consideredto yield interest in an amount equal to the interest that would be computedon an equal amount of indebtedness under section 1274. Only dividends actuallypaid thereon shall be included in gross income for other purposes. (4) <T3>Adjustments to assets in apportioning other interest expense.</T3>In apportioning interest expense under andSection; 1.861-9T, the value ofassets in each separate limitation category for the taxable year as determinedunder andSection; 1.861-9T(g)(3) shall be reduced (but not below zero) bythe principal amount of third party indebtedness of the related UnitedStates shareholder the interest expense on which is allocated to each suchcategory under paragraph (e)(1) of this section. (5) <T3>Exceptions</T3>_(i) <T3>Per company rule.</T3> If_ (A) A related controlled foreign corporation with obligations owing toa related United States shareholder has a greater proportion of passiveassets than the proportion of passive assets held by the related UnitedStates shareholder, (B) Such passive assets are held in liquid or short term investments, and(C) There are frequent cash transfers between the related controlled foreigncorporation and the related United States shareholder,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">the Commissioner, in his discretion, may choose to exclude such acorporation from other related controlled foreign corporations in the applicationof the rules of this paragraph (e). (ii) <T3>Aggregate rule.</T3> If it is determined that, in aggregate, the applicationof the rules of this paragraph (e) increases a taxpayer's foreign tax creditas determined under section 901(a), the Commissioner, in his discretion,may choose not to apply the rules of this paragraph. If the Commissionerexercises discretion under this paragraph (e)(5)(ii), then paragraph (e)shall not apply to any extent to any interest expense of the taxpayer.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1.861-11T</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Special rules for allocating and apportioning interest expense ofan affiliated group of corporations (Temporary regulations.)</ITAG>(a) <T3>In general. </T3>Sections 1.861-9T, 1.861-10T, 1.861-12T, and 1.861-13Tprovide rules that are generally applicable in apportioning interest expense.The rules of this section relate to affiliated groups of corporations andimplement section 864(e) (1) and (5), which requires affiliated group allocationand apportionment of interest expense. The rules of this section applyto taxable years beginning after December 31, 1986, except as otherwiseprovided in andSection; 1.861-13T. Paragraph (b) of this section describesthe scope of the application of the rule for the allocation and apportionmentof interest expense of affiliated groups of corporations, which is containedin paragraph (c) of this section. Paragraph (d) of this section sets forththe definition of the term ``affiliated group'' for purposes of this section.Paragraph (e) describes the treatment of loans between members of an affiliatedgroup. Paragraph (f) of this section provides rules concerning the affiliatedgroup allocation and apportionment of interest expense in computing thecombined taxable income of a FSC or DISC and its related supplier. Paragraph(g) of this section describes the treatment of losses caused by apportionmentof interest expense in the case of an affiliated group that does not filea consolidated return.(b) <T3>Scope of application</T3>_(1) <T3>Application of section 864(e) (1) and (5) (concerning the definitionand treatment of affiliated groups).</T3> Section 864(e) (1) and (5) andthe portions of this section implementing section 864(e) (1) and (5) applyto the computation of foreign source taxable income for purposes of section904 (relating to various limitations on the foreign tax credit). Section904 imposes separate foreign tax credit limitations on passive income,high withholding interest income, financial services income, shipping income,income consisting of dividends from each noncontrolled section 902 corporation,income consisting of dividends from a DISC or former DISC, taxable incomeattributable to foreign trade income within the meaning of section 923(b),distributions from a FSC or former FSC, and all other forms of foreignsource income not enumerated above (``general limitation income''). Section864(e) (1) and (5) and the portions of this section implementing section864(e) (1) and (5) also apply in connection with section 907 to determinereductions in the amount allowed as a foreign tax credit under section901. Section 864(e) (1) and (5) and the portions of this section implementingsection 864(e) (1) and (5) also apply to the computation of the combinedtaxable income of the related supplier and a foreign sales corporation(FSC) (under sections 921 through 927) as well as the combined taxableincome of the related supplier and a domestic international sales corporation(DISC) (under sections 991 through 997).(2) <T3>Nonapplication of section 864(e) (1) and (5) (concerning the definitionand treatment of affiliated groups). </T3>Section 864(e) (1) and (5) andthe portions of this section implementing section 864(e) (1) and (5) donot apply to the computation of subpart F income of controlled foreigncorporations (under sections 951 through 964), the computation of combinedtaxable income of a possessions corporation and its affiliates (under section936), or the computation of effectively connected taxable income of foreigncorporations. For the rules with respect to the allocation and apportionmentof interest expenses of foreign corporations other than controlled foreigncorporations, see andSection;andSection; 1.882-4 and 1.882-5.(c) <T3>General rule for affiliated corporations. </T3>Except as otherwiseprovided in this section, the taxable income of each member of an affiliatedgroup within each statutory grouping shall be determined by allocatingand apportioning the interest expense of each member according to apportionmentfractions which are computed as if all members of such group were a singlecorporation. For purposes of determining these apportionment fractions,stock in corporations within the affiliated group (as defined in section864(e)(5) and the rules of this section) shall not be taken into account.In the case of an affiliated group of corporations that files a consolidatedreturn, consolidated foreign tax credit limitations are computed for thegroup in accordance with the rules of andSection; 1.1502-4. Except as otherwiseprovided, all the interest expense of all members of the group will betreated as definitely related and therefore allocable to all the grossincome of the members of the group and all the assets of all the membersof the group shall be taken into account in apportioning this interestexpense. For purposes of this section, the term ``taxpayer'' refers tothe affiliated group (regardless of whether the group files a consolidatedreturn), rather than to the separate members thereof.(d) <T3>Definition of affiliated group_</T3>(1) <T3>General rule. </T3>For purposes of the section, in general, the term``affiliated group'' has the same meaning as is given that term by section1504, except that section 936 companies are also included within the affiliatedgroup. Section 1504(a) defines an affiliated group as one or more chainsof includible corporations connected through 80-percent stock ownershipwith a common parent corporation which is an includible corporation (asdefined in section 1504(b)). In the case of a corporation that either becomesor ceases to be a member of the group during the course of the corporation'staxable year, only the interest expense incurred by the group member duringthe period of membership shall be allocated and apportioned as if all membersof the group were a single corporation. In this regard, assets held duringthe period of membership shall be taken into account. Other interest expenseincurred by the group member during its taxable year but not during theperiod of membership shall be allocated and apportioned without regardto other members of the group.(2) <T3>Inclusion of section 936 corporations_</T3>(i) The exclusion from theaffiliated group of section 936 corporations under section 1504(b)(4) isinoperative for purposes of this section. Thus, a possessions corporationmeeting the ownership requirements of section 1504(a) with respect to whichan election under section 936 is in effect for the taxable year is a memberof the affiliated group.<ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) <T3>Example_</T3>(A) <T3>Facts. </T3>X is the common parent of Y and Z. XY constitutes an affiliatedgroup of corporations within the meaning of section 1504(a) and uses thetax book value method of apportionment. Y owns all the stock of Z, a possessionscorporation with respect to which an election under section 936 is in effectfor the taxable year. Z manufactures widgets in Puerto Rico. Y purchasesthese widgets and markets them exclusively in the United States. Of thethree corporations, only Z has foreign source income, which includes bothqualified possessions source investment income and general limitation income.For purposes of section 904, Z's qualified possessions source investmentincome constitutes foreign source passive income. In computing the section936 benefit, Y and Z have elected the cost sharing method. Of the threecorporations, only X has debt and, thus, only X incurs interest expense.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(B) <T3>Analysis. </T3>As provided in paragraph (b)(2) of this section, sections864(e)(1) and (5) do not apply in the computation of benefits under section936(h). The effect of including Z in the affiliated group relates to thefact that X, the only debtor corporation in the group, must, under theasset method described in andSection; 1.861-9T(g), apportion a part of itsinterest expense to foreign source passive income and foreign source generallimitation income. This is because the assets of Z that generate qualifiedpossessions source investment income and general limitation income areincluded in computing the group apportionment fractions. The result isthat, under section 904(f), X has an overall foreign loss in both the passiveand general limitation categories, which currently offsets domestic incomeand must be recaptured against any subsequent years' foreign passive incomeand general limitation income, respectively, under the rules of that section.</ITAG>(3) <T3>Treatment of life insurance companies subject to taxation under section801_</T3>(i) <T3>General rule. </T3>A life insurance company that is subject to taxationunder section 801 shall be considered to constitute a member of the affiliatedgroup composed of companies not taxable under section 801 only if a parentcorporation so elects under section 1504(c)(2)(A) of the Code. If a parentdoes not so elect, no adjustments shall be required with respect to suchan insurance company under paragraph (g) of this section.(ii) <T3>Treatment of stock. </T3>Stock of a life insurance company that issubject to taxation under section 801 that is not included in an affiliatedgroup shall be disregarded in the allocation and apportionment of the interestexpense of such affiliated group.(4) <T3>Treatment of certain financial corporations_</T3>(i) <T3>In general. </T3>In the case of an affiliated group (as defined inparagraph (d)(1) of this section), any member that constitutes financialcorporations as defined in paragraph (d)(4)(ii) of this section shall betreated as a separate affiliated group consisting of financial corporations(the ``financial group''). The members of the group that do not constitutefinancial corporations shall be treated as members of a separate affiliatedgroup consisting of nonfinancial corporations (``the nonfinancial group'').(ii) <T3>Financial corporation defined. </T3>The term ``financial corporation''means any corporation which meets all of the following conditions:(A) It is described in section 581 (relating to the definition of a bank)or section 591 (relating to the deduction for dividends paid on depositsby mutual savings banks, cooperative banks, domestic building and loanassociations, and other savings institutions chartered and supervised assavings and loan or similar associations);(B) Its business is predominantly with persons other than related persons(within the meaning of section 864(d)(4) and the regulations thereunder)or their customers; and(C) It is required by state or Federal law to be operated separately fromany other entity which is not such an institution.(iii) <T3>Treatment of bank holding companies. </T3>The total aggregate interestexpense of any member of an affiliated group that constitutes a bank holdingcompany subject to regulation under the Bank Holding Company Act of 1956shall be prorated between the financial group and the nonfinancial groupon the basis of the assets in the financial and nonfinancial groups. Forpurposes of making this proration, the assets of each member of each group,and not the stock basis in each member, shall be taken into account. Anydirect or indirect subsidiary of a bank holding company that is predominantlyengaged in the active conduct of a banking, financing, or similar businessshall be considered to be a financial corporation for purposes of thisparagraph (d)(4). The interest expense of the bank holding company mustbe further apportioned in accordance with andSection; 1.861-9T(f) to thevarious section 904(d) categories of income contained in both the financialgroup and the nonfinancial group on the basis of the assets owned by eachgroup. For purposes of computing the apportionment fractions for each group,the assets owned directly by a bank holding company within each limitationcategory described in section 904(d)(1) (other than stock in affiliatesor assets described in andSection; 1.861-9T(f)) shall be treated as ownedpro rata by the nonfinancial group and the financial group based on therelative amounts of investments of the bank holding company in the nonfinancialgroup and financial group.(iv) <T3>Consideration of stock of the members of one group held by membersof the other group. </T3>In apportioning interest expense, the nonfinancialgroup shall not take into account the stock of any lower-tier corporationthat is treated as a member of the financial group under paragraph (d)(4)(i)of this section. Conversely, in apportioning interest expense, the financialgroup shall not take into account the stock of any lower-tier corporationthat is treated as a member of the nonfinancial group under paragraph (d)(4)(i)of this section. For the treatment of loans between members of the financialgroup and members of the nonfinancial group, see paragraph (e)(1) of thissection.<ITAG tagnum="21">(5) <T3>Example_</T3>(i) <T3>Facts. </T3>X, a domestic corporation which is not a bank holding company,is the parent of domestic corporations Y and Z. Z owns 100 percent of thestock Z1, which is also a domestic corporation. X, Y, Z, and Z1 were organizedafter January 1, 1987, and constitute an affiliated group within the meaningof paragraph (d)(1) of this section. Y and Z are financial corporationsdescribed in paragraph (d)(4) of this section. X also owns 25 percent ofthe stock of A, a domestic corporation. Y owns 25 percent of the votingstock of B, a foreign corporation that is not a controlled foreign corporation.Z owns less than 10 percent of the voting stock of C, another foreign corporation.The foreign source income generated by Y's or Z's direct assets is exclusivelyfinancial services income. The foreign source income generated by X's orZ1's direct assets is exclusively general limitation income. X and Z1 arenot financial corporations described in paragraph (d)(4)(ii) of this section.Y and Z, therefore, constitute a separate affiliated group apart from Xand Z1 for purposes of section 864(e). The combined interest expense ofY and Z of $100,000 ($50,000 each) is apportioned separately on the basisof their assets. The combined interest expense of X and Z1 of $50,000 ($25,000each) is allocated on the basis of the assets of the XZ1 group.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L0,tp0,p8,8/9,g1,t1,i1,s25,10</C> <H1> </H1><H1> </H1><ITAG tagnum="21">Analysis of the YZ group assets</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Adjusted basis of assets of the YZ group that generate foreign sourcefinancial services income (excluding stock of foreign subsidiaries notincluded in the YZ affiliated group)<D>$200,000</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Z's basis in the C stock (not adjusted by the allocable amount of C'searnings and profits because Z owns less than 10 percent of the stock)which would be considered to generate passive income in the hands of anonfinancial services entity but is considered to generate financial servicesincome when in the hands of Z, a financial services entity<D>$100,000</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Y's basis in the B stock (adjusted by the allocable amount of B's earningsand profits) which generates dividends subject to a separate limitationfor B dividends<D>$100,000</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Adjusted basis of assets of the YZ group that generate U.S. sourceincome<D>$600,000</D><R>n,s</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Total assets<D>$1,000,000</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Analysis of the XZ1 group assets</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Adjusted basis of assets of the XZ1 group that generate foreign sourcegeneral limitation income<D>$500,000</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Adjusted basis of assets of the XZ1 group other than A stock that generatedomestic source income<D>$1,900,000</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">X's basis in the A stock adjusted by the allocable amount of A's earningsand profits<D>$100,000</D><R>n,s</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Total domestic assets<D>$2,000,000</D><R>n,s</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Total assets<D>$2,500,000</D></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) <T3>Allocation. </T3>No portion of the $50,000 deduction of the YZ groupis definitely related solely to specific property within the meaning ofandSection; 1.861-10T. Thus, the YZ group's deduction for interest is relatedto all its activities and properties. Similarly, no portion of the $50,000deduction of the XZ1 group is definitely related solely to specific propertywithin the meaning of andSection; 1.861-10T. Thus, the XZ1 group's deductionfor interest is related to all its activities and properties.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) <T3>Apportionment. </T3>The YZ group would apportion its interest expenseas follows:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">To gross financial services income from sources outside the UnitedStates:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>5,L1(0,0,0),b1,tp0,p8,8/1,g1,t1,7,1,10,9,7</C> <H1>$50,000</H1><H1>andmultiply;</H1><H1>$300,000</H1><H2>$1,000,000</H2><H1> . . . . . .</H1><H1>$15,000</H1><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">To gross income subject to a separate limitation for dividends fromB:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C/> <H1>$50,000</H1><H1>andmultiply;</H1><H1>$100,000</H1><H2>$1,000,000</H2><H1> . . . . . .</H1><H1>$5,000</H1><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">To gross income from sources inside the United States:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C/> <H1>$50,000</H1><H1>andmultiply;</H1><H1>$600,000</H1><H2>$1,000,000</H2><H1> . . . . . .</H1><H1>$30,000</H1><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The XZ1 group would apportion its interest expense as follows:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">To gross general limitation income from sources outside the UnitedStates:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C/> <H1>$50,000</H1><H1>andmultiply;</H1><H1>$500,000</H1><H2>$2,500,000</H2><H1> . . . . . .</H1><H1>$10,000</H1><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">To gross income from sources inside the United States:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>5,L1(0,0,0),b1,tp0,p8,8/1,g1,t1,7,1,10,9,7</C> <H1>$50,000</H1><H1>andmultiply;</H1><H1>$2,000,000</H1><H2>$2,500,000</H2><H1> . . . . . .</H1><H1>$40,000</H1><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG></ITAG>(6) <T3>Certain unaffiliated corporations. </T3>Certain corporations that arenot described in paragraph (d)(1) of this section will nonetheless be consideredto constitute affiliated corporations for purposes of andSection;andSection;1.861-9T through 1.861-13T. These corporations include:(i) Any includible corporation (as defined in section 1504(b) without regardto section 1504(b)(4)) if 80 percent of either the vote or value of alloutstanding stock of such corporation is owned directly or indirectly byan includible corporation or by members of an affiliated group, and(ii) Any foreign corporation if 80 percent of either the vote or valueof all outstanding stock of such corporation is owned directly or indirectlyby members of an affiliated group, and if more than 50 percent of the grossincome of such corporation for the taxable year is effectively connectedwith the conduct of a United States trade or business. If 80 percent ormore of the gross income of such corporation is effectively connected income,then all the assets of such corporation and all of its interest expenseshall be taken into account. If between 50 and 80 percent of the grossincome of such corporation is effectively connected income, then only theassets of such corporation that generate effectively connected income anda percentage of its interest expense equal to the percentage of its assetsthat generate effectively connected income shall be taken into account.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">The attribution rules of section 318 shall apply in determining indirectownership under this paragraph (d)(6). The Commissioner shall have theauthority to disregard trusts, partnerships, and pass-through entitiesthat break affiliated status. Corporations described in this paragraph(d)(6) shall be considered to constitute members of an affiliated groupthat does not file a consolidated return and shall therefore be subjectto the limitations imposed under paragraph (g) of this section. The affiliatedgroup filing a consolidated return shall be considered to constitute asingle corporation for purposes of applying the rules of paragraph (g)of this section.(e) <T3>Loans between members of an affiliated group_</T3>(1) <T3>General rule. </T3>In the case of loans (including any receivable)between members of an affiliated group, as defined in paragraph (d) ofthis section, for purposes of apportioning interest expense, the indebtednessof the member borrower shall not be considered an asset of the member lender.However, in the case of members of separate financial and nonfinancialgroups under paragraph (d)(4) of this section, the indebtedness of themember borrower shall be considered an asset of the member lender and suchasset shall be characterized by reference to the member lender's incomefrom the asset as determined under paragraph (e)(2)(ii) of this section.For purposes of this paragraph (e), the terms ``related person interestincome'' and ``related person interest payment'' refer to interest paidand received by members of the same affiliated group as defined in paragraph(d) of this section.(2) <T3>Treatment of interest expense within the affiliated group_</T3>(i)<T3>General rule. </T3>A member borrower shall deduct related person interestpayments in the same manner as unrelated person interest expense usinggroup apportionment fractions computed under andSection; 1.861-9T(f). A memberlender shall include related person interest income in the same class ofgross income as the class of gross income from which the member borrowerdeducts the related person interest payment.(ii) <T3>Special rule for loans between financial and nonfinancial affiliatedcorporations. </T3>In the case of a loan between two affiliated corporationsonly one of which constitutes a financial corporation under paragraph (d)(4)of this section, the member borrower shall allocate and apportion relatedperson interest payments in the same manner as unrelated person interestexpense using group apportionment fractions computed under andSection; 1.861-9T(f).The source of the related person interest income to the member lender shallbe determined under section 861(a)(1).(iii) <T3>Special rule for high withholding tax interest. </T3>In the case ofan affiliated corporation that pays interest that is high withholding taxinterest under andSection; 1.904-5(f)(1) to another affiliated corporation,the interest expense of the payor shall be allocated to high withholdingtax interest.(3) <T3>Back-to-back loans. </T3>If a member of the affiliated group makesa loan to a nonmember who makes a loan to a member borrower, the rule ofparagraphs (e) (1) and (2) of this section shall apply, in the Commissioner'sdiscretion, as if the member lender made the loan directly to the memberborrower, provided that the loans constitute a back-to-back loan transaction.Such loans will constitute a back-to-back loan for purposes of this paragraph(e) if the loan by the nonmember would not have been made or maintainedon substantially the same terms irrespective of the loan of funds by thelending member to the nonmember or other intermediary party.(4) <T3>Examples. </T3>The rules of this paragraph (e) may be illustrated bythe following examples.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (1).</T3> X, a domestic corporation, is the parent of Y, adomestic corporation. X and Y were organized after January 1, 1987, andconstitute an affiliated group within the meaning of paragraph (d)(1) ofthis section. Among X's assets is the note of Y for the amount of $100,000.Because X and Y are members of an affiliated group, Y's note does not constitutean asset for purposes of apportionment. The apportionment fractions forthe relevant tax year of the XY group are 50 percent domestic, 40 percentforeign general, and 10 percent foreign passive. Y deducts its relatedperson interest payment using those apportionment fractions. Of the $10,000in related person interest income received by X, $5,000 consists of domesticsource income, $4,000 consists of foreign general limitation income, and$1,000 consists of foreign passive income.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (2)</T3>. X is a domestic corporation organized after January1, 1987. X owns all the stock of Y, a domestic corporaiton. On June 1,1987, X loans $100,000 to Z, an unrelated person. On June 2, 1987, Z makesa loan to Y with terms substantially similar to those of the loan fromX to Z. Based on the facts and circumstances of the transaction, it isdetermined that Z would not have made the loan to Y on the same terms ifX had not made the loan to Z. Because the transaction constitutes a back-to-backloan, as defined in paragraph (e)(3) of this section, the Commissionermay require, in his discretion, that neither the note of Y nor the noteof Z may be considered an asset of X for purposes of this section.</ITAG>(f) <T3>Computations of combined taxable income. </T3>In the computation ofthe combined taxable income of any FSC or DISC and its related supplierwhich is a member of an affiliated group under the pricing rules of sections925 or 994, the combined taxable income of such FSC or DISC and its relatedsupplier shall be reduced by the portion of the total interest expenseof the affiliated group that is incurred in connection with those assetsof the group used in connection with export sales involving that FSC orDISC. This amount shall be computed by multiplying the total interest expenseof the affiliated group and interest expense of the FSC or DISC by a fractionthe numerator of which is the assets of the affiliated group and of theFSC or DISC generating foreign trade income or gross income attributableto qualified export receipts, as the case may be, and the denominator ofwhich is the total assets of the affiliated group and the FSC or DISC.Under this rule, interest of other group members may be attributed to thecombined taxable income of a FSC or DISC and its related supplier withoutaffecting the amount of interest otherwise deductible by the FSC or DISC,the related supplier or other member of the affiliated group. The FSC orDISC is entitled to only the statutory portion of the combined taxableincome, net of any deemed interest expense, which determines the commissionpaid to the FSC or DISC or the transfer price of qualifying export propertysold to the FSC or DISC.(g) <T3>Losses created through apportionment</T3>_(1) <T3>General rules. </T3>In the case of an affiliated group that is eligibleto file, but does not file, a consolidated return and in the case of anycorporation described in paragraph (d)(6) of this section, the foreigntax credits in any separate limitation category are limited to the creditscomputed under the rules of this paragraph (g). As a consequence of theaffiliated group allocation and apportionment of interest expense requiredby section 864(e)(1) and this section, interest expense of a group membermay be apportioned for section 904 purposes to a limitation category inwhich that member has no gross income, resulting in a loss in that limitationcategory. The same is true in connection with any expense other than interestthat is subject to apportionment under the rules of section 864(e)(6) ofthe Code. Any reference to ``interest expense'' in this paragraph (g) shallbe treated as including such expenses. For purposes of this paragraph,the term ``limitation category'' includes domestic source income, as wellas the types of income described in section 904(d)(1) (A) through (I).A loss of one affiliate in a limitation category will reduce the incomeof another member in the same limitation category if a consolidated returnis filed. (See andSection; 1.1502-4.) If a consolidated return is not filed,this netting does not occur. Accordingly, in such a case, the followingadjustments among members are required in order to give effect to the groupallocation of interest expense:(i) Losses created through group apportionment of interest expense in oneor more limitation categories within a given member must be eliminated;and(ii) A corresponding amount of income of other members in the same limitationcategory must be recharacterized.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">Such adjustments shall be accomplished, in accordance with paragraph(g)(2) of this section, without changing the total taxable income of anymember and before the application of section 904(f). Section 904(f) (includingsection 904(f)(5)) does not apply to a loss created through the apportionmentof interest expense to the extent that the loss is eliminated pursuantto paragraph (g)(2)(ii) of this section. For purposes of this section,the terms ``limitation adjustment'' and ``recharacterization'' mean therecharacterization of income in one limitation category as income in anotherlimitation category.(2) <T3>Mechanics of computation</T3>_(i) <T3>Step 1: Computation of consolidated taxable income. </T3>The membersof an affiliated group must first allocate and apportion all other deductibleexpenses other than interest. The members must then deduct from their respectivegross incomes within each limitation category interest expense apportionedunder the rules of andSection; 1.861-9T(f). The taxable income of the entireaffiliated group within each limitation category is then totalled.(ii) <T3>Step 2: Loss offset adjustments. </T3>If, after step 1, a member haslosses in a given limitation category or limitation categories createdthrough apportionment of interest expense, any such loss (<T3>i.e.</T3>, the portion of such loss equal to interest expense) shallbe eliminated by offsetting that loss against taxable income in other limitationcategories of that member to the extent of the taxable income of othermembers within the same limitation category as the loss. If the memberhas taxable income in more than one limitation category, then the lossshall offset taxable income in all such limitation categories on a prorata basis. If there is insufficient domestic income of the member to offsetthe net losses in all foreign limitation categories caused by the apportionmentof interest expense, the losses in each limitation category shall be recharacterizedas domestic losses to the extent of the taxable income of other membersin the same respective limitation categories. After these adjustments aremade, the income of the entire affiliated group within each limitationcategory is totalled again.(iii) <T3>Step 3: Determination of amount subject to recharacterization. </T3>Inorder to determine the amount of income to be recharacterized in step 4,the income totals computed under step 1 in each limitation category shallbe subtracted from the income totals computed under step 2 in each limitationcategory.(iv) <T3>Step 4: Recharacterization. </T3>Because any differences determinedunder step 3 represent deviations from the consolidated totals computedunder Step 1, such differences (in any limitation category) must be eliminated.(A) <T3>Limitation categories to be reduced. </T3>In the case of any limitationcategory in which there is a positive change, the income of group memberswith income in that limitation category must be reduced on a pro rata basis(by reference to net income figures as determined under Step 2) to theextent of such positive change (``limitation reductions''). Each membershall separately compute the sum of the limitation reductions.(B) <T3>Limitation categories to be increased. </T3>In any case in which onlyone limitation category has a negative change in Step 3, the sum of thelimitation reductions within each member is added to that limitation category.In the case in which multiple limitation categories have negative changesin Step 3, the sum of the limitation reductions within each member is proratedamong the negative change limitation categories based on the ratio thatthe negative change for the entire group in each limitation category bearsto the total of all negative changes for the entire group in all limitationcategories.(3) <T3>Examples. </T3>The following examples illustrate the principles ofthis paragraph.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (1)</T3>_(i) <T3>Facts.</T3> X, a domestic corporation, is the parent of domestic corporationsY and Z. X, Y, and Z were organized after Janaury 1, 1987, constitute anaffiliated group within the meaning of paragraph (d)(1) of this section,but do not file a consolidated return. The XYZ group apportions its interestexpense on the basis of the fair market value of its assets. X, Y, andZ have the following assets, interest expense, and taxable income beforeapportioning interest expense:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>5,L2,b2,tp0,i1,s25,4.2,3.2,4.2,6</C> <H1>Assets</H1><H1>X</H1><H1>Y</H1><H1>Z</H1><H1>Total</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Domestic<D>2,000.00</D><D>0</D><D>1,000.00</D><D>3,000.00</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Foreign Passive<D>0</D><D>50.00</D><D>50.00</D><D>100.00</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Foreign General<D>0</D><D>700.00</D><D>200.00</D><D>900.00</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Interest expense<D>48.00</D><D>12.00</D><D>80.00</D><D>140.00</D></ITAG>Taxable Income (pre-interest):<ITAG tagnum="2">Domestic <D>100.00</D><D>0</D><D>63.00</D><D>163.00</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Foreign Passive<D>0</D><D>5.00</D><D>5.00</D><D>10.00</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Foreign General<D>0</D><D>60.00</D><D>35.00</D><D>95.00</D></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) <T3>Step 1: Computation of consolidated taxable income.</T3> Each memberof the XYZ group apportions its interest expense according to group apportionmentratios determined under the asset method decribed in andSection; 1.861-9T(f),yielding the following results:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>5,L2,b2,tp0,i1,s25,5,5,5,6</C> <H1>Apportioned interest expense</H1><H1>X</H1><H1>Y</H1><H1>Z</H1><H1>Total</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Domestic<D>36.00</D><D>9.00</D><D>60.00</D><D>105.00</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Foreign Passive<D>1.20</D><D>0.30 </D><D>2.00</D><D>3.50</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Foreign General<D>10.80</D><D>2.70</D><D>18.00</D><D>31.50</D><R>n,sandCx.3;</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">Total </ITAG><D>48.00</D><D>12.00</D><D>80.00</D><D>140.00</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The members of the group then compute taxable income within each categoryby deducting the apportioned interest expense from the amounts of pre-interesttaxable income specified in the facts in paragraph (i), yielding the followingresults:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>5,L2,b2,tp0,i1,s25,5,5,5,6</C> <H1>Taxable income</H1><H1>X</H1><H1>Y</H1><H1>Z</H1><H1>Total</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Domestic<D>64.00</D><D>^9.00</D><D>3.00</D><D>58.00</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Foreign Passive<D>^1.20</D><D>4.70</D><D>3.00</D><D>6.50</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Foreign General<D>^10.80</D><D>57.30</D><D>17.00</D><D>63.50</D><R>n,sandCx.3;</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">Total</ITAG><D>52.00</D><D>53.00</D><D>23.00</D><D>128.00</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) <T3>Step 2: Loss offset adjustments.</T3> Because X and Y have losses createdthrough apportionment, these losses must be eliminated by reducing taxableincome of the member in other limitation categories. Because X has a totalof $12 in apportionment losses and because it has only one limitation categorywith income (<T3>i.e.,</T3> domestic), domestic income must be reduced by $12, thuseliminating its apportionment losses. Because Y has a total of $9 in apportionmentlosses and because it has two limitation categories with income (<T3>i.e.,</T3> foreign passive and foreign general limitation), the incomein these two limitation categories must be reduced on a pro rata basisin order to eliminate its apportionment losses. In summary, the followingadjustments are required:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>5,L2,b2,tp0,i1,s25,6,6,4,6</C> <H1>Loss offset adjustments</H1><H1>X</H1><H1>Y</H1><H1>Z</H1><H1>Total</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Domestic<D>^12.00</D><D>+9.00</D><D>0</D><D>^3.00</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Foreign Passive<D>+1.20</D><D>^0.68</D><D>0</D><D>+0.52</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Foreign General<D>+10.80</D><D>^8.32</D><D>0</D><D>+2.48</D></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">These adjustments yield the following adjusted taxable income figures:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C/> <H1>Adjusted taxable income</H1><H1>X</H1><H1>Y</H1><H1>Z</H1><H1>Total</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Domestic<D>52.00</D><D>0</D><D>3.00</D><D>55.00</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Foreign Passive<D>0</D><D>4.02</D><D>3.00</D><D>7.02</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Foreign General<D>0</D><D>48.98</D><D>17.00</D><D>65.98</D><R>n,s,s,s,s</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">Total</ITAG><D>52.00</D><D>53.00</D><D>23.00</D><D>128.00</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iv) <T3>Step 3: Determination of amount subject to recharacterization. </T3>Theadjustments performed under Step 2 led to a change in the group's taxableincome within each limitation category. The total loss offset adjustmentscolumn shown in paragraph (iii) above shows the net deviations betweenStep 1 and 2.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(v) <T3>Step 4: Recharacterization. </T3>The loss offset adjustments yielda positive change in the foreign passive and the foreign general limitationcategories. Y and Z both have income in these limitation categories. Accordingly,the income of Y and Z in each of these limitation categories must be reducedon a pro rata basis (by reference to the adjusted taxable income figures)to the extent of the positive change in each limitation category. The totalpositive change in the foreign passive limitation category is $0.52. Theadjusted taxable income of Y in the foreign passive limitation categoryis $4.02 and the adjusted taxable income of Z in the foreign passive limitationcategory is $3. Therefore, $0.30 is drawn from Y and $0.22 is drawn fromZ. The total positive change in the foreign general limitation categoryis $2.48. The adjusted taxable income of Y in the foreign general limitationcategory is $48.98, and the adjusted tabable income of Z in the foreigngeneral limitation category is $17. Therefore, $1.84 is drawn from Y and$.64 is drawn from Z.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The members must then separately compute the sum of the limitationreductions. Y has limitation reductions of $0.30 in the foreign passivelimitation category and $1.84 in the foreign general limitation category,yielding total limitation reduction of $2.14. Under these facts, domesticincome is the only limitation category requiring a positive adjustment.Accordingly, Y's domestic income is increased by $2.14. Z has limitationreductions of $0.22 in the foreign passive limitation category and $0.64in the foreign general limitation category, yielding total limitation reductionsof $0.86. Under these facts, domestic income is the only limitation categoryof Z requiring a positive adjustment. Accordingly, Z's domestic incomeis increased by $0.86.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>5,L2,b2,tp0,i1,s25,4,5,5,5</C> <H1>Recharacterization adjustments</H1><H1>X</H1><H1>Y</H1><H1>Z</H1><H1>Total</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Domestic<D>0</D><D>+2.14</D><D>+0.86</D><D>+3.00</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Foreign Passive<D>0</D><D>^0.30</D><D>^0.22</D><D>^0.52</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Foreign General<D>0</D><D>^1.84</D><D>^0.64</D><D>^2.48</D></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">These recharacterization adjustments yield the following final taxableincome figures:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>5,L2,b2,tp0,i1,s25,3.2,5,5,6</C> <H1>Final taxable income</H1><H1>X</H1><H1>Y</H1><H1>Z</H1><H1>Total</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Domestic<D>52.00</D><D>2.14</D><D>3.86</D><D>58.00</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Foreign Passive<D>0</D><D>3.72</D><D>2.78</D><D>6.50</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Foreign General<D>0</D><D>47.14</D><D>16.36</D><D>63.50</D><R>n,sandCx.3;</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">Total</ITAG><D>52.00</D><D>53.00</D><D>23.00</D><D>128.00</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (2)</T3>_(i) <T3>Facts. </T3>X, a domestic corporation, is the parent of domestic corporationsY and Z. X, Y, and Z were organized after January 1, 1987, constitute anaffiliated group within the meaning of paragraph (d)(1) of this section,but do not file a consolidated return. Moreover, X has served as the soleborrower in the group and, as a result, has sustained an overall loss.The XYZ group apportions its interest expense on the basis of the fairmarket value of its assets. X, Y, and Z have the following assets, interestexpense, and taxable income before interest expense:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>5,L2,b2,tp0,i1,s25,6,5,5,6</C> <H1>Assets</H1><H1>X</H1><H1>Y</H1><H1>Z</H1><H1>Total</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Domestic<D>2,000</D><D>0</D><D>1,000</D><D>3,000</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Foreign Passive<D>0</D><D>50</D><D>50</D><D>100</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Foreign General<D>0</D><D>700</D><D>200</D><D>900</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Interest Expense<D>140</D><D>0</D><D>0</D><D>140</D></ITAG>Taxable Income (pre-interest):<ITAG tagnum="1">Domestic<D>100</D><D>0</D><D>100</D><D>200</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Foreign Passive<D>0</D><D>5</D><D>5</D><D>10</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Foreign General<D>0</D><D>70</D><D>35</D><D>105</D></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) <T3>Step 1: Computation of consolidated taxable income. </T3>Each memberof the XYZ group apportions its interest expense according to group apportionmentratios determined under the asset method described in andSection; 1.861-9T(g),yielding the following results:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>5,L2,b2,tp0,i1,s25,6,4,4,6</C> <H1>Apportioned interest expense</H1><H1>X</H1><H1>Y</H1><H1>Z</H1><H1>Total</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Domestic<D>105.00</D><D>0</D><D>0</D><D>105.00</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Foreign Passive<D>3.50</D><D>0</D><D>0</D><D>3.50</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Foreign General<D>31.50</D><D>0</D><D>0</D><D>31.50</D><R>n,sandCx.3;</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">Total</ITAG><D>140.00</D><D>0</D><D>0</D><D>140.00</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The members of the group then compute taxable income within each categoryby deducting the apportioned interest expense from the amounts of pre-interesttaxable income specified in the facts in paragraph (i), yielding the followingresults:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>5,L2,b2,tp0,i1,s25,6,3.2,6,6</C> <H1>Taxable income</H1><H1>X</H1><H1>Y</H1><H1>Z</H1><H1>Total</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Domestic<D>^5.00</D><D>0</D><D>100.00</D><D>95.00</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Foreign Passive<D>^3.50</D><D>5.00</D><D>5.00</D><D>6.50</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Foreign General<D>^31.50</D><D>70.00</D><D>35.00</D><D>73.50</D><R>n,sandCx.3;</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">Total</ITAG><D>^40.00</D><D>75.00</D><D>140.00</D><D>175.00</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iii) <T3>Step 2: Loss offset adjustment. </T3>Because X has insufficient domesticincome to offset the sum of the losses in the foreign limitation categoriescaused by apportionment, the amount of apportionment losses in each limitationcategory shall be recharacterized as domestic losses to the extent of taxableincome of other members in the same limitation category. This is accomplishedby adding to each foreign limitation categories an amount equal to theloss therein and by subtracting the sum of such foreign losses from domesticincome, as follows:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>5,L2,b2,tp0,i1,s25,6,4,4,6</C> <H1>Loss offset adjustments</H1><H1>X</H1><H1>Y</H1><H1>Z</H1><H1>Total</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Domestic<D>^35.00</D><D>0</D><D>0</D><D>^35.00</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Foreign Passive<D>+3.50</D><D>0</D><D>0</D><D>+3.50</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Foreign General<D>+31.50</D><D>0</D><D>0</D><D>+31.50</D></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">These adjustments yield the following adjusted taxable income figures:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>5,L2,b2,tp0,i1,s25,5,4,4,6</C> <H1>Adjusted taxable income</H1><H1>X</H1><H1>Y</H1><H1>Z</H1><H1>Total</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Domestic<D>^40</D><D>0</D><D>100</D><D>60</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Foreign Passive<D>0</D><D>5</D><D>5</D><D>10</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Foreign General<D>0</D><D>70</D><D>35</D><D>105</D><R>n,sandCx.3;</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">Total</ITAG><D>^40</D><D>75</D><D>140</D><D>175</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(iv) <T3>Step 3: Determination of amount subject to recharacterization. </T3>Theadjustments performed under Step 2 led to a change in the group's taxableincome within each limitation category. The total loss offset adjustmentcolumn shown in paragraph (iii) above shows the net deviations betweenSteps 1 and 2.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(v) <T3>Step 4: Recharacterization. </T3>The loss offset adjustments yielda positive change in the foreign passive and the foreign general limitationcategories. Y and Z both have income in these limitation categories. Accordingly,the income of Y and Z in each of these limitation categories must be reducedon a pro rata basis (by reference to the adjusted taxable income figures)to the extent of the positive change in each limitation category. The totalpositive change in the foreign passive limitation category is $3.50. Theadjusted taxable income of Y in the foreign passive limitation categoryis $5, and the adjusted taxable income of Z in the foreign passive limitationcategory is $5. Therefore, $1.75 is drawn from Y and $1.75 is drawn fromZ. The total positive change in the foreign general limitation categoryis $31.50. The adjusted taxable income of Y in the foreign general limitationcategory is $70, and the adjusted tabable income of Z in the foreign generallimitation category is $35. Therefore, $21 is drawn from Y and $10.50 isdrawn from Z.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The members must then separately compute the sum of the limitationreductions. Y has limitation reductions of $1.75 in the foreign passivelimitation category and $21 in the foreign general limitation category,yielding total limitation reductions of $22.75. Under these facts, domesticincome is the only limitation category requiring a positive adjustment.Accordingly, Y's domestic income is increased by $22.75. Z has limitationreductions of $1.75 in the foreign passive limitation category and $10.50in the foreign general limitation category, yielding total limitation reductionsof $12.25. Under these facts, domestic income is the only limitation categoryrequiring a positive adjustment. Accordingly, Z's domestic income is increasedby $12.25.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>5,L2,b2,tp0,i1,s25,4,6,6,6</C> <H1>Recharacterization adjustments</H1><H1>X</H1><H1>Y</H1><H1>Z</H1><H1>Total</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Domestic<D>0</D><D>+22.75</D><D>+12.25</D><D>+35.00</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Foreign Passive<D>0</D><D>^1.75</D><D>^1.75</D><D>^3.50</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Foreign General<D>0</D><D>^21.00</D><D>^10.50</D><D>^31.50</D></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">These recharacterization adjustments yield the following final taxableincome figures:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>5,L2,b2,tp0,i1,s25,4.2,5,6,6</C> <H1>Final taxable income</H1><H1>X</H1><H1>Y</H1><H1>Z</H1><H1>Total</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Domestic<D>^40.00</D><D>22.75</D><D>112.25</D><D>95.00</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Foreign Passive<D>0</D><D>3.25</D><D>3.25</D><D>6.50</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Foreign General<D>0</D><D>49.00</D><D>24.50</D><D>73.50</D><R>n,sandCx.3;</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">Total</ITAG><D>^40.00</D><D>75.00</D><D>140.00</D><D>175.00</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1.861-12T</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Characterization rules and adjustments for certain assets (Temporaryregulations.)</ITAG>(a) <T3>In general. </T3>These rules are applicable to taxpayers in apportioningexpenses under an asset method to income in various separate limitationcategories under section 904(d), and supplement other rules provided inandSection;andSection; 1.861-9T, 1.861-10T, and 1.861-11T. The rules of thissection apply to taxable years beginning after December 31, 1986, exceptas otherwise provided in andSection;1.861-13T. Paragraph (b) of this sectiondescribes the treatment of inventories. Paragraph (c)(1) of this sectionconcerns the treatment of various stock assets. Paragraph (c)(2) of thissection describes a basis adjustment for stock in nonaffiliated 10 percentowned corporations. Paragraph (c)(3) of this section sets forth rules forcharacterizing the stock in controlled foreign corporations. Paragraph(c)(4) of this section describes the treatment of stock of noncontrolledsection 902 corporations. Paragraph (d)(1) of this section concerns thetreatment of notes. Paragraph (d)(2) of this section concerns the treatmentof the notes of controlled foreign corporations. Paragraph (e) of thissection describes the treatment of certain portfolio securities that constituteinventory or generate income primarily in the form of gains. Paragraph(f) of this section describes the treatment of assets that are subjectto the capitalization rules of section 263A. Paragraph (g) of this sectionconcerns the treatment of FSC stock and of assets of the related suppliergenerating foreign trade income. Paragraph (h) of this section concernsthe treatment of DISC stock and of assets of the related supplier generatingqualified export receipts. Paragraph (i) of this section is reserved. Paragraph(j) of this section sets forth an example illustrating the rules of thissection, as well as the rules of andSection; 1.861-9T(g). (b) <T3>Inventories. </T3>Inventory must be characterized by reference to thesource and character of sales income, or sales receipts in the case ofLIFO inventory, from that inventory during the taxable year. If a taxpayermaintains separate inventories for any federal tax purpose, including therules for establishing pools of inventory items under sections 472 and474 of the Code, each separate inventory shall be separately characterizedin accordance with the previous sentence. (c) <T3>Treatment of stock_</T3>(1) <T3>In general. </T3>Subject to the adjustment and special rules of paragraphs(c) and (e) of this section, stock in a corporation is taken into accountin the application of the asset method described in andSection; 1.861-9T(g).However, an affiliated group (as defined in andSection; 1.861-11T(d)) doesnot take into account the stock of any member in the application of theasset method. (2) <T3>Basis adjustment for stock in nonaffiliated 10 percent owned corporations_</T3>(i)<T3>Taxpayers using the tax book value method. </T3>For purposes of apportioningexpenses on the basis of the tax book value of assets, the adjusted basisof any stock in a 10 percent owned corporation owned directly by the taxpayershall be_ (A) Increased by the amount of the earnings and profits of such corporation(and of lower-tier 10 percent owned corporations) attributable to suchstock and accumulated during the period the taxpayer or other members ofits affiliated group held 10 percent or more of such stock, or (B) Reduced (but not below zero) by any deficit in earnings and profitsof such corporation (and of lower-tier 10 percent owned corporations) attributableto such stock for such period.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">Solely for purposes of this section, a taxpayer's basis in the stockof a controlled foreign corporation shall not include any amount includedin basis under section 961 or 1293(d) of the Code. For purposes of thisparagraph (c)(2), earnings and profits and deficits are computed underthe rules of section 312 and, in the case of a foreign corporation, section902 and the regulations thereunder for taxable years of the 10 percentowned corporation ending on or before the close of the taxable year ofthe taxpayer. The rules of section 1248 and the regulations thereundershall apply to determine the amount of earnings and profits that is attributableto stock without regard to whether earned and profits (or deficits) werederived (or incurred) during taxable years beginning before or after December31, 1962. This adjustment is to be made annually and is noncumulative.Thus, the adjusted basis of the stock (determined without prior years'adjustments under this section) is to be adjusted annually by the amountof accumulated earnings and profits (or any deficit) attributable to suchstock as of the end of each year. Earnings and profits or deficits of aqualified business unit that has a functional currency other than the dollarmust be computed under this paragraph (c)(2) in functional currency andtranslated into dollars using the exchange rate at the end of the taxpayer'scurrent taxable year with respect to which interest is being allocated(and not the exchange rates for the years in which the earnings and profitsor deficits were derived or incurred). (ii) <T3>10 percent owned corporation defined_</T3>(A) <T3>In general. </T3>The term ``10 percent owned corporation'' means anycorporation (domestic or foreign)_ (<T3>1</T3>) Which is not included within the taxpayer's affiliated groupas defined in andSection;1.861-11T(d) (1) or (6).(<T3>2</T3>) In which the members of the taxpayer's affiliated group owndirectly or indirectly 10 percent or more of the total combined votingpower of all classes of the stock entitled to vote, and    (<T3>3</T3>) Which is taken into account for purposes of apportionment.  (B) <T3>Rule of attribution. </T3>Stock that is owned by a corporation, partnership,or trust shall be treated as being indirectly owned proportionately byits shareholders, partners, or beneficiaries. For this purpose, a partner'sinterest in stock held by a partnership shall be determined by referenceto the partner's distributive share of partnership income.   (iii) <T3>Earnings and profits of lower-tier corporations taken into account.</T3>For purposes of the adjustment to the basis of the stock of the 10percent owned corporation owned by the taxpayer under paragraph (c)(2)(i)of this section, the earnings and profits of that corporation shall includeits pro rata share of the earnings and profits (or any deficit therein)of each succeeding lower-tier 10 percent owned corporation. Thus, a first-tier10 percent owned corporation shall combine with its own earnings and profitsits pro rata share of the earnings and profits of all such lower-tier corporations.The affiliated group shall then adjust its basis in the stock of the first-tiercorporation by its pro rata share of the total combined earnings and profitsof the first-tier and the lower-tier corporations. In the case of a 10percent owned corporation whose tax year does not conform to that of thetaxpayer, the taxpayer shall include the annual earnings and profits ofsuch 10 percent owned corporation for the tax year ending within the taxyear of the taxpayer, whether or not such 10 percent owned corporationis owned directly by the taxpayer.   (iv) <T3>Special rules for foreign corporations in pre-effective date tax years.</T3>Solely for purposes of determining the adjustment required under paragraph(c)(2)(i) of this section, for tax years beginning after 1912 and before1987, financial earnings (or losses) of a foreign corporation computedusing United States generally accepted accounting principles may be substitutedfor earnings and profits in making the adjustment required by paragraph(c)(2)(i) of this section. A taxpayer is not required to isolate the financialearnings of a foreign corporation derived or incurred during its periodof 10 percent ownership or during the post-1912 taxable years and determineearnings and profits (or deficits) attributable under section 1248 principlesto the taxpayer's stock in a 10 percent owned corporation. Instead, thetaxpayer may include all historic financial earnings for purposes of thisadjustment. If the affiliated group elects to use financial earnings withrespect to any foreign corporation, financial earnings must be used bythat group with respect to all foreign corporations, except that earningsand profits may in any event be used for controlled foreign corporationsfor taxable years beginning after 1962 and before 1987. However, if theaffiliated group elects to use earnings and profits with respect to anysingle controlled foreign corporation for the 1963 through 1986 period,such election shall apply with respect to all its controlled foreign corporations.(v) <T3>Taxpayers using the fair market value method. </T3>Because the fairmarket value of any asset which is stock will reflect retained earningsand profits, taxpayers who use the fair market value method shall not adjuststock basis by the amount of retained earnings and profits, as otherwiserequired by paragraph (c)(2)(i) of this section.(vi) <T3>Examples. </T3>Certain of the rules of this paragraph (c)(2) may beillustrated by the following examples.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (1). </T3>X, an affiliated group that uses the tax book valuemethod of apportionment, owns 20 percent of the stock of Y, which owns50 percent of the stock of Z. X's basis in the Y stock is $1,000. X, Y,and Z have calendar taxable years. The undistributed earnings and profitsof Y and Z at year-end attributable to X's period of ownership are $80and $40, respectively. Because Y owns half of the Z stock, X's pro ratashare of Z's earnings and profits attributable to X's Y stock is $4. X'spro rata share of Y's earnings attributable to X's Y stock is $16. Forpurposes of apportionment, the tax book value of the Y stock is, therefore,considered to be $1,020.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (2). </T3>X, an unaffiliated domestic corporation that wasorganized on January 1, 1987, has owned all the stock of Y, a foreign corporationwith a functional currency other than the U.S. dollar, since January 1,1987. Both X and Y have calendar taxable years. All of Y's assets generategeneral limitation income. X has a deductible interest expense incurredin 1987 of $160,000. X apportions its interest expense using the tax bookvalue method. The adjusted basis of its assets that generate domestic incomeis $7,500,000. The adjusted basis of its assets that generate foreign sourcegeneral limitation income (other than the stock of Y) is $400,000. X'sadjusted basis in the Y stock is $2,000,000. Y has undistributed earningsand profits for 1987 of $100,000, translated into dollars from Y's functionalcurrency at the exchange rate on the last day of X's taxable year. BecauseX is required under paragraph (b)(1) of this andSection; 1.861-10T to increaseits basis in the Y stock by the computed amount of earnings and profits,X's adjusted basis in the Y stock is considered to be $2,100,000, and itsadjusted basis of assets that generate foreign source general limitationincome is, thus, considered to be $2,500,000. X would apportion its interestexpense as follows:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">To foreign source general limitation income:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>5,L1(0,0,0),tp0,p8,8/1,g1,t1,b1,15,2,45,2,29</C> <H1>Interest expense</H1><H1>andmultiply;</H1><H1>Adjusted basis of foreign general limitation assets</H1><H2>Adjusted basis of foreign general limitation assets</H2><H2>+</H2><H2>Adjusted basis of domestic assets</H2><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>7,L1(0,0,0),tp0,p8,8/1,g1,t1,b1,27,7,2,21,2,6,27</C> <H1/><H1>$160,000</H1><H1>andmultiply;</H1><H1>$2,500,000</H1><H2>$2,500,000+$7,500,000</H2><H1>=</H1><H1>$40,000</H1><H1/><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">To domestic source income:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>5,L1(0,0,0),tp0,p8,8/1,g1,t1,b1,15,2,45,2,29</C> <H1>Interest expense</H1><H1>andmultiply;</H1><H1>Adjusted basis of domestic assets</H1><H2>Adjusted basis of foreign general limitation assets</H2><H2>+</H2><H2>Adjusted basis of domestic assets</H2><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>7,L1(0,0,0),tp0,p8,8/1,g1,t1,b1,27,7,2,21,2,7,27</C> <H1/><H1>$160,000</H1><H1>andmultiply;</H1><H1>$7,500,000</H1><H2>$2,500,000+$7,500,000</H2><H1>=</H1><H1>$120,000</H1><H1/><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG></ITAG>(3) <T3>Characterization of stock of controlled foreign corporations</T3>_(i)<T3>In general. </T3>Stock in a controlled foreign corporation (as definedin section 957) shall be characterized as an asset in the various separatelimitation categories either on the basis of:(A) The asset method described in paragraph (c)(3)(ii) of this section,or(B) The modified gross income method described in paragraph (c)(3)(iii)of this section.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">Stock in a controlled foreign corporation whose interest expense isapportioned on the basis of assets shall be characterized in the handsof its United States shareholders under the asset method described in paragraph(c)(3)(ii). Stock in a controlled foreign corporation whose interest expenseis apportioned on the basis of gross income shall be characterized in thehands of its United States shareholders under the gross income method describedin paragraph (c)(3)(iii).(ii) <T3>Asset method. </T3>Under the asset method, the taxpayer characterizesthe tax book value or fair market value of the stock of a controlled foreigncorporation based on an analysis of the assets owned by the controlledforeign corporation during the foreign corporation's taxable year thatends with or within the taxpayer's taxable year. This process is basedon the application of andSection;1.861-9T(g) at the level of the controlledforeign corporation. In the case of a controlled foreign corporation thatowns stock in one or more lower-tier controlled foreign corporations inwhich the United States taxpayer is a United States shareholder, the characterizationof the tax book value of the fair market value of the stock of the first-tiercontrolled foreign corporation to the various separate limitation categoriesof the affiliated group must take into account the stock in lower-tiercorporations. For this purpose, the stock of each such lower-tier corporationshall be characterized by reference to the assets owned during the lower-tiercorporation's taxable year that ends during the taxpayer's taxable year.The analysis of assets within a chain of controlled foreign corporationsmust begin at the lowest-tier controlled foreign corporation and proceedup the chain to the first-tier controlled foreign corporation. For purposesof this paragraph (c), the value of any passive asset to which relatedperson interest is allocated under andSection; 1.904-5(c)(2)(ii) must bereduced by the principal amount of indebtedness on which such interestis incurred. Furthermore, the value of any asset to which interest expenseis directly allocated under andSection; 1.861-10T must be reduced as providedin andSection; 1.861-9T(g)(2)(iii). See andSection; 1.861-9T(h)(5) for furtherguidance concerning characterization of stock in a related person underthe fair market value method.(iii) <T3>Modified gross income method. </T3>Under the gross income method, thetaxpayer characterizes the tax book value of the stock of the first-tiercontrolled foreign corporation based on the gross income net of interestexpense of the controlled foreign corporation (as computed under andSection;1.861-9T(j)) within each relevant category for the taxable year of thecontrolled foreign corporation ending with or within the taxable year ofthe taxpayer. For this purpose, however, the gross income of the first-tiercontrolled foreign corporation shall include the total amount of net subpartF income of any lower-tier controlled foreign corporation that was excludedunder the rules of andSection; 1.861-9T(j)(2)(ii)(B).(4) <T3>Stock of noncontrolled section 902 corporations_</T3>(i) <T3>General rule. </T3>Because each noncontrolled section 902 corporationconstitutes a separate limitation category, the value of such stock, increasedto the extent required under paragraph (c)(2) of this section, is attributablesolely to each such category.   (ii) <T3>Special rule for separate limitation losses_</T3>(A) <T3>Election. </T3>If, as a result of the allocation and apportionmentof interest expense using the asset method described in andSection;1.861-9T(g),the taxpayer has a loss in the separate limitation category for a givennoncontrolled section 902 corporation, the taxpayer may elect to reallocateinterest expense equal to such loss to any other separate limitation categorythat is in excess credit (without regard to carryovers from other years),to the extent that the reallocation of such interest to such other categorydoes not create a loss in that category. For this purpose, the term ``categoryin excess credit'' means any category of income with respect to which theforeign income taxes paid or accrued for the current taxable year exceedthe limitation computed under section 904 with respect to such category.The election to reallocate interest expense under this paragraph shallbe made in the manner prescribed in andSection;1.861-9T(f)(3) (relating tothe election to use a gross income method for controlled foreign corporations).Furthermore, such election is irrevocable and, thus, cannot be amendedby an amended return. <ITAG tagnum="21">(B) <T3>Example. </T3>X, a domestic corporation organized on January 1, 1987,incurred deductible interest expense in 1987 in the amount of $1,000,000.X uses the tax book value method of apportionment. X owns 25 percent ofthe stock of A, a noncontrolled section 902 corporation. At the end of1987, the tax book value of X's assets by income grouping are as follows:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="38">Domestic</ITAG>.....$3,500,000   <ITAG tagnum="38">Foreign general limitation</ITAG>.....1,000,000   <ITAG tagnum="38">Noncontrolled section 902 corporation</ITAG>.....500,000 <ITAG tagnum="21">In 1987, A paid no dividends. X received $100,000 of foreign generallimitation income, on which it incurred $50,000 of tax to foreign governments.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The stock of A constitutes ten percent of X's assets. Therefore, tenpercent of X's interest expense ($100,000) is allocated and apportionedto the separate limitation category for dividends on the A stock. SinceA paid no dividends, this amount would constitute a separate limitationloss under the rules of section 904(f)(5).   </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Because X incurred more tax to foreign governments on its foreigngeneral limitation income than it can credit against its U.S. tax liability,for the current tax year, and because the reallocation of interest expenseallocated and apportioned to dividends from A to foreign general limitationincome would not create a loss in that category, X may elect to reallocatesuch interest expense to the foreign general limitation category to theextent of the loss in the separate limitation category for dividends receivedfrom A. </ITAG>(d) <T3>Treatment of notes_</T3>(1) <T3>General rule. </T3>Subject to the adjustments and special rules ofthis paragraph (d) and paragraph (e) of this section, all notes held bya taxpayer are taken into account in the application of the asset methoddescribed in andSection;1.861-9T(g). However, the notes of an affiliatedcorporation are subject to special rules set forth in andSection;1.861-11T(e).For purposes of this section, the term ``notes'' means all interest bearingdebt, including debt bearing original issue discount.   (2) <T3>Characterization of related controlled foreign corporation notes. </T3>Thedebt of a controlled foreign corporation shall be characterized accordingto the taxpayer's treatment of the interest income derived from that debtobligation after application of the look-through rule of section 904(d)(3)(C).Thus, a United States shareholder includes interest income from a controlledforeign corporation in the same category of income as the category of incomefrom which the controlled foreign corporation deducts the interest expense.See section 954(b)(5) and andSection;1.904-5(c)(2) for rules concerning theallocation of related person interest payments to the foreign personalholding company income of a controlled foreign corporation.   (e) <T3>Portfolio securities that constitute inventory or gererate primarilygains. </T3>Because gain on the sale of securities is sourced by referenceto the residence of the seller, a resident of the United States will generallyreceive domestic source income (and a foreign resident will generally receiveforeign source income) upon sale or disposition of securities that otherwisegenerate foreign source dividends and interest (or domestic source dividendsand interest in the case of a foreign resident). Although under paragraphs(c) and (d) of this section securities are characterized by reference tothe source and character of dividends and interest, the source and characterof income on gain or disposition must also be taken into account for purposesof characterizing portfolio securities if:   (1) The securities constitute inventory in the hands of the holder, or(2) 80 percent or more of the gross income generated by a taxpayer's entireportfolio of such securities during a taxable year consists of gains.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">For this purpose, a portfolio security is a security in any entityother than a controlled foreign corporation with respect to which the taxpayeris a United States shareholder under section 957, a noncontrolled section902 corporation with respect to the taxpayer, or a 10 percent owned corporationas defined in andSection; 1.861-12(c)(2)(ii). In taking gains into account,a taxpayer must treat all portfolio securities generating foreign sourcedividends and interest as a single asset and all portfolio securities generatingdomestic source dividends as a single asset and shall characterize thetotal value of that asset based on the source of all income and gain generatedby those securities in the taxable year.(f) <T3>Assets funded by disallowed interest_</T3>(1) <T3>Rule. </T3>In the case of any asset in connection with which interestexpense accruing at the end of the taxable year is capitalized, deferred,or disallowed under any provision of the Code, the adjusted basis or fairmarket value (depending on the taxpayer's choice of apportionment methods)of such an asset shall be reduced by the principal amount of indebtednessthe interest on which is so capitalized, deferred, or disallowed.(2) <T3>Example. </T3>The rules of this paragraph (f) may be illustrated bythe following example.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example. </T3>X is a domestic corporation which uses the tax book valuemethod of apportionment. X has $1000 of indebtedness and $100 of interestexpense. X constructs an asset with an adjusted basis of $800 before interestcapitalization and is required under the rules of section 263A to capitalize$80 in interest expense. Because interest on $800 of debt is capitalizedand because the production period is in progress at the end of X's taxableyear, $800 of the principal amount of X's debt is allocable to the building.The $800 of debt allocable to the building. The $800 of debt allocableto the building reduces its adjusted basis for purposes of apportioningthe balance of X's interest expense ($20).</ITAG>(g) <T3>Special rules for FSCs_</T3>(1) <T3>Treatment of FSC stock. </T3>No interest expense shall be allocatedor apportioned to stock of a foreign sales corporation (``FSC'') to theextent that the FSC stock is attributable to the separate limitation forcertain FSC distributions described in section 904(d)(1)(H). FSC stockis considered to be attributable solely to the separate limitation categorydescribed in section 904(d)(1)(H) unless the taxpayer can demonstrate thatmore than 20 percent of the FSC's gross income for the taxable year consistsof income other than foreign trading income.(2) <T3>Treatment of assets that generate foreign trade income. </T3>Assetsof the related supplier that generate foreign trade income must be proratedbetween assets attributable to foreign source general limitation incomeand assets attributable to domestic source income in proportion to foreignsource general limitation income and domestic source income derived fromtransactions generating foreign trade income.(i) <T3>Value of assets attributable to foreign source income. </T3>The valueof assets attributable to foreign source general limitation income is computedby multiplying the value of assets for the taxable year generating foreigntrading gross receipts by a fraction:(A) The numerator of which is foreign source general limitation incomefor the taxable year derived from transactions giving rise to foreign tradinggross receipts, after the application of the limitation provided in section927(e)(1), and(B) The denominator of which is total income for the taxable year derivedfrom the transaction giving rise to foreign trading gross receipts.(ii) <T3>Value of assets attributable to domestic source income. </T3>The valueof assets attributable to domestic source income is computed by subtractingfrom the total value of assets for the taxable year generating foreigntrading gross receipts the value of assets attributable to foreign sourcegeneral limitation income as computed under paragraph (g)(2)(i) of thissection.(h) <T3>Special rules for DISCs_</T3>(1) <T3>Treatment of DISC stock. </T3>No interest shall be allocated or apportionedto stock in a DISC (or stock in a former DISC to the extent that the stockin the former DISC is attributable to the separate limitation categorydescribed in section 904(d)(1)(F)).(2) <T3>Treatment of assets that generate qualified export receipts. </T3>Assetsof the related supplier that generate qualified export receipts must beprorated between assets attributable to foreign source general limitationincome and assets attributable to domestic source income in proportionto foreign source general limitation income and domestic source incomederived from transactions during the taxable year from transactions generatingqualified export receipts.(i) [Reserved.](j) <T3>Examples. </T3>Certain of the rules in this section and andSection;andSection;1.861-9T(g) and 1.861-10(e) are illustrated by the following example.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (1):</T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) <T3>Facts. </T3>X, a domestic corporation organized on January 1, 1987,has a calendar taxable year and apportions its interest expense on thebasis of the tax book value of its assets. In 1987, X incurred a deductiblethird-party interest expense of $100,000 on an average month-end debt amountof $1 million. The total tax book value of X's assets (adjusted as requiredunder paragraph (b) of this section for retained earnings and profits)is $2 million. X manufactures widgets. One-half of the widgets are soldin the United States and one-half are exported and sold through a foreignbranch with title passing outside the United States.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">X owns all the stock of Y, a controlled foreign corporation that alsohas a calendar taxable year and is also engaged in the manufacture andsale of widgets. Y has no earnings and profits or deficits in earningsand profits prior to 1987. For 1987, Y has taxable income and earningsand profits of $50,000 before the deductible for related person interestexpense. Half of the $50,000 is foreign source personal holding companyincome and the other half is derived from widget sales and constitutesforeign source general limitation income. Assume that Y has no deductiblesfrom gross income other than interest expense. Y's foreign personal holdingcompany taxable income is included in X's gross income under section 951.Y paid no dividends in 1987. Prior to 1987, Y did not borrow any fundsfrom X. The average month-end level of borrowings by Y from X in 1987 is$100,000, on which Y paid a total of $10,000 in interest. The total taxbook value of Y's assets in 1987 is $500,000. Y has no liabilities to thirdparties. X elects pursuant to andSection; 1.861-9T for Y to apportion Y'sinterest expense under the gross income method prescribed in andSection;1.861-9T(g).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">In addition to its stock in Y, X owns 20 percent of the stock of Z,a noncontrolled section 902 corporation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">X's total assets and their tax book values are:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L2,tp0,i1,s50,9</C> <H1>Asset</H1><H1>Tax book value</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Plant andamp; equipment<D>$1,000,000</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Corporate headquarters<D>500,000</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Inventory<D>200,000</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Automobiles<D>20,000</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Patents<D>50,000</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Trademarks<D>10,000</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Y stock (including paragraph (c)(2) adjustment)<D>80,000</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Y note<D>100,000</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Z stock<D>40,000</D></ITAG></ITAG> <ITAG tagnum="21">(2) <T3>Categorization of Assets.</T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">Single Category Assets </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. Automobiles: X's automobiles are used exclusively by its domesticsales force in the generation of United States source income. Thus, theseassets are attributable solely to the grouping of domestic income. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. Y Note: Under paragraph (d)(2) of this section, the Y note in thehands of X is characterized according to X's treatment of the interestincome received on the Y note. In determining the source and characterof the interest income on the Y note, the look-through rules of sections904(d)(3)(C) and 904(g) apply. Under section 954(b)(5) and andSection; 1.904-5(c)(2)(ii),Y's $10,000 interest payment to X is allocated directly to, and thus reduces,Y's foreign personal holding company income of $25,000 (yielding foreginpersonal holding company taxable income of $15,000). Therefore, the Y noteis attributable solely to the statutory grouping of foreign source passiveincome. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. Z stock: Because Z is a noncontrolled section 902 corporation,the dividends paid by Z are subject to a separate limitation under section904(d)(1)(E). Thus, this asset is attributable solely to the statutorygrouping consisting of Z dividends. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">Multiple Category Assets</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. Plant andamp; equipment, inventory, patents, and trademarks: In 1987,X sold half its widgets in the United States and exported half outsidethe United States. A portion of the taxable income from export sales willbe foreign source income, since the export sales were accomplished througha foreign branch and title passed outside the United States. Thus, theseassets are attributable both to the statutory grouping of foreign generallimitation and the grouping of domestic income. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. Y Stock: Since Y's interest expense is apportioned under the grossincome method prescribed in andSection; 1.861-9T(j), the Y stock must becharacterized under the gross income method described in paragraph (c)(3)(iii)of this section.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">Assets without Directly Identifiable Yield </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. Corporate headquarters: This asset generates no directly identifiableincome yield. The value of the asset is disregarded. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) <T3>Analysis of Income Yield for Multiple Category Assets. </T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. Plant andamp; Equipment, inventory, patents, and trademarks: As notedabove, X's 1987 widget sales were half domestic and half foreign. Assumethat Example 2 of andSection; 1.863-3(b)(2) applies in sourcing the exportincome from the export sales. Under Example 2, the income generated bythe export sales is sourced half domestic and half foreign. The incomegnerated by the domestic sales is entirely domestic source. Accordingly,three-quarters of the income gnerated on all sales is domestic source andone-quarter of the income is foriegn source. Thus, three-quarters of thefair market value of these assets are attributed to the grouping of domesticsource income and one-quarter of the fair market value of these assetsis attributed to the statutory grouping of foreign source general limitationincome. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. Y Stock: Under the gross income method described in paragraph (c)(3)(iii)of this section, Y's gross income net of interest expenses in each limitationcategory must be determined_$25,000 foreign source general limitation incomeand $15,000 of foreign source passive income. Of X's adjusted basis of$80,000 in Y stock, $50,000 is attributable to foreign source general limitationincome and $30,000 is attributable to foreign source passive income. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) <T3>Application of the Special Allocation Rule of andSection; 1.861-10T(e).</T3>Assume that the taxable year in question is 1990 and that the appliablepercentage prescribed by andSection; 1.861-10T(e)(1)(iv)(A) is 80 percent.Assume that X has elected to use the quadratic formula provided in andSection;1.861-10T(e)(1)(iv)(B). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Step 1. </T3>X's average month-end level of debt owning to unrelatedpersons is $1 million. The tax book value of X's assets is $2 million.Thus, X's debt-to-asset ratio computed under andSection; 1.861-10T(e)(1)(i)is 1 to 2. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Step 2. </T3>The tax book value of Y's assets is $500,000. BecauseY has no debt to persons other than X, Y's debt-to-asset ratio computedunder andSection; 1.861-10T(e)(1)(ii) is $0 to $500,000. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Step 3. </T3>Y's average month-end liabilities to X, as computed underandSection; 1.861-10T(e)(1)(iii) for 1987 are $100,000. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Step 4. </T3>Adding the $100,000 of Y's liabilities owed to X as computedunder Step 3 to Y's third party liabilities ($0) would be insufficientto make Y's debt-to-asset ratio computed in Step 2 ($100,000-to-$500,000,or 1:5) equal to at least 80 percent of X's debt-to-asset ratio computedunder Step 1, as adjusted to reflect a reduction in X's debt and assetsby the $100,000 of excess related person indebtedness (.80 x $900,000/$1,900,000or 1:2.6). Therefore, the entire amount of Y's liabilities to X ($100,000)constitute excess related person indebtedness under andSection; 1.861-10T(e)(1)(ii).Thus, the entire $10,000 of interest received by X from Y during 1987 constitutesinterest received on excess related person indebtedness. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Step 5. </T3>The Y note held by X has a tax book value of $100,000.Solely for purposes of andSection; 1.861-10(e)(1)(v), the Y note is attributedto separate limitation categories in the same manner as the Y stock. Underparagraph (c)(3)(iii) of this section, of the $80,000 of Y stock held byX, $50,000 is attributable to foreign source general limitation income,and $30,000 is attributable to foreign source passive income. Thus, forpurposes of $1.861-10T(e)(1)(v), $62,500 of the $100,000 Y note is consideredto be a foreign source general limitation asset and $37,500 of the $100,000Y note is considered to be a foreign source passive asset. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Step 6. </T3>Since $8,000 of the $10,000 in related person interestincome received by Y constitutes interest received on excessive relatedperson indebtedness, $10,000 of X's third party interest expense is allocatedto X's debt investment in Y. Under andSection; 1.861-10T(e)(1)(vi), 62.5percent of the $10,000 of X's third party interest expense ($6,250) isallocated to foreign source general limitation income and 37.5 percentof the $10,000 of X's third party interest expense ($3,750) is allocatedto foreign source passive income. As a result of this direct allocation,the value of X's assets generating foreign source general limitation incomeshall be reduced by the principal amount of indebtedness the interest onwhich is directly allocated to foreign source general limitation income($62,500), and X's assets generating foreign general limitation incomeshall be reduced by the principal amount of indebtedness the interest onwhich is directly allocated to foreign passive income ($37,500). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(5) <T3>Totals. </T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Having allocated $10,000 of its third party interest expense to itsdebt investment in Y, X would apportion the $90,000 balance of its interestaccording to the following apportionment fractions:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C/> <H1>Asset</H1><H1>Domestic source</H1><H1>Foreign general</H1><H1>Foreign passive</H1><H1>Noncontrolled section 902</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Plant and equipment<D>$750,000</D><D>$250,000</D><D/><D/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Inventory<D>$150,000</D><D>$50,000</D><D/><D/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Automobiles<D>$20,000</D><D/><D/><D/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Patents<D>$37,500</D><D>$12,500</D><D/><D/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Trademarks<D>$7,500</D><D>$2,500</D><D/><D/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Y stock<D/><D>$50,000</D><D>$30,000</D><D/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Y note<D/><D/><D>$100,000</D><D/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Z stock<D/><D/><D/><D>$40,000</D><R/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Totals<D>$965,000</D><D>$365,000</D><D>$130,000</D><D>$40,000</D><R/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Adjustments for directly allocable interest<D/><D>($62,250)</D><D>($37,750)</D><D/><R/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Adjusted totals<D>$965,000</D><D>$302,750</D><D>$92,250</D><D>$40,000</D><R/></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Percentage<D>69</D><D>22</D><D>6</D><D>3</D></ITAG></ITAG> <ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example 2: </T3>Assume the same facts as in <T3>Example </T3>1, except that Y has $100,000 of third party indebtedness.Further, assume for purposes of the application of the special allocationrule of andSection; 1.861-10T(e) that the taxable year is 1990 and that theapplicable percentage prescribed by andSection; 1.861-10T(e)(1)(iv)(A) is80 percent. The application of the andSection; 1.861-10(e) would be modifiedas follows. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Step 1. </T3>X's debt-to-asset ratio computed under andSection; 1.861-10T(e)(1)(i)remains 1 to 2 (or 0.5). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Step 2. </T3>The tax book value of Y's assets is $500,000. Y has $100,000of indebtedness to third parties. Y's debt-to-asset ratio computed underandSection; 1.861-10T(e)(1)(ii) is $100,000 to $500,000 (1:5 or 0.2). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Step 3. </T3>Y's average month-end liabilities to X, as computed underandSection; 1.861-10T(e)(1)(iii) remain $100,000. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Step 4. </T3>X's debt-to-asset ratio is 0.5 and 80 percent of 0.5 is0.4. Because Y's debt-to-asset ratio is 0.2, there is excess related personindebtedness, the amount of which can be computed based on the followingformula:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>5,L1(0,0,0),b1,tp0,p8,8/1,g1,t1,s100,1,xs136,1,r100</C> <H1>Aggregate third party debt of related U.S. shareholder^X</H1><H2>U.S. shareholder assets^X</H2><H1>andmultiply;</H1><H1>Applicable percentage for year (0.8)</H1><H1>=</H1><H1>Aggregate third party debt of related CFCs+X</H1><H2>Related CFC assets</H2><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG></ITAG> <ITAG tagnum="21">Supplying the facts as given, this equation is as follows:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C/> <H1>1,000,000^X</H1><H2>2,000,000^X</H2><H1>andmultiply;.8=</H1><H1>100,000+X</H1><H2>500,000</H2><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Multiply both sides by 500,000 and (2,000,000^X), yielding:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>1,L1(0,0,0),b1,tp0,p8,8/1,g1,t1,aw,50</C> <H1>4andmultiply;10</H1>11^400,000X=2andmultiply;1011+2,000,000X^100,000X^X2<ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG></ITAG> <ITAG tagnum="21">Since there is an X2 in this equation, a quadratic formula must beutilized to solve for X. Group the components in this equation, segregatingthe X and the X2:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>1,L1(0,0,0),b1,tp0,p8,8/1,g1,t1,aw,32</C> <H1>X</H1>2+(^2,300,000)X+(2andmultiply;1011)=0<ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG></ITAG> <ITAG tagnum="21">Apply the quadratic formula:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L1(0,0,0),b1,tp0,p8,8/1,g1,t1,aw,4,17</C> <H1>X=</H1><H1>^b</H1>andplusmin;|b2^4(a)(c)<H2>2(a)</H2><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">a=1 (coefficient of X2)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">b=^2,300,000 (coefficient of X)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">c=2andmultiply;1011 (remaining element of equation)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Therefore, X equals either 90,519 or (2.21andmultiply;1011). for purposesof computing excess related person indebtedness, X is the lowest positiveamount derived from this equation, which is 90,519. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Steps 5 and 6 are unchanged from <T3>Example </T3>1, except that the total amount of interest on excessrelated party indebtedness is $9,051.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1.861-13T</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Transition rules for interest expenses (Temporary regulations.) [Reserved]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1.861-14T</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Special rules for allocating and apportioning certain expenses (otherthan interest expense) of an affiliated group of corporations (Temporaryregulations.) </ITAG>(a) <T3>In general. </T3>Section 1.861-11T provides special rules for allocatingand apportioning interest expense of an affiliated group of corporations.The rules of this andSection; 1.861-14T also relate to affiliated groupsof corporations and implement section 864(e)(6), which requires affiliatedgroup allocation and apportionment of expenses other than interest whichare not directly allocable and apportionable to any specific income producingactivity or property. In general, the rules of this section apply to taxableyears beginning after December 31, 1986. Paragraph (b) of this sectiondescribes the scope of the application of the rule for the allocation andapportionment of such expenses of affiliated groups of corporations. Suchrules is then set forth in paragraph (c) of this section. Paragraph (d)of this section contains the definition of the term ``affiliated group''for purposes of this section. Paragraph (e) of this section describes theexpenses subject to allocation and apportionment under the rules of thissection. Paragraph (f) of this section provides rules concerning the affiliatedgroup allocation and apportionment of such expenses in computing the combinedtaxable income of a FSC or DISC and its related supplier. Paragraph (g)of this section describes the treatment of losses caused by apportionmentof such expenses in the case of an affiliated group that does not filea consolidated return. Paragraph (h) of this section provides rules concerningthe treatment of the reserve expenses of a life insurance company. Paragraph(j) of this section provides examples illustrating the application of thissection. (b) <T3>Scope</T3>_(1) <T3>Application of section 864(e)(6). </T3>Section 864(e)(6) and this sectionapply to the computation of taxable income for purposes of computing separatelimitations on the foreign tax credit under section 904. Section 864(e)(6)and this section also apply in connection with section 907 to determinereductions in the amount allowed as a foreign tax credit under section901. Section 864(e)(6) and this section also apply to the computation ofthe combined taxable income of the related supplier and a foreign salescorporation (FSC) (under sections 921 through 927) as well as the combinedtaxable income of the related supplier and a domestic international salescorporation (DISC) (under sections 991 through 997).(2) <T3>Nonapplication of section 864(e)(6). </T3>Section 864(e)(6) and thissection do not apply to the computation of Subpart F income of controlledforeign corporations (under sections 951 through 964) or the computationof effectively connected taxable income of foreign corporations.(3) <T3>Application of section 864(e)(6) to the computation of combined taxableincome of a possessions corporation and its affiliates. </T3>[Reserved.](c) <T3>General rule for affiliated corporations_</T3>(1) <T3>General rule. </T3>(i) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (c)(2)of this section, the taxable income of each member of an affiliated groupwithin each statutory grouping shall be determined by allocating and apportioningthe expenses described in paragraph (e) of this section of each memberaccording to apportionment fractions which are computed as if all membersof such group were a single corporation. For purposes of determining theseapportionment fractions, any interaffiliate transactions or property thatare duplicative with respect to the measure of apportionment chosen shallbe eliminated. For example, in the application of an asset method of apportionment,stock in affiliated corporations shall not be taken into account, and loansbetween members of an affiliated group shall be treated in accordance withthe rules of andSection; 1.861-11T(e). Similarly, in the application of agross income method of apportionment, interaffiliate dividends and interest,gross income from sales or services, and other interaffiliate gross incomeshall be eliminated. Likewise, in the application of a method of apportionmentbased on units sold or sales receipts, interaffiliate sales shall be eliminated.(ii) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the rules of andSection;1.861-8T apply to the allocation and apportionment of the expenses describedin paragraph (e) of this section. Thus, allocation under this paragraph(c) is accomplished by determining, with respect to each expense describedin paragraph (e), the class of gross income to which the expense is definitelyrelated and then allocating the deduction to such class of gross income.For this purpose, the gross income of all members of the affiliated groupmust be taken in account. Then, the expense is apportioned by attributingthe expense to gross income (within the class to which the expense hasbeen allocated) which is in the statutory grouping and to gross income(within the class) which is in the residual grouping. Section 1.861-8T(c)(1)identifies a number of factors upon which apportionment may be based, suchas comparison of units sold, gross sales or receipts, assets used, or grossincome. The apportionment method chosen must be applied consistently byeach member of the affiliated group in apportioning the expense when morethan one member incurred the expense or when members incurred separateportions of the expense. The apportionment fraction must take into accountthe apportionment factors contributed by all members of the affiliatedgroup. In the case of an affiliated group of corporations that files aconsolidated return, consolidated foreign tax credit limitations are computedfor the group in accordance with the rules of andSection; 1.1502-4. For purposesof this section the term ``taxpayer'' refers to the affiliated group (regardlessof whether the group files a consolidated return), rather than to the separatemembers thereof.(2) <T3>Expenses relating to fewer than all members. </T3>An expense relatesto fewer than all members of an affiliated group if the expense is allocableunder paragraph (e)(1) of this section to gross income of at least onemember other than the member that incurred the expense but fewer than allmembers of the affiliated group. The taxable income of the member thatincurred the expense shall be determined by apportioning that expense underthe rules of paragraph (c)(1) of this section as if the members of theaffiliated group that derive gross income to which such expense is allocableunder paragraph (e)(1) were treated as a single corporation.(3) <T3>Prior application of section 482. </T3>The rules of this section donot supersede the application of section 482 and the regulations thereunder.Section 482 may be applied effectively to deny a deduction for an expenseto one member of an affiliated group and to allow a deduction for thatexpense to another member of the affiliated group. In cases to which section482 is applied, expenses shall be reallocated and reapportioned under section864(e)(6) and this section after taking into account the application ofsection 482.(d) <T3>Definition of affiliated group_</T3>(1) <T3>General rule. </T3>For purposes of this section, the term ``affiliatedgroup'' has the same meaning as is given that term by section 1504, exceptthat section 936 companies are also included within the affiliated group.Section 1504(a) defines an affiliated group as one or more chains of includiblecorporations connected through 80% stock ownership with a common parentcorporation which is an includible corporation (as defined in section 1504(b)).In the case of a corporation that either becomes or ceases to be a memberof the group during the course of the corporation's taxable year, onlythe expenses incurred by the group member during the period of membershipshall be allocated and apportioned as if all members of the group werea single corporation. In this regard, the apportionment factor chosen shallrelate only to the period of membership. For example, if apportionmenton the basis of assets is chosen, the average amount of assets (tax bookvalue or fair market value) for the taxable year shall be multiplied bya fraction, the numerator of which is the number of months of the corporation'staxable year during which the corporation was a member of the affiliatedgroup, and the denominator of which is the number of months within thecorporation's taxable year. If apportionment on the basis of gross incomeis chosen, account shall be taken of gross income generated only duringthe period of membership. If apportionment on the basis of units sold orsales receipts is chosen, account shall be taken of units sold or salesreceipts only during the period of membership. Expenses incurred by thegroup member during its taxable year, but not during the period of membership,shall be allocated and apportioned without regard to other members of thegroup.(2) <T3>Inclusion of section 936 corporations. </T3>The exclusion from theaffiliated group of section 936 corporations under section 1504(b)(4) doesnot apply for purposes of this section. Thus, a possessions corporationmeeting the ownership requirements of section 1504(a) with respect to whichan election under section 936 is in effect for the taxable year is a memberof the affiliated group.(3) <T3>Inclusion of financial corporations. </T3>For purposes of this section,in the case of an affiliated group (as defined in paragraph (d)(1) of thissection), any members that constitute financial corporations as definedin andSection; 1.861-11T(d)(4)(ii) shall be treated as members of the affiliatedgroup. The rule of andSection; 1.861-11T(d)(4)(i), which treats such financialcorporations as a separate affiliated group, applies only for purposesof allocation and apportionment of interest expense and does not applyto the allocation and apportionment of other expenses under this section.(4) <T3>Treatment of life insurance companies subject to taxation under section801. </T3>A life insurance company that is subject to taxation under section801 shall be considered to constitute a member of the affiliated groupcomposed of companies not taxable under section 801 only if a parent corporationso elects under section 1504(c)(2)(A) of the Code.(e) <T3>Expenses to be allocated and apportioned under this section_</T3>(1)<T3>Expenses not directly traceable to specific income producing activitiesor property. </T3>(i) The expenses that are required to be allocated andapportioned under the rules of this section are expenses related to certainsupportive functions, research and experimental expenses, stewardship expenses,and legal and accounting expenses, to the extent that such expenses arenot directly allocable to specific income producing activities or propertysolely of the member of the affiliated group that incurred the expense.Interest expense of members of an affiliated group of corporations is allocatedand apportioned under andSection; 1.861-11T and not under the rules of thissection. Expenses that are included in inventory costs or that are capitalizedare not subject to allocation and apportionment under the rules of thissection.(ii) An item of expense is not considered to be directly allocable to specificincome producing activities or property solely of the member incurringthe expense if, were all members of the affiliated group treated as a singlecorporation, the expense would not be considered defintely related, withinthe meaning of andSection; 1.861-8T(b)(2), only to a class of gross incomederived solely by the member which actually incurred the expense. Furthermore,the expense is presumed not to be definitely related only to a class ofgross income derived solely by the member incurring the expense (and is,therefore, presumed not to be directly allocable to specific income producingactivities or property of that member) unless the taxpayer is able affirmativelyto establish otherwise. As provided in paragraph (c)(1) of this section,expenses described in this paragraph (e)(1) generally shall be apportionedby the member incurring the expense according to apportionment fractionscomputed as if all members of the affiliated group were a single corporation.Under paragraph (c)(2) of this section, however, an expense shall be apportionedaccording to apportionment fractions computed as if only some (but fewerthan all) members of the affiliated group were a single corporation, ifthe expense is considered allocable to gross income of at least one memberother than the member incurring the expense but fewer than all membersof the affiliated group. An item of expense shall be considered to be allocableto gross income of fewer than all members of the group if, were all membersof the affiliated group treated as a single corporation, the expense wouldnot be considered definitely related within the meaning of andSection; 1.861-8T(b)(2)to gross income derived by all members of the group. In such case, theexpense shall be considered allocable, for purposes of paragraph (c)(2)of this section, to gross income of those members of the group that generated(or could reasonably be expected to generate) the gross income to whichthe expense would be considered definitely related if the group were treatedas a single corporation.(2) <T3>Research and experimental expenses_ </T3>(i) <T3>In general. </T3>The allocation and apportionment of research and experimentalexpenses is governed by the rules of andSection; 1.861-8T(e)(3). In the caseof research and experimental expenses incurred by a member of an affiliatedgroup, the rules of andSection; 1.861-8T(e)(3) shall be applied as if allmembers of the affiliated group were a single taxpayer. Thus, researchand experimental expenses shall be allocated to all income of all membersof the affiliated group reasonably connected with the relevant broad productcategory to which such expenses are definitely related under andSection;1.861-8T(e)(3)(i). If fewer than all members of the affiliated group derivegross income reasonably connected with that relevant broad product cagetory,then such expenses shall be apportioned under the rules of this paragraph(c)(2) only among those members, as if those members were a single corporation.See <T3>Example </T3>(1) of paragraph (j) of this section. Such expenses shallthen be apportioned, if the sales method is used, in accordance with therules of andSection; 1.861-8T(e)(3)(ii) between the statutory grouping (withinthe class of gross income) and the residual grouping (within the classof gross income) taking into account the amount of sales of all membersof the affiliated group from the product category which resulted in suchgross income. Section 1.861-8T(e)(3)(ii)(D), relating to sales of controlledparties, shall be applied as if all members of the affiliated group werethe ``taxpayer'' referred to therein. If either of the optional gross incomemethods of apportionment is used, gross income of all members of the affiliatedgroup that generate, have generated, or could reasonably have been expectedto generate gross income within the relevant class of gross income mustbe taken into account.(ii) <T3>Expenses subject to the statutory moratorium. </T3>The rules of thissection do not apply to research and experimental expenses allocated undersection 126 of Pub. L. 98-368.(3) <T3>Expenses related to supportive functions. </T3>Expenses which are supportivein nature (such as overhead, general and administrative, supervisory expenses,advertising, marketing, and other sales expenses) are to be allocated andapportioned in accordance with the rules of andSection; 1.861-8T(b)(3). Tothe extent that such expenses are not directly allocable under paragraph(e)(1)(ii) of this section to specific income producing activities or propertyof the member of the affiliated group that incurred the expense, such expensesmust be allocated and apportioned as if all members of the affiliated groupwere a single corporation in accordance with the rules of paragraph (c)of this section. Specifically, such expenses must be allocated to a classof gross income that take into account gross income that is generated,has been generated, or could reasonably have been expected to have beengenerated by the members of the affiliated group. If the expenses relateto the gross income of fewer than all members of the affiliated group asdetermined under paragraph (c)(2) of this section, then those expensesmust be apportioned under the rules of paragraph (c)(2) of this section,as if those fewer members were a single corporation. See <T3>Example </T3>(3) of paragraph (j) of this section. Such expenses mustbe apportioned between statutory and residual groupings of income withinthe appropriate class of gross income by reference to the apportionmentfactors contributed by the members of the affiliated group that are treatedas a single corporation. (4) <T3>Stewardship expenses. </T3>Stewardship expenses are to be allocatedand apportioned in accordance with the rules of andSection; 1.861-8T(e)(4).In general, stewardship expenses are considered definitely related andallocable to dividends received or to be received from a related corporation.If members of the affiliated group, other than the member that incurredthe stewardship expense, receive or may receive dividends from the relatedcorporation, such expense must be allocated and apportioned in accordancewith the rules of paragraph (c) of this section as if all such membersof the affiliated group that receive or may receive dividends were a singlecorporation. See <T3>Example </T3>(4) of paragraph (j) of this section. Such expenses mustbe apportioned between statutory and residual groupings of income withinthe appropriate class of gross income by reference to the apportionmentfactors contributed by the members of the affiliated group treated as asingle corporation.(5) <T3>Legal and accounting fees and expenses. </T3>Legal and accounting feesand expenses are to be allocated and apportioned under the rules of andSection;1.861-8T (e)(5). To the extent that such expenses are not directly allocableunder paragraph (e)(1)(ii) of this section to specific income producingactivities or property of the member of the affiliated group that incurredthe expense, such expenses must be allocated and apportioned as if allmembers of the affiliated group were a single corporation. Specifically,such expenses must be allocated to a class of gross income that takes intoaccount the gross income which is generated, has been generated, or couldreasonably have been expected to have been generated by the other membersof the affiliated group. If the expenses relate to the gross income offewer than all members of the affiliated group as determined under paragraph(c)(2) of this section, then those expenses must be apportioned under therules of paragraph (c)(2) of this section, as if those fewer members werea single corporation. See <T3>Example </T3>(5) of paragraph (j) of this section. Such expenses mustbe apportioned taking into account the apportionment factors contributedby the members of the group that are treated as a single corporation. (f) <T3>Computation of FSC or DISC combined taxable income. </T3>In the computationunder the pricing rules of sections 925 and 994 of the combined taxableincome of any FSC or DISC and its related supplier which are members ofan affiliated group, the combined taxable income of such FSC or DISC andits related supplier shall be reduced by the portion of the expenses ofthe affiliated group described in paragraph (e) of this section that isincurred in connection with export sales involving that FSC or DISC. Inorder to determine the portion of the expenses of the affiliated groupthat is incurred in connection with export sales by or through a FSC orDISC, the portion of the total of the apportionment factor chosen thatrelates to the generation of that export income must be determined. Thus,if gross income is the apportionment factor chosen, the portion of totalgross income of the affiliated group that consists of combined gross incomederived from transactions involving the FSC or DISC and related suppliermust be determined. Similarly, if units sold or sales receipts is the apportionmentfactor chosen, the portion of total units sold or sales receipts that generatedexport income of the FSC or DISC and related supplier must be determined.The amount of the expense shall then be multiplied by a fraction, the numeratorof which is the export related apportionment factor as determined above,and the denominator of which is the total apportionment factor. Thus, ifgross income is the apportionment factor chosen, apportionment is basedon a fraction, the numerator of which is export related combined grossincome of the FSC or DISC and related supplier and the denominator of whichis the total gross income of the affiliated group. Similarly, if unitssold or sales receipts is the apportionment factor chosen, the fractionis the units sold or sales receipts that generated export income of theFSC or DISC and related supplier over the total units sold or sales receiptsof the affiliated group. Under this rule, expenses of other group membersmay be attributed to the combined gross income of a FSC of DISC and itsrelated supplier without affecting the amount of expenses (other than anycommission payable by the related supplier to the FSC or DISC) otherwisedeductible by the FSC or DISC, the related supplier, or other members ofthe affiliated group. The FSC or DISC must calculate combined taxable income,taking into account any reduction by expenses attributed from other membersof the affiliated group to determine the commission derived by the FSCor DISC or the transfer price of qualifying export property sold to theFSC or DISC.(g) <T3>Losses created through apportionment. </T3>In the case of an affiliatedgroup that does not file a consolidated return, the taxable income in anyseparate limitation category must be adjusted under this paragraph (g)for purposes of computing the separate foreign tax credit limitations undersection 904(d). As a consequence of the affiliated group allocation andapportionment of expenses required by section 864(e)(6) and this section,expenses of a group member may be apportioned for section 904 purposesto a limitation category with a consequent loss in that limitation category.For purposes of this paragraph, the term ``limitation category'' includesdomestic source income, as well as the types of income described in section904(d)(1) (A) through (I). A loss of one affiliate in a limitation categorywill reduce the income of another member in the same limitation categoryif a consolidated return is filed. (<T3>See </T3>andSection; 1.1502-4.) If a consolidated return is not filed,this netting does not occur. Accordingly, in such a case, the followingadjustments among members are required, in order to give effect to thegroup allocation of expense:(1) Losses created through group apportionment of expense in one or morelimitation categories within a given member must be eliminated; and(2) A corresponding amount of income of other members in the same limitationcategory must be recharacterized.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">Such adjustments shall be accomplished in accordance with the rulesof andSection; 1.861-11T(g).(h) <T3>Special rule for the allocation of reserve expenses of a life insurancecompany.</T3> An amount of reserve expenses of a life insurance companyequal to the dividends received deduction that is disallowed because itis attributable to the policyholders' share of dividends received shallbe treated as definitely related to such dividends. The remaining reserveexpenses of such company shall be allocated and apportioned under the rulesof andSection; 1.861-8 and this section.(i) [Reserved.](j) <T3>Examples.</T3> The rules of this section may be illustrated by thefollowing examples. All of these examples assume that section 482 has notbeen applied by the Commissioner.<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (1)_</T3>(i) <T3>Facts.</T3> P owns all of the stock of X and all of the stock of Y.P, X and Y are domestic corporations. P is a holding company for the stockof X and Y. Both X and Y manufacture and sell a product which is includedin a broad product category listed in andSection; 1.861-8(e)(3)(i). During1988, X incurred $100,000 on research connected with that product. Allof the research was performed in the United States. In 1988, the domesticsales by X of the product totalled $400,000 and the foreign sales of theproduct totalled $200,000; Y's domestic sales of the product totalled $200,000and Y's foreign sales of the product totalled $200,000. In 1988, X's grossincome is $300,000, of which $200,000 is from domestic sales and $100,000is from foreign sales; Y's gross income is $200,000 of which $100,000 isfrom domestic sales and $100,000 is from foreign sales.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) P, X and Y are affiliated corporations within the meaning ofsection 864(e)(5) and this section. There search expenses incurred by Xare allocable to all income connected with the relevant broad categorylisted in andSection;1.861-8T(e)(3)(i). Both X and Y have gross income includiblewithin the class of gross income related to that product category. Accordingly,the research and experimental expenses incurred by X are to be allocatedand apportioned as if X and Y were a single corporation. The apportionmentfor 1988 is as follows:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">Tentative Apportionment on the Basis of Sales</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="38">Research expenses to be  apportioned </ITAG>.....$100,000<ITAG tagnum="38">Exclusive apportionment to United States source gross income</ITAG>.....$30,000<ITAG tagnum="38">Research expense to be apportioned on the basis of sales</ITAG>.....$70,000<ITAG tagnum="25">Apportionment of research expense to foreign source general limitationincome:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>5,L1(0,0,0),b1,tp0,p8,8/1,g1,t1,7,1,17,1,7</C> <H1>$70,000</H1><H1>andmultiply;</H1><H1>$200,000+$200,000</H1><H2>$600,000+$400,000</H2><H1>=</H1><H1>$28,000</H1><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Apportionment of research expense to United States source gross income:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C/> <H1>$70,000</H1><H1>andmultiply;</H1><H1>$400,000+$200,000</H1><H2>$600,000+$400,000</H2><H1>=</H1><H1>$42,000</H1><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="38">Total apportioned deduction for research</ITAG>.....$100,000<ITAG tagnum="20">Of which_</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="38">Apportioned to foreign source gross income</ITAG>.....$28,000<ITAG tagnum="38">Apportioned to U.S. source gross income ($30,000+$42,000)</ITAG>.....$72,000<ITAG tagnum="73">Tentative Apportionment on the Basis of Gross Income</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Research expense apportioned to foreign source gross income:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>5,L1(0,0,0),b1,tp0,p8,8/1,g1,t1,7,1,17,1,7</C> <H1>$100,000</H1><H1>andmultiply;</H1><H1>$100,000+$100,000</H1><H2>$300,000+$200,000</H2><H1>=</H1><H1>$40,000</H1><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Research expense apportioned to United States income:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C/> <H1>$100,000</H1><H1>andmultiply;</H1><H1>$200,000+$100,000</H1><H2>$300,000+$200,000</H2><H1>=</H1><H1>$60,000</H1><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (2)</T3>_(i) <T3>Facts.</T3> P owns all of the stock of X, which owns all of the stockof Y. P, X and Y are all domestic corporations. P has incurred generaltraining program expenses of $100,000 in 1987. Employees of P, X and Yparticipate in the training program. In 1987, P had United States sourcegross income of $200,000 and foreign source general limitation income of$200,000; X had U.S. source gross income of $100,000 and foreign sourcegeneral limitation income of $100,000; and Y had U.S. source gross incomeof $300,000 and foreign source general limitation income of $100,000.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) <T3>Analysis.</T3> P, X and Y are an affiliated group of corporations withinthe meaning of section 864(e)(5). The training expenses incurred by P arenot definitely related solely to specific income producing activities orproperty of P. The employees of X and Y also participate in the trainingprogram. Thus, this expense relates to gross income generated by P, X andY. This expense is definitely related and allocable to all of the grossincome from foreign and domestic sources of P, X and Y. It is assumed thatapportionment on the basis of gross income is reasonable. The apportionmentof the expense is as follows:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Apportionment of $100,000 expense to foreign source general limitationincome:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C/> <H1>$100,000</H1><H1>andCx.187;</H1><H1>$200,000+$100,000+$100,000</H1><H2>$400,000+$200,000+$400,000</H2><H1>=</H1><H1>$40,000</H1><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Apportionment of $100,000 expense to United States source gross income:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C/> <H1>$100,000</H1><H1>andmultiply;</H1><H1>$200,000+$100,000+$300,000</H1><H2>$400,000+$200,000+$400,000</H2><H1>=</H1><H1>$60,000</H1><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="38">Total apportioned expense</ITAG>.....$100,000<ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (3)_</T3>(i)<T3> Facts.</T3> The facts are the same as in <T3>Example</T3> (2) above, except that only employees of P and X participatein the training program.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) <T3>Analysis. </T3>Because only the employees of P and X participate inthe training program and they perform no services for Y, the expense relatesonly to gross income generated by P and X. Accordingly, the $100,000 expensemust be allocated and apportioned as if P and X were a single corporation.The apportionment of the $100,000 expense is as follows:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Apportionment of $100,000 expense to foreign source general limitationincome:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C/> <H1>$100,000</H1><H1>andmultiply;</H1><H1>$200,000+$100,000</H1><H2>$400,000+$200,000</H2><H1>=</H1><H1>$50,000</H1><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Apportionment of $100,000 expense to U.S. source gross income:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C/> <H1>$100,000</H1><H1>andmultiply;</H1><H1>$200,000+$100,000</H1><H2>$400,000+$200,000</H2><H1>=</H1><H1>$50,000</H1><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (4)_</T3>(i) <T3>Facts. </T3>P owns all of the stock of X which owns all of the stockof Y. P and X are domestic corporations; Y is a foreign corporation. In1987 P incurred $10,000 of stewardship expenses relating to an audit ofY.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) <T3>Analysis.</T3> The stewardship expenses incurred by P are not directlyallocable to specific income producing activities or property of P. Theexpense is definitely related and allocable to dividends received or tobe received by X. Accordingly, the expense of P is allocated and apportionedas if P and X were a single corporation. The expense is definitely relatedto dividends received or to be received by X from Y, a foreign corporation.Such dividends are foreign source general limitation income. Thus, theentire amount of the expense must be allocated to foreign source dividendincome.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (5)</T3>_(i)<T3> Facts.</T3> P owns all of the stock of X which owns all of the stockof Y. P, X and Y are all domestic corporations. In 1987, P incurred $10,000legal expense relating to the testimony of certain employees of P in connectionwith litigation to which Y is a party. This expense is not allocable tospecific income of Y. In 1987, Y had $100,000 foreign source general limitationincome and $300,000 U.S. source gross income.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) <T3>Analysis.</T3> The legal expenses incurred by P are not definitelyrelated solely to specific income producing activities or property of P.The expense is definitely related and allocable to the class of gross incomewhich includes only gross income generated by Y. Accordingly, the expenseof P is allocated and apportioned as if Y were the only member of the affiliatedgroup, as follows:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Apportionment of legal expenses to foreign source general limitationincome:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>5,L1(0,0,0),b1,tp0,p8,8/1,g1,t1,7,1,8,9,6</C> <H1>$10,000</H1><H1>x</H1><H1>$100,000</H1><H2>$400,000</H2><H1> . . . . . .</H1><H1>$2,500</H1><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">Apportionment of legal expenses to U.S. source gross income:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>5,L1(0,0,0),b1,tp0,p8,8/1,g1,t1,7,1,8,9,6</C> <H1>$10,000</H1><H1>x</H1><H1>$300,000</H1><H2>$400,000</H2><H1> . . . . . .</H1><H1>$7,500</H1><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (6)</T3>_(i) <T3>Facts. </T3>P owns all of the stock of R, which owns all of the stockof F. P and R are domestic corporations, and F is a foreign sales corporationunder section 922 of the Code. R and F have entered into an agreement wherebyF is paid a commission with respect to sales of product A. In 1987, P hadgross receipts of $1,000,000 from domestic sales of product A, and grossreceipts of $1,000,000 from foreign sales of product A. R had gross receiptsof $1,000,000 from domestic sales of product A, and $1,000,000 from exportsales of product A. R's cost of goods sold attributable to export salesis $500,000. R has deductible expenses of $100,000 directly related toits export sales, and F has such deductible expenses of $100,000. During1987, P incurred an expense of $100,000 for marketing studies involvingthe worldwide market for product A.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) <T3>Analysis. </T3>P and R are an affiliated group of corporations withinthe meaning of section 864(e)(5) and this section. The expense incurredby P for marketing studies regarding the worldwide market for product Ais an expense that is not directly related solely to the activities ofP, but also to the activities of R. This expense must be allocated andapportioned under the rules of paragraph (c)(1) of this section, as ifP and R were a single corporation. The expense is allocable to the classof gross income that includes all gross income generated by sales of productA. Apportionment on the basis of gross receipts is reasonable under thesefacts. F, a foreign corporation, is not a member of the affiliated group.However, for purposes of determining F's commission on its sales, the combinedgross income of F and R must be reduced by the portion of the marketingstudies expense of P that is incurred in connection with export sales involvingF under the rules of paragraph (f) of this section. The computation ofthe combined taxable income of R and F is as follows:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L0,tp0,p0,8/9,g1,t1,i2,s25,10</C> <H1> </H1><H1> </H1><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Combined Taxable Income of R and F</T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">R's gross receipts from export sales <D>$1,000,000</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">R's cost of goods sold<D>$500,000</D><R>n,s</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Combined Gross Income<D>$500,000</D><R>n,s</R></ITAG>Less:<ITAG tagnum="2">R's other deductible expenses<D>$100,000</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">F's other deductible expenses<D>100,000</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="12">Apportionment of P's expense:</ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>5,L1(0,0,0),b1,tp0,p8,8/1,g1,t1,8,1,21,r9,7</C> <H1>$100,000</H1><H1>x</H1><H1>$1,000,000</H1><H2>$200,000+$2,000,000</H2><H1>=</H1><H1>$25,000</H1><ITAG tagnum="22"> </ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>2,L0,tp0,p0,8/9,g1,t1,i1,s25,8</C> <H1> </H1><H1> </H1><ITAG tagnum="4">Total <D>$225,000</D><R>n,s</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Combined Taxable Income <D>$275,000</D><R>n,d</R></ITAG></ITAG><T4>Par. </T4>6. Section 1.863-3 is amended by revising paragraph (b)(2)<T3>Example </T3>(2), subdivisions (i) and (ii) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 1.863-3</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Income from the sale of personal property derived partly from withinand partly from without the United States.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(b) <T3>Income party from sources within a foreign country.</T3><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(2) <T3>Allocation or apportionment.</T3><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (2). </T3>(i) and (ii) [Reserved] For guidance, see andSection;863-3T(b)(2) <T3>Example </T3>(2)(i) and (ii).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><T4>Par. </T4><T4>7. </T4>A new andSection;1.863-3T is added immediately after andSection;1.863-3to read as follows:   <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;1.863-3T </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Income from the sale of personal property derived partly from withinand partly from without the United States (Temporary regulations). </ITAG>(a) [Reserved]  (b) <T3>Income partly from sources within a foreign country.   </T3>(1) [Reserved]   (2) <T3>Allocation or apportionment.   </T3><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (1) </T3>[Reserved]   </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T3>Example (2). </T3>(i) Where an independent factory or production pricehas not been established as provided under <T3>Example </T3>(1), the gross income derived from the sale of personalproperty produced (in whole or in part) by the taxpayer within the UnitedStates and sold within a foreign country or produced (in whole or in part)by the taxpayer within a foreign country and sold within the United Statesshall be computed.   </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii) Of this gross amount, one-half shall be apportioned in accordancewith the value of the taxpayer's property within the United States andwithin the foreign country, the portion attributable to sources withinthe United States being determined by multiplying such one-half by a fraction,the numerator of which consists of the value of the taxpayer's propertywithin the United States and the denominator of which consists of the valueof the taxpayer's property both within the United States and within theforeign country. The remaining one-half of such gross income shall be apportionedin accordance with the gross sales of the taxpayer within the United Statesand within the foreign country, the portion attributable to sources withinthe United States being determined by multiplying such one-half by a fractionthe numerator of which consists of the taxpayer's gross sales for the taxableyear or period within the United States, and the denominator of which consistsof the taxpayer's gross sales for the taxable year or period both withinthe United States and within the foreign country. Deductions from grossincome that are allocable and apportionable to gross income described inparagraph (i) of this <T3>Example </T3>2 shall be apportioned between the United States and foreignsource portions of such income, as determined under this paragraph (ii),on a pro rata basis, without regard to whether the deduction relates primarilyor exclusively to the production of property or to the sale of property.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(b)(2) <T3>Example </T3>(2)(iii) through (c)(4) [Reserved]   </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subchapter G_[Amended]   </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Regulations Under Tax Conventions   </ITAG><T4>Par. </T4><T4>8. </T4>The following regulations under tax conventions are herebyremoved. <ITAG tagnum="15">1. Part 501_Australia   </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">2. Part 504_Belgium   </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">3. Part 505_Netherlands   </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">4. Part 506_Japan   </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">5. Part 507_United Kingdom   </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">6. Part 511_Finland   </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">7. Part 512_Italy   </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">8. Part 518_New Zealand   </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">9. Part 519_Canada   </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">OMB Control Numbers the Paperwork Reduction Act   </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">PART 602_[AMENDED]   </ITAG><T4>Par. </T4><T4>9. </T4>The authority citation for Part 602 continues to read as follows:  <ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>26 U.S.C. 7805.   </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;602.101 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended]   </ITAG><T4>Par. </T4><T4>10. </T4>Section 602.101(c) is amended by inserting in the appropriateplace in the table:   <ITAG tagnum="38">andSection;1.861-</ITAG>9T.....1545-1072.   <ITAG tagnum="38">andSection;1.861-</ITAG>12T.....1545-1072.    <ITAG tagnum="6">Lawrence B. Gibbs, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Commissioner of Internal Revenue.   </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Approved: August 24, 1988.   </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">O. Donaldson Chapoton,   </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Assistant Secretary of the Treasury. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 88-20838 Filed 9-9-88; 8:45 am] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4830-01-M  </ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>